Florida, session 2026, HB1221.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
338
339 Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 17.11, Florida
340 Statutes, is amended to read:
341 17.11 To report disbursements made.—
342 (2) The Chief Financial Officer shall also cause to have
343 reported from the Financial Management Florida Accounting
344 Information Resource Subsystem no less than quarterly the
345 disbursements which agencies made to small businesses, as
346 defined in the Florida Small and Minority Business Assistance
347 Act; to certified minority business enterprises in the
348 aggregate; and to certified minority business enterprises broken
349 down into categories of minority persons, as well as gender and
350 nationality subgroups. This information shall be made available
Page 14 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
351 to the agencies, the Office of Supplier Diversity, the Governor,
352 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
353 Representatives. Each agency shall be responsible for the
354 accuracy of information entered into the Financial Management
355 Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem for use in
356 this reporting.
357 Section 2. Section 17.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to
358 read:
359 17.13 To replace duplicate warrants lost or destroyed.—
360 (1) The Chief Financial Officer is required to replace
361 duplicate any Chief Financial Officer's warrants that may have
362 been lost or destroyed, or may hereafter be lost or destroyed,
363 upon the owner thereof or the owner's agent or attorney
364 presenting the Chief Financial Officer the statement, under
365 oath, reciting the number, date, and amount of any warrant or
366 the best and most definite description in his or her knowledge
367 and the circumstances of its loss; if the Chief Financial
368 Officer deems it necessary, the owner or the owner's agent or
369 attorney shall file in the office of the Chief Financial Officer
370 a surety bond, or a bond with securities, to be approved by one
371 of the judges of the circuit court or one of the justices of the
372 Supreme Court, in a penalty of not less than twice the amount of
373 any warrants so replaced duplicated, conditioned to indemnify
374 the state and any innocent holders thereof from any damages that
375 may accrue from such replacement duplication.
Page 15 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
376 (2) The Chief Financial Officer is required to replace
377 duplicate any Chief Financial Officer's warrant that may have
378 been lost or destroyed, or may hereafter be lost or destroyed,
379 when sent to any payee via any state agency when such warrant is
380 lost or destroyed prior to being received by the payee and
381 provided the director of the state agency to whom the warrant
382 was sent presents to the Chief Financial Officer a statement,
383 under oath, reciting the number, date, and amount of the warrant
384 lost or destroyed, the circumstances surrounding the loss or
385 destruction of such warrant, and any additional information that
386 the Chief Financial Officer shall request in regard to such
387 warrant.
388 (3) Any replacement duplicate Chief Financial Officer's
389 warrant issued in pursuance of the above provisions shall be of
390 the same validity as the original was before its loss.
391 Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 110.113, Florida
392 Statutes, is amended to read:
393 110.113 Pay periods for state officers and employees;
394 salary payments by direct deposit.—
395 (1) The normal pay period for salaries of state officers
396 and employees shall be 1 month. The Department of Financial
397 Services shall issue either monthly or biweekly salary payments
398 by state warrants or by direct deposit pursuant to s. 17.076 or
399 make semimonthly salary payments by direct deposit pursuant to
400 s. 17.076, as requested by the head of each state agency and
Page 16 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
401 approved by the Executive Office of the Governor and the
402 Department of Financial Services.
403 Section 4. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of
404 section 112.3135, Florida Statutes, to read:
405 112.3135 Restriction on employment of relatives.—
406 (2)
407 (c) To aid the recruitment of firefighters within this
408 state, notwithstanding paragraph (a), a public official may
409 appoint, employ, promote, or advance, or advocate for the
410 appointment, employment, promotion, or advancement of a relative
411 as a firefighter as defined in s. 633.102 if such appointment,
412 employment, promotion, or advancement is part of a competitive
413 process provided for in a collective bargaining agreement.
414 Section 5. Subsection (16) of section 215.422, Florida
415 Statutes, is amended to read:
416 215.422 Payments, warrants, and invoices; processing time
417 limits; dispute resolution; agency or judicial branch
418 compliance.—
419 (16) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed
420 to be an appropriation. Any interest which becomes due and owing
421 pursuant to this section must be paid shall only be payable from
422 the appropriation charged for such goods or services. However,
423 if insufficient funds are available within the appropriation
424 charged for such goods or services, the agency must pay the
425 interest from a similar or appropriate appropriation category.
Page 17 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
426 Section 6. Subsections (4) through (10) of section
427 215.5586, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5)
428 through (11), respectively, paragraphs (a) through (e) of
429 subsection (1), subsections (2) and (3), paragraph (a) of
430 present subsection (8), and present subsection (10) are amended,
431 and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to read:
432 215.5586 My Safe Florida Home Program.—There is
433 established within the Department of Financial Services the My
434 Safe Florida Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal
435 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership
436 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does
437 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the
438 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of
439 residential property in this state. Implementation of this
440 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is
441 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability
442 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed
443 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of
444 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects
445 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in
446 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by
447 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other
448 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of
449 available funds. If, after applications are processed and
450 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept
Page 18 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
451 applications up to the available amount. The program shall
452 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach
453 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements
454 provided in this section.
455 (1) HURRICANE MITIGATION INSPECTIONS.—
456 (a)1. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term:
457 a. "Attached" means a dwelling unit that shares a wall
458 with another dwelling unit.
459 b. "Detached" means a dwelling that does not share a wall
460 with another dwelling unit or building and has greater than zero
461 clearance between it and any other building. This term includes
462 a garage that is located under a contiguous roof with a
463 residence.
464 c. "Single-family" means a residence designed for and
465 containing only one dwelling unit.
466 2. An applicant is To be eligible for a hurricane
467 mitigation inspection under the program if all of the following
468 conditions are met:
469 a.1. The A home for which the inspection is sought is must
470 be a single-family, unit on an individual parcel of land that
471 is:
472 (I) A detached residential property; or
473 (II) An attached residential property not exceeding three
474 stories. A townhouse as defined in s. 481.203;
475 b.2. The A home for which the inspection is sought is must
Page 19 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
476 be site-built and owner-occupied.; and
477 c.3. The applicant is homeowner must have been granted a
478 homestead exemption on the home under chapter 196.
479 (b)1. An application for a hurricane mitigation inspection
480 must contain a signed or electronically verified statement made
481 under penalty of perjury that the applicant has submitted only
482 one inspection application on the home or that the application
483 is allowed under subparagraph 2., and the application must have
484 documents attached which demonstrate that the applicant meets
485 the requirements of paragraph (a).
486 2. An applicant may submit a subsequent hurricane
487 mitigation inspection application for the same home only if:
488 a. The original hurricane mitigation inspection
489 application has been denied or withdrawn because of material
490 errors or omissions in the application;
491 b. The original hurricane mitigation inspection
492 application was denied or withdrawn because the applicant home
493 did not meet the eligibility criteria for an inspection at the
494 time of the previous application, and the applicant homeowner
495 reasonably believes that he or she is the home now is eligible
496 for an inspection; or
497 c. The program's eligibility requirements for an
498 inspection have changed since the original application date, and
499 the applicant reasonably believes that her or she the home is
500 eligible under the new requirements; or.
Page 20 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
501 d. More than 24 months have passed since the applicant
502 received a hurricane mitigation inspection under this section,
503 and the applicant has not received a grant payment through the
504 program for that inspection.
505 (c) An applicant meeting the requirements of paragraph (a)
506 may receive an inspection of the a home through under the
507 program without being eligible for a grant under subsection (2)
508 or applying for such grant.
509 (d) Licensed inspectors are to provide initial home
510 inspections of eligible homes to determine what mitigation
511 measures are needed, what insurance premium discounts may be
512 available, and what improvements to existing residential
513 properties are needed to reduce the property's vulnerability to
514 hurricane damage. An inspector may inspect a townhouse as
515 defined in s. 481.203 to determine if opening protection
516 mitigation as listed in subparagraph (2)(e)1. would provide
517 improvements to mitigate hurricane damage.
518 (e) The department shall contract with wind certification
519 entities to provide hurricane mitigation inspections. The
520 initial inspections provided to applicants homeowners, at a
521 minimum, must include:
522 1. A home inspection and report that summarizes the
523 inspection results and identifies recommended improvements an
524 applicant a homeowner may make take to mitigate hurricane
525 damage.
Page 21 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
526 2. A range of cost estimates regarding the recommended
527 mitigation improvements.
528 3. Information regarding estimated premium discounts,
529 correlated to the current mitigation features and the
530 recommended mitigation improvements identified by the
531 inspection.
532 (2) HURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.—Financial grants shall be
533 used by applicants homeowners to make improvements recommended
534 by an initial inspection which increase a home's resistance to
535 hurricane damage.
536 (a) An applicant A homeowner is eligible for a hurricane
537 mitigation grant if all of the following criteria are met:
538 1. The applicant home must be eligible for an inspection
539 under subsection (1).
540 2. The home must be a dwelling with an insured value of
541 $700,000 or less. Applicants Homeowners who are low-income
542 persons, as defined in s. 420.0004(11), are exempt from this
543 requirement.
544 3. The home must undergo an initial acceptable hurricane
545 mitigation inspection through the program as provided in
546 subsection (1).
547 4. The building permit application for initial
548 construction of the home must have been built made before
549 January 1, 2008, as reflected on the county property appraiser's
550 website.
Page 22 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
551 5. The applicant homeowner must agree to make his or her
552 home available for a final inspection once a mitigation project
553 is completed.
554 6. The applicant homeowner must agree to provide to the
555 department information received from the applicant's homeowner's
556 insurer identifying the discounts realized by the applicant
557 homeowner because of the mitigation improvements funded through
558 the program.
559 7.a. The applicant homeowner must be a low-income person
560 or moderate-income person as defined in s. 420.0004.
561 b. The hurricane mitigation inspection must have occurred
562 within the previous 24 months from the date of application.
563 c. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2., applicants homeowners
564 who are low-income persons, as defined in s. 420.0004(11), are
565 not exempt from the requirement that the home must be a dwelling
566 with an insured value of $700,000 or less.
567 d. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2026.
568 (b)1. An application for a grant must contain a signed or
569 electronically verified statement made under penalty of perjury
570 that the applicant has submitted only one grant application or
571 that the application is allowed under subparagraph 2., and the
572 application must have documents attached demonstrating that the
573 applicant meets the requirements of paragraph (a).
574 2. An applicant may submit a subsequent grant application
575 if:
Page 23 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
576 a. The original grant application was denied or withdrawn
577 because the application contained errors or omissions;
578 b. The original grant application was denied or withdrawn
579 because the applicant home did not meet the eligibility criteria
580 for a grant at the time of the previous application, and the
581 applicant homeowner reasonably believes that he or she is the
582 home now is eligible for a grant; or
583 c. The program's eligibility requirements for a grant have
584 changed since the original application date, and the applicant
585 reasonably believes that he or she is an eligible homeowner
586 under the new requirements.
587 3. A grant application must include a statement from the
588 applicant homeowner which contains the name and state license
589 number of the contractor that the applicant homeowner
590 acknowledges as the intended contractor for the mitigation work.
591 The program must electronically verify that the contractor's
592 state license number is valid accurate and up to date before
593 grant approval.
594 (c) All grants must be matched on the basis of $1 provided
595 by the applicant for $2 provided by the state up to a maximum
596 state contribution of $10,000 toward the actual cost of the
597 mitigation project, except as provided in paragraph (h).
598 (d) All hurricane mitigation performed under the program
599 must be based upon the securing of all required local permits
600 and inspections and must be performed by properly licensed
Page 24 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
601 contractors.
602 (e) When recommended by an initial a hurricane mitigation
603 inspection, grants for eligible applicants homes may be used for
604 all of the following improvements:
605 1. Opening protection improvements, including:
606 a. Exterior doors.,
607 b. Garage doors.,
608 c. Windows., and
609 d. Skylights.
610 2. Roof improvements, including:
611 a. Reinforcing roof-to-wall connections.
612 b.3. Improving the strength of roof-deck attachments.
613 c.4. Installing secondary water resistance for roof and
614 replacing the roof covering.
615 (f) Improvements must be identified by the final hurricane
616 mitigation inspection to receive grant funds When recommended by
617 a hurricane mitigation inspection, grants for townhouses, as
618 defined in s. 481.203, may only be used for opening protection.
619 (g) The department may require that improvements be made
620 to all openings, including exterior doors, garage doors,
621 windows, and skylights, as a condition of reimbursing an
622 applicant a homeowner approved for a grant. The department may
623 adopt, by rule, the maximum grant allowances for any improvement
624 allowable under paragraph (e) or paragraph (f).
625 (h) Low-income applicants homeowners, as defined in s.
Page 25 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
626 420.0004(11), who otherwise meet the applicable requirements of
627 this subsection are eligible for a grant of up to $10,000 and
628 are not required to provide a matching amount to receive the
629 grant.
630 (i)1. The department shall develop a process that ensures
631 the most efficient means to collect and verify inspection
632 applications and grant applications to determine eligibility.
633 The department may direct hurricane mitigation inspectors to
634 collect and verify grant application information or use the
635 Internet or other electronic means to collect information and
636 determine eligibility.
637 2. The department shall prioritize the review and approval
638 of such inspection applications and grant applications in the
639 following order:
640 a. First, applications from low-income persons, as defined
641 in s. 420.0004, who are at least 60 years old;
642 b. Second, applications from all other low-income persons,
643 as defined in s. 420.0004;
644 c. Third, applications from moderate-income persons, as
645 defined in s. 420.0004, who are at least 60 years old;
646 d. Fourth, applications from all other moderate-income
647 persons, as defined in s. 420.0004; and
648 e. Last, all other applications.
649 3. The department shall start accepting inspection
650 applications and grant applications no earlier than the
Page 26 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
651 effective date of a legislative appropriation funding
652 inspections and grants, as follows:
653 a. Initially, from applicants prioritized under sub-
654 subparagraph 2.a.;
655 b. From applicants prioritized under sub-subparagraph
656 2.b., beginning 15 days after the program initially starts
657 accepting applications;
658 c. From applicants prioritized under sub-subparagraph
659 2.c., beginning 30 days after the program initially starts
660 accepting applications;
661 d. From applicants described in sub-subparagraph 2.d.,
662 beginning 45 days after the program initially starts accepting
663 applications; and
664 e. From all other applicants, beginning 60 days after the
665 program initially starts accepting applications.
666 4. The program may accept a certification directly from a
667 low-income applicant homeowner or moderate-income applicant
668 homeowner who meets the requirements of s. 420.0004(11) or (12),
669 respectively, if the applicant homeowner provides such
670 certification in a signed or electronically verified statement
671 made under penalty of perjury.
672 5. The program may accept a certification directly from an
673 applicant attesting to his or her age if the applicant provides
674 such certification in a signed or electronically verified
675 statement made under penalty of perjury.
Page 27 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
676 (j) An applicant A homeowner who receives a grant shall
677 finalize construction and request a final inspection, or request
678 an extension for an additional 6 months, within 18 months 1 year
679 after grant application approval. If an applicant a homeowner
680 fails to comply with this paragraph, his or her application is
681 deemed abandoned and the grant money reverts to the department.
682 (3) REQUESTS FOR INFORMATION.—The department may request
683 that an applicant provide additional information. An application
684 is deemed abandoned withdrawn by the applicant if the department
685 does not receive a response to its request for additional
686 information within 60 days after the notification of any
687 apparent error or omission.
688 (4) ABANDONED APPLICATIONS.—The department must notify an
689 applicant at least 5 business days before an application is
690 deemed abandoned. If the applicant responds to such notification
691 within 5 business days after receiving the notice and
692 demonstrates good cause for why the application should not be
693 deemed abandoned, the applicant may submit a subsequent grant
694 application or the department may determine the application is
695 not abandoned.
696 (9)(8) CONTRACT MANAGEMENT.—
697 (a) The department may contract with third parties for
698 grants management, inspection services, contractor services for
699 low-income applicants homeowners, information technology,
700 educational outreach, and auditing services. Such contracts are
Page 28 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
701 considered direct costs of the program and are not subject to
702 administrative cost limits. The department shall contract with
703 providers that have a demonstrated record of successful business
704 operations in areas directly related to the services to be
705 provided and shall ensure the highest accountability for use of
706 state funds, consistent with this section.
707 (11)(10) REPORTS.—The department shall make an annual
708 report on the activities of the program that shall account for
709 the use of state funds and indicate the number of inspections
710 requested, the number of inspections performed, the number of
711 grant applications received, the number and value of grants
712 approved, and the estimated average annual amount of insurance
713 premium discounts and total estimated annual amount of insurance
714 premium discounts applicants homeowners received from insurers
715 as a result of mitigation funded through the program. The report
716 must be delivered to the President of the Senate and the Speaker
717 of the House of Representatives by February 1 of each year.
718 Section 7. Subsections (1) and (2) and paragraphs (a) and
719 (j) of subsection (5) of section 215.55871, Florida Statutes,
720 are amended to read:
721 215.55871 My Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program.—There
722 is established within the Department of Financial Services the
723 My Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program to be implemented
724 pursuant to appropriations. The department shall provide fiscal
725 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership
Page 29 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
726 for the pilot program, consistent with this section. This
727 section does not create an entitlement for associations or unit
728 owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the inspection
729 or retrofitting of condominiums in the state. Implementation of
730 this pilot program is subject to annual legislative
731 appropriations. It is the intent of the Legislature that the My
732 Safe Florida Condominium Pilot Program provide licensed
733 inspectors to perform inspections for and grants to eligible
734 associations as funding allows.
735 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
736 (a) "Area median income" means the median household
737 income, as published annually by the United States Department of
738 Housing and Urban Development, for the county in which the
739 condominium property is located.
740 (b)(a) "Association" has the same meaning as in s.
741 718.103.
742 (c)(b) "Association property" means property, real and
743 personal, which is owned or leased by, or is dedicated by a
744 recorded plat to, an association for the use and benefit of its
745 members and is located in the service area.
746 (d)(c) "Board of administration" has the same meaning as
747 in s. 718.103.
748 (e)(d) "Condominium" has the same meaning as in s.
749 718.103. For purposes of this section, the term does not include
750 detached units on individual parcels of land.
Page 30 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
751 (f)(e) "Condominium property" means the lands, leaseholds,
752 and personal property that are subjected to condominium
753 ownership, whether or not contiguous, and all improvements
754 thereon and all easements and rights appurtenant thereto
755 intended for use in connection with the condominium and are
756 located in the service area.
757 (g)(f) "Department" means the Department of Financial
758 Services.
759 (h)(g) "Property" means association property and
760 condominium property, as applicable, located in the service
761 area.
762 (h) "Service area" means the area of the state which is 15
763 miles inward of a coastline, as that term is defined in s.
764 376.031.
765 (i) "Unit" has the same meaning as in s. 718.103.
766 (j) "Unit owner" has the same meaning as in s. 718.103.
767 (2) PARTICIPATION.—
768 (a) Participation in the pilot program is limited to:
769 1. Condominium associations in which at least 80 percent
770 of the occupied units within the condominium are owned or
771 occupied by a person or family whose annual income is at or
772 below 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for
773 household size, applicable to the county in which the
774 condominium is located. Eligibility must be determined using the
775 area median income published at the time an application is
Page 31 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
776 submitted. For purposes of determining if a condominium
777 association meets the 80 percent unit-occupied threshold:
778 a. Only occupied residential units may be counted.
779 b. Both owner-occupied and tenant-occupied residential
780 units may be counted as long as the persons or families living
781 in such residential units provide income documentation to the
782 department and the department has verified that such person or
783 family meets the income requirements of this subparagraph.
784 2. Structures or buildings on the condominium property
785 which are three or more stories in height, provided that each
786 structure or building that is the subject of a mitigation grant
787 contains at least two single-family dwellings.
788 (b) The department shall adopt rules establishing
789 acceptable methods for verifying household income, including,
790 but not limited to, owner self-certification, tax returns,
791 income statements, or other documentation deemed sufficient by
792 the department. The department may require periodic
793 recertification of income eligibility to ensure compliance with
794 this section.
795 (c) A condominium with mixed-income occupancies is
796 eligible to participate in the pilot program under this section
797 if the income threshold in subparagraph (a)1. is met.
798 (d)(b) In order to apply for an inspection under
799 subsection (4) or a grant under subsection (5) for association
800 property or condominium property, an association must receive
Page 32 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
801 approval by a majority vote of the board of administration or a
802 majority vote of the total voting interests of the association
803 to participate in the pilot program. An association may not
804 apply for an inspection under subsection (4) or a grant under
805 subsection (5) for association property or condominium property
806 unless the association has complied with the inspection
807 requirements in ss. 553.899 and 718.112(2)(g) and (h). An
808 association may not apply for a grant under subparagraph
809 (5)(e)1. for association property or condominium property unless
810 the windows of the association property or condominium property
811 are established as common elements in the declaration.
812 (e)(c) In order to apply for a grant under subsection (5)
813 which improves one or more units within a condominium, an
814 association must receive both of the following:
815 1. Approval by a majority vote of the board of
816 administration or a majority vote of the total voting interests
817 of the association to participate in a mitigation inspection.
818 2. Approval by at least 75 percent of all unit owners who
819 reside within the structure or building that is the subject of
820 the mitigation grant.
821 (f)(d) A unit owner may participate in the pilot program
822 through a mitigation grant awarded to the association but may
823 not participate individually in the pilot program.
824 (g)(e) The votes required under this subsection may take
825 place at the annual budget meeting of the association or at a
Page 33 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
826 unit owner meeting called for the purpose of taking such vote.
827 Before a vote of the unit owners may be taken, the association
828 must provide to the unit owners a clear disclosure of the pilot
829 program on a form created by the department. The president and
830 the treasurer of the board of administration must sign the
831 disclosure form indicating that a copy of the form was provided
832 to each unit owner of the association. The signed disclosure
833 form and the minutes from the meeting at which the unit owners
834 voted to participate in the pilot program must be maintained as
835 part of the official records of the association. Within 14 days
836 after an affirmative vote to participate in the pilot program,
837 the association must provide written notice in the same manner
838 as required under s. 718.112(2)(d) to all unit owners of the
839 decision to participate in the pilot program.
840 (5) MITIGATION GRANTS.—Financial grants may be used by
841 associations to make improvements recommended in a hurricane
842 mitigation inspection report which increase the condominium's
843 resistance to hurricane damage.
844 (a) An application for a mitigation grant must:
845 1. Contain a signed or electronically verified statement
846 made under penalty of perjury by the president of the board of
847 administration that the association has submitted only a single
848 application for each property that the association operates or
849 maintains.
850 2. Include a notarized statement from the president of the
Page 34 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
851 board of administration containing the name and license number
852 of each contractor the association intends to use for the
853 mitigation project.
854 3. Include a notarized statement from the president of the
855 board of administration which commits to the department that the
856 association will complete the mitigation improvements. If the
857 grant will be used to improve units, the application must also
858 include an acknowledged statement from each unit owner who is
859 required to provide approval for a grant under paragraph (2)(d)
860 (2)(c).
861 4. Include documentation deemed sufficient by the
862 department under paragraph (2)(b) for verifying household
863 income.
864 (j) Grant funds may only be awarded for a mitigation
865 improvement that addresses the common elements of the
866 condominium property that will result in a mitigation credit,
867 discount, or other rate differential for the building or
868 structure to which the improvement is made. As a condition of
869 receiving awarding a grant, the association department must
870 complete 100 percent of the opening protection improvements to
871 the common elements which were recommended in the final
872 hurricane mitigation inspection report require mitigation
873 improvements to be made to all openings, including exterior
874 doors, garage doors, windows, and skylights that are a part of
875 the common elements, if doing so is necessary for the building
Page 35 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
876 or structure to qualify for a mitigation credit, discount, or
877 other rate differential.
878 Section 8. The amendments made by this act to s.
879 215.55871, Florida Statutes, apply to inspection and grant
880 applications submitted to the Department of Financial Services
881 by a condominium association on or after July 1, 2026.
882 Section 9. Subsection (3) of section 215.89, Florida
883 Statutes, is amended to read:
884 215.89 Charts of account.—
885 (3) REPORTING STRUCTURE.—
886 (a) The Chief Financial Officer shall accept comments from
887 state agencies, local governments, educational entities,
888 entities of higher education, and other interested parties
889 regarding the proposed charts of account until November 1, 2013.
890 (b) By January 15, 2014, the Chief Financial Officer,
891 after consultation with affected state agencies, local
892 governments, educational entities, entities of higher education,
893 and the Auditor General, shall submit to the Governor, the
894 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
895 Representatives a report recommending a uniform charts of
896 account which requires specific enterprise-wide information
897 related to revenues and expenditures of state agencies, local
898 governments, educational entities, and entities of higher
899 education. The report must include the estimated cost of
900 adopting and implementing a uniform enterprise-wide charts of
Page 36 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
901 account.
902 Section 10. Subsections (1) and (5) of section 215.93,
903 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
904 215.93 Florida Financial Management Information System.—
905 (1) To provide the information necessary to carry out the
906 intent of the Legislature, there shall be a Florida Financial
907 Management Information System. The Florida Financial Management
908 Information System shall be fully implemented and shall be
909 upgraded as necessary to ensure the efficient operation of an
910 integrated financial management information system and to
911 provide necessary information for the effective operation of
912 state government. Upon the recommendation of the coordinating
913 council and approval of the board, the Florida Financial
914 Management Information System may require data from any state
915 agency information system or information subsystem or may
916 request data from any judicial branch information system or
917 information subsystem that the coordinating council and board
918 have determined to have statewide financial management
919 significance. Each functional owner information subsystem within
920 the Florida Financial Management Information System shall be
921 developed in such a fashion as to allow for timely, positive,
922 preplanned, and prescribed data transfers between the Florida
923 Financial Management Information System functional owner
924 information subsystems and from other information systems. The
925 principal unit of the system shall be the functional owner
Page 37 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
926 information subsystem, and the system shall include, but shall
927 not be limited to, the following:
928 (a) Planning and Budgeting Subsystem.
929 (b) Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem.
930 (b)(c) Financial Management Subsystem.
931 (c)(d) Purchasing Subsystem.
932 (d)(e) Personnel Information System.
933 (5) Functional owners are legally responsible for the
934 security and integrity of all data records existing within or
935 transferred from their information subsystems. Each agency and
936 the judicial branch shall be responsible for the accuracy of the
937 information entered into the Florida Financial Management
938 Information System. A request for a copy of a document or an
939 accounting record, whether by public records request or
940 subpoena, must be made to the state entity for which the
941 document or accounting record is recorded. The request may not
942 be made to the functional owner of the subsystem unless the
943 document or accounting record was recorded for such entity.
944 Section 11. Subsections (4) through (7) of section 215.94,
945 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3) through (6),
946 respectively, and subsection (2) and present subsection (3) of
947 that section are amended to read:
948 215.94 Designation, duties, and responsibilities of
949 functional owners.—
950 (2) The Department of Financial Services shall be the
Page 38 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
951 functional owner of the Financial Management Florida Accounting
952 Information Resource Subsystem established pursuant to ss.
953 17.03, 215.86, 216.141, and 216.151 and further developed in
954 accordance with the provisions of ss. 215.90-215.96. The
955 subsystem shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
956 following functions:
957 (a) Accounting and reporting so as to provide timely data
958 for producing financial statements for the state in accordance
959 with generally accepted accounting principles.
960 (b) Auditing and settling claims against the state.
961 (3) The Chief Financial Officer shall be the functional
962 owner of the Financial Management Subsystem. The Chief Financial
963 Officer shall design, implement, and operate the subsystem in
964 accordance with the provisions of ss. 215.90-215.96. The
965 subsystem shall include, but shall not be limited to, functions
966 for:
967 (c)(a) Recording and reconciling credits and debits to
968 treasury fund accounts.
969 (d)(b) Monitoring cash levels and activities in state bank
970 accounts.
971 (e)(c) Monitoring short-term investments of idle cash.
972 (f)(d) Administering the provisions of the Federal Cash
973 Management Improvement Act of 1990.
974 Section 12. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 215.96,
975 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
Page 39 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
976 215.96 Coordinating council and design and coordination
977 staff.—
978 (2) The coordinating council shall consist of the Chief
979 Financial Officer; the Commissioner of Agriculture; the Attorney
980 General; the Secretary of Management Services; the state chief
981 information officer; the executive director of the Department of
982 Revenue; and the Director of Planning and Budgeting, Executive
983 Office of the Governor, or their designees. The Chief Financial
984 Officer, or his or her designee, shall be chair of the council,
985 and the design and coordination staff shall provide
986 administrative and clerical support to the council and the
987 board. The design and coordination staff shall maintain the
988 Minutes of each meeting shall be and make such minutes available
989 to any interested person. The Auditor General, the State Courts
990 Administrator, a an executive officer of the Florida Association
991 of state agency administrative services director selected by the
992 council Directors, and a an executive officer of the Florida
993 Association of state budget officer selected by the council
994 Officers, or their designees, shall serve without voting rights
995 as ex officio members of the council. The chair may call
996 meetings of the council as often as necessary to transact
997 business; however, the council shall meet at least once a year.
998 Action of the council shall be by motion, duly made, seconded
999 and passed by a majority of the council voting in the
1000 affirmative for approval of items that are to be recommended for
Page 40 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1001 approval to the Financial Management Information Board.
1002 (3) The coordinating council, assisted by the design and
1003 coordination staff, shall have the following duties, powers, and
1004 responsibilities pertaining to the Florida Financial Management
1005 Information System:
1006 (a) To review and coordinate annual workplans to ensure
1007 that the Florida Financial Management Information System remains
1008 aligned across participating entities. The coordination council
1009 shall ensure that each participating entity submits an annual
1010 workplan by October 1 of each year. The coordinating council
1011 shall review and discuss the workplans, identify potential
1012 impacts or conflicts, facilitate resolutions when practicable,
1013 and expedite unresolved issues as appropriate.
1014 (b) To conduct such studies and to establish committees,
1015 workgroups, and teams to develop recommendations for rules,
1016 policies, procedures, principles, and standards to the board as
1017 necessary to assist the board in its efforts to design,
1018 implement, and perpetuate a financial management information
1019 system, including, but not limited to, the establishment of
1020 common data codes, and the development of integrated financial
1021 management policies that address the information and management
1022 needs of the functional owner subsystems. The coordinating
1023 council shall make available a copy of the approved plan in
1024 writing or through electronic means to each of the coordinating
1025 council members, the fiscal committees of the Legislature, and
Page 41 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1026 any interested person.
1027 (c)(b) To recommend to the board solutions, policy
1028 alternatives, and legislative budget request issues that will
1029 provide ensure a framework for the timely, positive, preplanned,
1030 and prescribed data transfer between information subsystems and
1031 to recommend to the board solutions, policy alternatives, and
1032 legislative budget request issues that ensure the availability
1033 of data and information that support state planning, policy
1034 development, management, evaluation, and performance monitoring.
1035 (c) To report to the board all actions taken by the
1036 coordinating council for final action.
1037 (d) To review the annual work plans of the functional
1038 owner information subsystems by October 1 of each year. The
1039 review shall be conducted to assess the status of the Florida
1040 Financial Management Information System and the functional owner
1041 subsystems in regard to the provisions of s. 215.91. The
1042 coordinating council, as part of the review process, may make
1043 recommendations for modifications to the functional owner
1044 information subsystems annual work plans.
1045 Section 13. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
1046 215.985, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1047 215.985 Transparency in government spending.—
1048 (4) The Executive Office of the Governor, in consultation
1049 with the appropriations committees of the Senate and the House
1050 of Representatives, shall establish and maintain a website that
Page 42 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1051 provides information relating to the approved operating budget
1052 for each branch of state government and state agency.
1053 (a) At a minimum, the information must include:
1054 1. Disbursement data for each appropriation by the account
1055 value object code associated with each expenditure established
1056 within the Financial Management Florida Accounting Information
1057 Resource Subsystem. Expenditure data must include the name of
1058 the payee, the date of the expenditure, the amount of the
1059 expenditure, and the voucher statewide document number. Such
1060 data must be searchable by the name of the payee, the paying
1061 agency, and fiscal year, and must be downloadable in a format
1062 that allows offline analysis.
1063 2. For each appropriation, any adjustments, including
1064 vetoes, approved supplemental appropriations included in
1065 legislation other than the General Appropriations Act, budget
1066 amendments, other actions approved pursuant to chapter 216, and
1067 other adjustments authorized by law.
1068 3. Status of spending authority for each appropriation in
1069 the approved operating budget, including released, unreleased,
1070 reserved, and disbursed balances.
1071 4. Position and rate information for positions provided in
1072 the General Appropriations Act or approved through an amendment
1073 to the approved operating budget and position information for
1074 positions established in the legislative branch.
1075 5. Allotments for planned expenditures of state
Page 43 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1076 appropriations established by state agencies in the Financial
1077 Management Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem,
1078 and the current balances of such allotments.
1079 6. Trust fund balance reports, including cash available,
1080 investments, and receipts.
1081 7. General revenue fund balance reports, including revenue
1082 received and amounts disbursed.
1083 8. Fixed capital outlay project data, including original
1084 appropriation and disbursements throughout the life of the
1085 project.
1086 9. A 10-year history of appropriations indicated by
1087 agency.
1088 10. Links to state audits or reports related to the
1089 expenditure and dispersal of state funds.
1090 11. Links to program or activity descriptions for which
1091 funds may be expended.
1092 Section 14. Subsections (1) and (2) and paragraph (f) of
1093 subsection (3) of section 216.102, Florida Statutes, are amended
1094 to read:
1095 216.102 Filing of financial information; handling by Chief
1096 Financial Officer; penalty for noncompliance.—
1097 (1) By September 30 of each year, each agency supported by
1098 any form of taxation, licenses, fees, imposts, or exactions, the
1099 judicial branch, and, for financial reporting purposes, each
1100 component unit of the state as determined by the Chief Financial
Page 44 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1101 Officer shall prepare, using generally accepted accounting
1102 principles, and file with the Chief Financial Officer the
1103 financial and other information necessary for the preparation of
1104 annual financial statements for the State of Florida as of June
1105 30. In addition, each such agency and the judicial branch shall
1106 prepare financial statements showing the financial position and
1107 results of agency or branch operations as of June 30 for
1108 internal management purposes.
1109 (a) Each state agency and the judicial branch shall record
1110 the receipt and disbursement of funds from federal sources in a
1111 form and format prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer. The
1112 access to federal funds by the administering agencies or the
1113 judicial branch may not be authorized until:
1114 1. The deposit has been recorded in the Financial
1115 Management Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem
1116 using proper, consistent codes that designate deposits as
1117 federal funds.
1118 2. The deposit and appropriate recording required by this
1119 paragraph have been verified by the office of the Chief
1120 Financial Officer.
1121 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall publish a statewide
1122 policy detailing the requirements for recording receipt and
1123 disbursement of federal funds into the Financial Management
1124 Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem and provide
1125 technical assistance to the agencies and the judicial branch to
Page 45 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1126 implement the policy.
1127 (2) Financial information must be contained within the
1128 Financial Management Florida Accounting Information Resource
1129 Subsystem. Other information must be submitted in the form and
1130 format prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer.
1131 (a) Each component unit shall file financial information
1132 and other information necessary for the preparation of annual
1133 financial statements with the agency or branch designated by the
1134 Chief Financial Officer by the date specified by the Chief
1135 Financial Officer.
1136 (b) The state agency or branch designated by the Chief
1137 Financial Officer to receive financial information and other
1138 information from component units shall include the financial
1139 information in the Financial Management Florida Accounting
1140 Information Resource Subsystem and shall include the component
1141 units' other information in its submission to the Chief
1142 Financial Officer.
1143 (3) The Chief Financial Officer shall:
1144 (f) Consult with and elicit comments from the Executive
1145 Office of the Governor on changes to the Financial Management
1146 Florida Accounting Information Resource Subsystem which clearly
1147 affect the accounting of federal funds, so as to ensure
1148 consistency of information entered into the Federal Aid Tracking
1149 System by state executive and judicial branch entities. While
1150 efforts shall be made to ensure the compatibility of the
Page 46 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1151 Financial Management Florida Accounting Information Resource
1152 Subsystem and the Federal Aid Tracking System, any successive
1153 systems serving identical or similar functions shall preserve
1154 such compatibility.
1155
1156 The Chief Financial Officer may furnish and publish in
1157 electronic form the financial statements and the annual
1158 comprehensive financial report required under paragraphs (a),
1159 (b), and (c).
1160 Section 15. Subsection (3) of section 216.141, Florida
1161 Statutes, is amended to read:
1162 216.141 Budget system procedures; planning and programming
1163 by state agencies.—
1164 (3) The Chief Financial Officer, as chief fiscal officer,
1165 shall use the Financial Management Florida Accounting
1166 Information Resource Subsystem developed pursuant to s.
1167 215.94(2) for account purposes in the performance of and
1168 accounting for all of his or her constitutional and statutory
1169 duties and responsibilities. However, state agencies and the
1170 judicial branch continue to be responsible for maintaining
1171 accounting records necessary for effective management of their
1172 programs and functions.
1173 Section 16. Paragraph (a) of subsection (7) and paragraph
1174 (j) of subsection (12) of section 440.13, Florida Statutes, are
1175 amended to read:
Page 47 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1176 440.13 Medical services and supplies; penalty for
1177 violations; limitations.—
1178 (7) UTILIZATION AND REIMBURSEMENT DISPUTES.—
1179 (a) Any health care provider who elects to contest the
1180 disallowance or adjustment of payment by a carrier under
1181 subsection (6) must, within 60 45 days after receipt of notice
1182 of disallowance or adjustment of payment, petition the
1183 department to resolve the dispute. The petitioner must serve, by
1184 the United States Postal Service certified mail or by common
1185 carrier with verifiable tracking methods, a copy of the petition
1186 on the carrier and on all affected parties listed on the notice
1187 of disallowance or adjustment by certified mail. The petition
1188 must be accompanied by all documents and records that support
1189 the allegations contained in the petition. Failure of a
1190 petitioner to submit such documentation to the department
1191 results in dismissal of the petition.
1192 (12) CREATION OF THREE-MEMBER PANEL; GUIDES OF MAXIMUM
1193 REIMBURSEMENT ALLOWANCES.—
1194 (j) In addition to establishing the uniform schedule of
1195 maximum reimbursement allowances, the panel shall:
1196 1. Take testimony, receive records, and collect data to
1197 evaluate the adequacy of the workers' compensation fee schedule,
1198 nationally recognized fee schedules and alternative methods of
1199 reimbursement to health care providers and health care
1200 facilities for inpatient and outpatient treatment and care.
Page 48 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1201 2. Survey health care providers and health care facilities
1202 to determine the availability and accessibility of workers'
1203 compensation health care delivery systems for injured workers.
1204 3. Survey carriers to determine the estimated impact on
1205 carrier costs and workers' compensation premium rates by
1206 implementing changes to the carrier reimbursement schedule or
1207 implementing alternative reimbursement methods.
1208 4. Submit recommendations on or before January 15, 2031
1209 2017, and every 5 years biennially thereafter, to the President
1210 of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on
1211 methods to improve the workers' compensation health care
1212 delivery system.
1213
1214 The department, as requested, shall provide data to the panel,
1215 including, but not limited to, utilization trends in the
1216 workers' compensation health care delivery system. The
1217 department shall provide the panel with an annual report
1218 regarding the resolution of medical reimbursement disputes and
1219 any actions pursuant to subsection (8). The department shall
1220 provide administrative support and service to the panel to the
1221 extent requested by the panel. The department may adopt rules
1222 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this
1223 subsection. For prescription medication purchased under the
1224 requirements of this subsection, a dispensing practitioner shall
1225 not possess such medication unless payment has been made by the
Page 49 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1226 practitioner, the practitioner's professional practice, or the
1227 practitioner's practice management company or employer to the
1228 supplying manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, or drug
1229 repackager within 60 days of the dispensing practitioner taking
1230 possession of that medication.
1231 Section 17. Section 497.1411, Florida Statutes, is created
1232 to read:
1233 497.1411 Disqualification of applicants and licenses;
1234 penalties against licensees; rulemaking.—
1235 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "applicant"
1236 means an individual applying for licensure or relicensure under
1237 this chapter, or an officer, director, majority owner, partner,
1238 manager, or other person who manages or controls an entity
1239 applying for licensure or relicensure under this chapter.
1240 (2) An applicant who has been found guilty of or has
1241 pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any of the following
1242 offenses, regardless of adjudication, is permanently barred from
1243 licensure under this chapter:
1244 (a) A felony of the first degree.
1245 (b) A felony involving conduct prohibited under chapter
1246 497, chapter 787, chapter 794, chapter 796, chapter 800, chapter
1247 825, chapter 827, or chapter 847.
1248 (c) A felony involving moral turpitude.
1249 (3) An applicant who has been found guilty of, or has
1250 entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense not
Page 50 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1251 subject to the permanent bar under subsection (2), regardless of
1252 adjudication, is subject to the following disqualifying periods:
1253 (a) A 10-year disqualifying period for any felony to which
1254 the permanent bar in subsection (2) does not apply.
1255 Notwithstanding subsection (4), an applicant who has completed
1256 at least one-half of the disqualifying period may apply for a
1257 probationary license for the remainder of the disqualifying
1258 period if, during that time, the applicant has not been found
1259 guilty of, or has not entered a plea of guilty or nolo
1260 contendere to, any offense.
1261 (b) A 5-year disqualifying period for all misdemeanors
1262 directly related to chapter 497.
1263 (4) The board shall adopt rules to administer this
1264 section. Such rules must provide additional disqualifying
1265 periods for applicants who have committed multiple criminal
1266 offenses and may provide additional factors for disqualification
1267 reasonably related to the applicant's criminal history. The
1268 rules must also establish mitigating and aggravating factors.
1269 However, mitigation may not reduce any disqualifying period to
1270 less than 5 years and may not be applied to reduce the 5-year
1271 disqualifying period provided in paragraph (3)(b).
1272 (5) For purposes of this section, a disqualifying period
1273 begins upon the applicant's final release from supervision or
1274 upon completion of the applicant's criminal sentence. The board
1275 may not approve issuance of a license to an applicant until the
Page 51 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1276 applicant provides proof that all related fines, court costs,
1277 fees, and court-ordered restitution have been paid.
1278 (6) After the disqualifying period has expired, the burden
1279 is on the applicant to demonstrate to the board that he or she
1280 has been rehabilitated, does not pose a risk to the public, is
1281 fit and trustworthy to engage in business regulated by this
1282 chapter, and is otherwise qualified for licensure.
1283 (7) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3), an applicant
1284 who has been found guilty of, or has pleaded guilty or nolo
1285 contendere to, a crime in subsection (2) or subsection (3), and
1286 who has subsequently been granted a pardon or the restoration of
1287 civil rights pursuant to chapter 940 and s. 8, Art. IV of the
1288 State Constitution, or a pardon or the restoration of civil
1289 rights under the laws of another jurisdiction with respect to a
1290 conviction in that jurisdiction, is not barred or disqualified
1291 from licensure under this chapter; however, such a pardon or
1292 restoration of civil rights does not require the board to award
1293 such license.
1294 (8)(a) The board may grant an exemption from
1295 disqualification to any person disqualified from licensure under
1296 subsection (3) if:
1297 1. The applicant has paid in full any fee, fine, fund,
1298 lien, civil judgment, restitution, or cost of prosecution
1299 imposed by the court as part of the judgment and sentence for
1300 any disqualifying offense; and
Page 52 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1301 2. At least 2 years have elapsed since the applicant
1302 completed or has been lawfully released from confinement,
1303 supervision, or any nonmonetary condition imposed by the court
1304 for a disqualifying offense.
1305 (b) For the board to grant an exemption under this
1306 subsection, the applicant must clearly and convincingly
1307 demonstrate that he or she would not pose a risk to persons or
1308 property if licensed under this chapter, evidence of which must
1309 include, but need not be limited to, facts and circumstances
1310 surrounding the disqualifying offense, the time that has elapsed
1311 since the offense, the nature of the offense and harm caused to
1312 the victim, the applicant's history before and after the
1313 offense, and any other evidence or circumstances indicating that
1314 the applicant will not present a danger if licensed or
1315 certified.
1316 (c) The board has discretion whether to grant or deny an
1317 exemption under this subsection. The board's decision is subject
1318 to chapter 120.
1319 (9) The disqualification periods provided in this section
1320 do not apply to the renewal of a license or to a new application
1321 for licensure if the applicant has an active license as of July
1322 1, 2026, and the applicable criminal history was considered by
1323 the board on the prior approval of any active license held by
1324 the applicant. This section does not affect any criminal history
1325 disclosure requirements of this chapter.
Page 53 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1326 Section 18. Subsection (9) and paragraph (c) of subsection
1327 (10) of section 497.142, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1328 497.142 Licensing; fingerprinting and criminal background
1329 checks.—
1330 (9) If any applicant under this chapter has been, within
1331 the 10 years preceding the application under this chapter,
1332 convicted or found guilty of, or entered a plea of nolo
1333 contendere to, regardless of adjudication, any crime in any
1334 jurisdiction, the application may shall not be deemed complete
1335 until such time as the applicant provides such certified true
1336 copies of the court records evidencing the conviction, finding,
1337 or plea, as required in this section or as the licensing
1338 authority may by rule require.
1339 (10)
1340 (c) Crimes to be disclosed are:
1341 1. Any felony or misdemeanor, no matter when committed,
1342 that was directly or indirectly related to or involving any
1343 aspect of the practice or business of funeral directing,
1344 embalming, direct disposition, cremation, funeral or cemetery
1345 preneed sales, funeral establishment operations, cemetery
1346 operations, or cemetery monument or marker sales or
1347 installation.
1348 2. Any misdemeanor, no matter when committed, that was
1349 directly related to the practice or activities regulated under
1350 this chapter Any other felony not already disclosed under
Page 54 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1351 subparagraph 1. that was committed within the 20 years
1352 immediately preceding the application under this chapter.
1353 3. Any other misdemeanor not already disclosed under
1354 subparagraph 2. which subparagraph 1. that was committed within
1355 the 5 years immediately preceding the application under this
1356 chapter.
1357 Section 19. Subsection (11) is added to section 553.80,
1358 Florida Statutes, to read:
1359 553.80 Enforcement.—
1360 (11) For purposes of the design, construction, erection,
1361 alteration, fire protection, fire suppression, modification,
1362 repair, and demolition of a single-family or two-family
1363 dwelling, such dwelling does not have a change of occupancy as
1364 defined in the Florida Building Code, solely due to the
1365 dwelling's use as or conversion into a dwelling used:
1366 (a) By a tax-exempt charitable organization under s.
1367 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code whose stated corporate
1368 purpose relates to the support of people who are living with a
1369 mental health disorder and has no fewer than two and no more
1370 than four bedrooms, is occupied by a group of or family of no
1371 more than six ambulatory adults living with a mental disorder,
1372 and has no more than two adults assigned to any bedroom; or
1373 (b) For residential migrant housing, as defined in s.
1374 381.008, that has a permit from the Department of Health
1375 pursuant to s. 381.0081.
Page 55 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1376 Section 20. Subsection (10) of section 560.309, Florida
1377 Statutes, is amended to read:
1378 560.309 Conduct of business.—
1379 (10) If a check is returned to a licensee from a payor
1380 financial institution due to lack of funds, a closed account, or
1381 a stop-payment order, the licensee may seek collection pursuant
1382 to s. 68.065. In seeking collection, the licensee must comply
1383 with the prohibitions against harassment or abuse, false or
1384 misleading representations, and unfair practices in the Consumer
1385 Collection Practices Act under part VI of chapter 559, including
1386 s. 559.77. The licensee must also comply with the Fair Debt
1387 Collections Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1692d, 1692e, and 1692f
1388 if the licensee uses a third party debt collector or any name
1389 other than its own to collect such debts. A violation of this
1390 subsection is a deceptive and unfair trade practice and
1391 constitutes a violation of the Deceptive and Unfair Trade
1392 Practices Act under part II of chapter 501. In addition, a
1393 licensee must comply with the applicable provisions of the
1394 Consumer Collection Practices Act under part VI of chapter 559,
1395 including s. 559.77.
1396 Section 21. Subsection (3) of section 560.405, Florida
1397 Statutes, is amended to read:
1398 560.405 Deposit; redemption.—
1399 (3) Notwithstanding subsection (1), in lieu of
1400 presentment, a deferred presentment provider may allow the check
Page 56 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1401 to be redeemed at any time upon payment of the outstanding
1402 transaction balance and earned fees. Redemption in cash or
1403 through a debit card transaction shall be treated the same.
1404 However, payment may not be made in the form of a personal check
1405 or through a credit card transaction. Upon redemption, the
1406 deferred presentment provider must return the drawer's check and
1407 provide a signed, dated receipt showing that the drawer's check
1408 has been redeemed.
1409 Section 22. Subsection (2) of section 560.406, Florida
1410 Statutes, is amended to read:
1411 560.406 Worthless checks.—
1412 (2) If a check is returned to a deferred presentment
1413 provider from a payor financial institution due to insufficient
1414 funds, a closed account, or a stop-payment order, the deferred
1415 presentment provider may pursue all legally available civil
1416 remedies to collect the check, including, but not limited to,
1417 the imposition of all charges imposed on the deferred
1418 presentment provider by the financial institution. In its
1419 collection practices, a deferred presentment provider must
1420 comply with the prohibitions against harassment or abuse, false
1421 or misleading representations, and unfair practices that are
1422 contained in the Consumer Collection Practices Act under part VI
1423 of chapter 559, including s. 559.77. A deferred presentment
1424 provider must also comply with the Fair Debt Collections
1425 Practices Act, 15 U.S.C. ss. 1692d, 1692e, and 1692f if the
Page 57 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1426 deferred present provider uses a third party debt collector or
1427 any name other than its own to collect such debts. A violation
1428 of this act is a deceptive and unfair trade practice and
1429 constitutes a violation of the Deceptive and Unfair Trade
1430 Practices Act under part II of chapter 501. In addition, a
1431 deferred presentment provider must comply with the applicable
1432 provisions of the Consumer Collection Practices Act under part
1433 VI of chapter 559, including s. 559.77.
1434 Section 23. Subsection (3) of section 626.0428, Florida
1435 Statutes, is amended to read:
1436 626.0428 Agency personnel powers, duties, and
1437 limitations.—
1438 (3) An employee or an authorized representative located at
1439 a designated branch of an agent or agency may not initiate
1440 contact with any person for the purpose of soliciting insurance
1441 unless licensed and appointed as an agent or customer
1442 representative. As to title insurance, an employee of an agent
1443 or agency may not initiate contact with any individual proposed
1444 insured for the purpose of soliciting title insurance unless
1445 licensed as a title insurance agent or exempt from such
1446 licensure pursuant to s. 626.8417(4) and (5).
1447 Section 24. Section 626.171, Florida Statutes, is amended
1448 to read:
1449 626.171 Application for license as an agent, customer
1450 representative, adjuster, or service representative, or
Page 58 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1451 reinsurance intermediary.—
1452 (1) The department may not issue a license as agent,
1453 customer representative, adjuster, or service representative, or
1454 reinsurance intermediary to any person except upon written
1455 application filed with the department, meeting the
1456 qualifications for the license applied for as determined by the
1457 department, and payment in advance of all applicable fees. The
1458 application must be made under the oath of the applicant and be
1459 signed by the applicant. An applicant may permit a third party
1460 to complete, submit, and sign an application on the applicant's
1461 behalf, but is responsible for ensuring that the information on
1462 the application is true and correct and is accountable for any
1463 misstatements or misrepresentations. The department shall accept
1464 the uniform application for resident and nonresident agent and
1465 adjuster licensing. The department may adopt revised versions of
1466 the uniform application by rule.
1467 (2) In the application, the applicant must include all of
1468 the following shall set forth:
1469 (a) The applicant's His or her full name, age, social
1470 security number, residence address, business address, mailing
1471 address, contact telephone numbers, including a business
1472 telephone number, and e-mail address.
1473 (b) A statement indicating the method the applicant used
1474 or is using to meet any required prelicensing education,
1475 knowledge, experience, or instructional requirements for the
Page 59 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1476 type of license applied for.
1477 (c) Whether the applicant he or she has been refused or
1478 has voluntarily surrendered or has had suspended or revoked a
1479 license to solicit insurance by the department or by the
1480 supervising officials of any state.
1481 (d) Whether any insurer or any managing general agent
1482 claims the applicant is indebted under any agency contract or
1483 otherwise and, if so, the name of the claimant, the nature of
1484 the claim, and the applicant's defense thereto, if any.
1485 (e) Proof that the applicant meets the requirements for
1486 the type of license for which he or she is applying.
1487 (f) The applicant's gender (male or female).
1488 (g) The applicant's native language.
1489 (h) The highest level of education achieved by the
1490 applicant.
1491 (i) The applicant's race or ethnicity (African American,
1492 white, American Indian, Asian, Hispanic, or other).
1493 (j) Such other or additional information as the department
1494 may deem proper to enable it to determine the character,
1495 experience, ability, and other qualifications of the applicant
1496 to hold himself or herself out to the public as an insurance
1497 representative.
1498
1499 However, the application must contain a statement that an
1500 applicant is not required to disclose his or her race or
Page 60 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1501 ethnicity, gender, or native language, that he or she will not
1502 be penalized for not doing so, and that the department will use
1503 this information exclusively for research and statistical
1504 purposes and to improve the quality and fairness of the
1505 examinations. The department may shall make provisions for
1506 applicants to voluntarily submit their cellular telephone
1507 numbers as part of the application process solely on a voluntary
1508 basis only for the purpose of two-factor authentication of
1509 secure login credentials only.
1510 (3) Each application must be accompanied by payment of any
1511 applicable fee.
1512 (4) An applicant for a license issued by the department
1513 under this chapter must submit a set of the individual
1514 applicant's fingerprints, or, if the applicant is not an
1515 individual, a set of the fingerprints of the sole proprietor,
1516 majority owner, partners, officers, and directors, to the
1517 department and must pay the fingerprint processing fee set forth
1518 in s. 624.501. Fingerprints must be processed in accordance with
1519 s. 624.34 and used to investigate the applicant's qualifications
1520 pursuant to s. 626.201. The fingerprints must be taken by a law
1521 enforcement agency or other department-approved entity. The
1522 department may not approve an application for licensure as an
1523 agent, customer service representative, adjuster, or service
1524 representative, or reinsurance intermediary if fingerprints have
1525 not been submitted.
Page 61 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1526 (5) The application for license filing fee prescribed in
1527 s. 624.501 is not subject to refund.
1528 (6) Members of the United States Armed Forces and their
1529 spouses, and veterans of the United States Armed Forces who have
1530 separated from service within 24 months before application for
1531 licensure, are exempt from the application filing fee prescribed
1532 in s. 624.501. Qualified individuals must provide a copy of a
1533 military identification card, military dependent identification
1534 card, military service record, military personnel file, veteran
1535 record, discharge paper or separation document that indicates
1536 such members are currently in good standing or such veterans
1537 were honorably discharged.
1538 (7) Pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and
1539 Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, each party is
1540 required to provide his or her social security number in
1541 accordance with this section. Disclosure of social security
1542 numbers obtained through this requirement must be limited to the
1543 purpose of administration of the Title IV-D program for child
1544 support enforcement.
1545 Section 25. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
1546 626.292, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1547 626.292 Transfer of license from another state.—
1548 (2) To qualify for a license transfer, an individual
1549 applicant must meet the following requirements:
1550 (c) The individual must submit a completed application for
Page 62 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1551 this state which is received by the department within 90 days
1552 after the date the individual became a resident of this state,
1553 along with payment of the applicable fees set forth in s.
1554 624.501 and submission of the following documents:
1555 1. A certification issued by the appropriate official of
1556 the applicant's home state identifying the type of license and
1557 lines of authority under the license and stating that, at the
1558 time the license from the home state was canceled, the applicant
1559 was in good standing in that state or that the state's Producer
1560 Database records, maintained by the National Association of
1561 Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates, or subsidiaries,
1562 indicate that the agent or all-lines adjuster is or was licensed
1563 in good standing for the line of authority requested. An
1564 applicant may hold a resident license in another state for 30
1565 days after the Florida resident license has been issued to
1566 facilitate the transfer of licensure between states.
1567 2. A set of the applicant's fingerprints in accordance
1568 with s. 626.171(4).
1569 Section 26. Subsection (1) of section 626.611, Florida
1570 Statutes, is amended to read:
1571 626.611 Grounds for compulsory refusal, suspension, or
1572 revocation of agent's, title agency's, adjuster's, customer
1573 representative's, service representative's, or managing general
1574 agent's license or appointment.—
1575 (1) The department shall require license reexamination,
Page 63 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1576 deny an application for, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew or
1577 continue the license or appointment of any applicant, agent,
1578 title agency, adjuster, customer representative, service
1579 representative, or managing general agent, and it shall suspend
1580 or revoke the eligibility to hold a license or appointment of
1581 any such person, if it finds that as to the applicant, licensee,
1582 or appointee any one or more of the following applicable grounds
1583 exist:
1584 (a) Lack of one or more of the qualifications for the
1585 license or appointment as specified in this code.
1586 (b) Material misstatement, misrepresentation, or fraud in
1587 obtaining the license or appointment or in attempting to obtain
1588 the license or appointment.
1589 (c) Failure to pass to the satisfaction of the department
1590 any examination required under this code, including cheating on
1591 an examination required for licensure or violating test center
1592 or examination procedures published orally, in writing, or
1593 electronically at the test site by authorized representatives of
1594 the examination program administrator.
1595 (d) If the license or appointment is willfully used, or to
1596 be used, to circumvent any of the requirements or prohibitions
1597 of this code.
1598 (e) Willful misrepresentation of any insurance policy or
1599 annuity contract or willful deception with regard to any such
1600 policy or contract, done either in person or by any form of
Page 64 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1601 dissemination of information or advertising.
1602 (f) If, as an adjuster, or agent licensed and appointed to
1603 adjust claims under this code, he or she has materially
1604 misrepresented to an insured or other interested party the terms
1605 and coverage of an insurance contract with intent and for the
1606 purpose of effecting settlement of claim for loss or damage or
1607 benefit under such contract on less favorable terms than those
1608 provided in and contemplated by the contract.
1609 (g) Demonstrated lack of fitness or trustworthiness to
1610 engage in the business of insurance.
1611 (h) Demonstrated lack of reasonably adequate knowledge and
1612 technical competence to engage in the transactions authorized by
1613 the license or appointment.
1614 (i) Fraudulent or dishonest practices in the conduct of
1615 business under the license or appointment.
1616 (j) Misappropriation, conversion, or unlawful withholding
1617 of moneys belonging to insurers or insureds or beneficiaries or
1618 to others and received in conduct of business under the license
1619 or appointment.
1620 (k) Unlawfully rebating, attempting to unlawfully rebate,
1621 or unlawfully dividing or offering to divide his or her
1622 commission with another.
1623 (l) Having obtained or attempted to obtain, or having used
1624 or using, a license or appointment as agent or customer
1625 representative for the purpose of soliciting or handling
Page 65 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1626 "controlled business" as defined in s. 626.730 with respect to
1627 general lines agents, s. 626.784 with respect to life agents,
1628 and s. 626.830 with respect to health agents.
1629 (m) Willful failure to comply with, or willful violation
1630 of, any proper order or rule of the department or willful
1631 violation of any provision of this code.
1632 (n) Having been found guilty of or having pleaded guilty
1633 or nolo contendere to a misdemeanor directly related to the
1634 financial services business, any felony, or any crime punishable
1635 by imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of the United
1636 States of America or of any state thereof or under the law of
1637 any other country, without regard to whether a judgment of
1638 conviction has been entered by the court having jurisdiction of
1639 such cases.
1640 (o) Fraudulent or dishonest practice in submitting or
1641 aiding or abetting any person in the submission of an
1642 application for workers' compensation coverage under chapter 440
1643 containing false or misleading information as to employee
1644 payroll or classification for the purpose of avoiding or
1645 reducing the amount of premium due for such coverage.
1646 (p) Sale of an unregistered security that was required to
1647 be registered, pursuant to chapter 517.
1648 (q) In transactions related to viatical settlement
1649 contracts as defined in s. 626.9911:
1650 1. Commission of a fraudulent or dishonest act.
Page 66 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1651 2. No longer meeting the requirements for initial
1652 licensure.
1653 3. Having received a fee, commission, or other valuable
1654 consideration for his or her services with respect to viatical
1655 settlements that involved unlicensed viatical settlement
1656 providers or persons who offered or attempted to negotiate on
1657 behalf of another person a viatical settlement contract as
1658 defined in s. 626.9911 and who were not licensed life agents.
1659 4. Dealing in bad faith with viators.
1660 Section 27. Section 626.621, Florida Statutes, is amended
1661 to read:
1662 626.621 Grounds for discretionary refusal, suspension, or
1663 revocation of agent's, adjuster's, customer representative's,
1664 service representative's, or managing general agent's license or
1665 appointment.—The department may, in its discretion, require a
1666 license reexamination, deny an application for, suspend, revoke,
1667 or refuse to renew or continue the license or appointment of any
1668 applicant, agent, adjuster, customer representative, service
1669 representative, or managing general agent, and it may suspend or
1670 revoke the eligibility to hold a license or appointment of any
1671 such person, if it finds that as to the applicant, licensee, or
1672 appointee any one or more of the following applicable grounds
1673 exist under circumstances for which such denial, suspension,
1674 revocation, or refusal is not mandatory under s. 626.611:
1675 (1) Any cause for which issuance of the license or
Page 67 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1676 appointment could have been refused had it then existed and been
1677 known to the department.
1678 (2) Violation of any provision of this code or of any
1679 other law applicable to the business of insurance in the course
1680 of dealing under the license or appointment.
1681 (3) Violation of any lawful order or rule of the
1682 department, commission, or office.
1683 (4) Failure or refusal, upon demand, to pay over to any
1684 insurer he or she represents or has represented any money coming
1685 into his or her hands belonging to the insurer.
1686 (5) Violation of the provision against twisting, as
1687 defined in s. 626.9541(1)(l).
1688 (6) In the conduct of business under the license or
1689 appointment, engaging in unfair methods of competition or in
1690 unfair or deceptive acts or practices, as prohibited under part
1691 IX of this chapter, or having otherwise shown himself or herself
1692 to be a source of injury or loss to the public.
1693 (7) Willful overinsurance of any property or health
1694 insurance risk.
1695 (8) If a life agent, violation of the code of ethics.
1696 (9) Cheating on an examination required for licensure or
1697 violating test center or examination procedures published
1698 orally, in writing, or electronically at the test site by
1699 authorized representatives of the examination program
1700 administrator. Communication of test center and examination
Page 68 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1701 procedures must be clearly established and documented.
1702 (10) Failure to inform the department in writing within 30
1703 days after pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, or being
1704 convicted or found guilty of, any felony or a crime punishable
1705 by imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of the United
1706 States or of any state thereof, or under the law of any other
1707 country without regard to whether a judgment of conviction has
1708 been entered by the court having jurisdiction of the case.
1709 (11) Knowingly aiding, assisting, procuring, advising, or
1710 abetting any person in the violation of or to violate a
1711 provision of the insurance code or any order or rule of the
1712 department, commission, or office.
1713 (12) Has been the subject of or has had a license, permit,
1714 appointment, registration, or other authority to conduct
1715 business subject to any decision, finding, injunction,
1716 suspension, prohibition, revocation, denial, judgment, final
1717 agency action, or administrative order by any court of competent
1718 jurisdiction, administrative law proceeding, state agency,
1719 federal agency, national securities, commodities, or option
1720 exchange, or national securities, commodities, or option
1721 association involving a violation of any federal or state
1722 securities or commodities law or any rule or regulation adopted
1723 thereunder, or a violation of any rule or regulation of any
1724 national securities, commodities, or options exchange or
1725 national securities, commodities, or options association.
Page 69 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1726 (13) Failure to comply with any civil, criminal, or
1727 administrative action taken by the child support enforcement
1728 program under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
1729 ss. 651 et seq., to determine paternity or to establish, modify,
1730 enforce, or collect support.
1731 (14) Directly or indirectly accepting any compensation,
1732 inducement, or reward from an inspector for the referral of the
1733 owner of the inspected property to the inspector or inspection
1734 company. This prohibition applies to an inspection intended for
1735 submission to an insurer in order to obtain property insurance
1736 coverage or establish the applicable property insurance premium.
1737 (15) Denial, suspension, or revocation of, or any other
1738 adverse administrative action against, a license to practice or
1739 conduct any regulated profession, business, or vocation by this
1740 state, any other state, any nation, any possession or district
1741 of the United States, any court, or any lawful agency thereof.
1742 (16) Taking an action that allows the personal financial
1743 or medical information of a consumer or customer to be made
1744 available or accessible to the general public, regardless of the
1745 format in which the record is stored.
1746 (17) Initiating in-person or telephone solicitation after
1747 9 p.m. or before 8 a.m. local time of the prospective customer
1748 unless requested by the prospective customer.
1749 (18) Cancellation of the applicant's, licensee's, or
1750 appointee's resident license in a state other than Florida.
Page 70 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1751 Section 28. Subsection (1) of section 626.731, Florida
1752 Statutes, is amended to read:
1753 626.731 Qualifications for general lines agent's license.—
1754 (1) The department may shall not grant or issue a license
1755 as general lines agent to any individual found by it to be
1756 untrustworthy or incompetent or who does not meet each all of
1757 the following qualifications:
1758 (a) The applicant is a natural person at least 18 years of
1759 age.
1760 (b) The applicant is a United States citizen or legal
1761 alien who possesses work authorization from the United States
1762 Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services and is a bona
1763 fide resident of this state. An individual who is a bona fide
1764 resident of this state shall be deemed to meet the residence
1765 requirement of this paragraph, notwithstanding the existence at
1766 the time of application for license of a license in his or her
1767 name on the records of another state as a resident licensee of
1768 such other state, if the applicant furnishes a letter of
1769 clearance satisfactory to the department that the resident
1770 licenses have been canceled or changed to a nonresident basis
1771 and that he or she is in good standing.
1772 (c) The applicant's place of business will be located in
1773 this state and he or she will be actively engaged in the
1774 business of insurance and will maintain a place of business, the
1775 location of which is identifiable by and accessible to the
Page 71 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1776 public.
1777 (d) The license is not being sought for the purpose of
1778 writing or handling controlled business, in violation of s.
1779 626.730.
1780 (e) The applicant is qualified as to knowledge,
1781 experience, or instruction in the business of insurance and
1782 meets the requirements provided in s. 626.732.
1783 (f) The applicant has passed any required examination for
1784 license required under s. 626.221.
1785 Section 29. Subsection (2) of section 626.785, Florida
1786 Statutes, is amended to read:
1787 626.785 Qualifications for license.—
1788 (2) An individual who is a bona fide resident of this
1789 state shall be deemed to meet the residence requirement of
1790 paragraph (1)(b), notwithstanding the existence at the time of
1791 application for license of a license in his or her name on the
1792 records of another state as a resident licensee of such other
1793 state, if the applicant furnishes a letter of clearance
1794 satisfactory to the department that the resident licenses have
1795 been canceled or changed to a nonresident basis and that he or
1796 she is in good standing.
1797 Section 30. Section 626.831, Florida Statutes, is amended
1798 to read:
1799 626.831 Qualifications for license.—
1800 (1) The department may shall not grant or issue a license
Page 72 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1801 as health agent as to any individual found by it to be
1802 untrustworthy or incompetent, or who does not meet all of the
1803 following qualifications:
1804 (1)(a) Is Must be a natural person of at least 18 years of
1805 age.
1806 (2)(b) Is Must be a United States citizen or legal alien
1807 who possesses work authorization from the United States Bureau
1808 of Citizenship and Immigration Services and is a bona fide
1809 resident of this state.
1810 (3)(c) Is Must not be an employee of the United States
1811 Department of Veterans Affairs or state service office, as
1812 referred to in s. 626.833.
1813 (4)(d) Has taken Must take and passed pass any examination
1814 for license required under s. 626.221.
1815 (5)(e) Is Must be qualified as to knowledge, experience,
1816 or instruction in the business of insurance and meets meet the
1817 requirements relative thereto provided in s. 626.8311.
1818 (2) An individual who is a bona fide resident of this
1819 state shall be deemed to meet the residence requirement of
1820 paragraph (1)(b), notwithstanding the existence at the time of
1821 application for license of a license in his or her name on the
1822 records of another state as a resident licensee of such other
1823 state, if the applicant furnishes a letter of clearance
1824 satisfactory to the department that the resident licenses have
1825 been canceled or changed to a nonresident basis and that he or
Page 73 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1826 she is in good standing.
1827 Section 31. Subsection (5) of section 626.8417, Florida
1828 Statutes, is amended to read:
1829 626.8417 Title insurance agent licensure; exemptions.—
1830 (5) An insurer may designate a corporate officer of the
1831 insurer to occasionally issue and countersign binders,
1832 commitments, and policies of title insurance. The designated
1833 officer is exempt from the provisions of this chapter relating
1834 to title insurance licensing and appointment requirements while
1835 the officer is acting within the scope of the designation.
1836 Section 32. Subsection (24) is added to section 626.854,
1837 Florida Statutes, to read:
1838 626.854 "Public adjuster" defined; prohibitions.—The
1839 Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the
1840 public to regulate public insurance adjusters and to prevent the
1841 unauthorized practice of law.
1842 (24) A public adjuster, public adjuster apprentice, or
1843 public adjusting firm must respond with specific information to
1844 a written or electronic request for claims status from a
1845 claimant or insured or their designated representative within 14
1846 days after the date of the request and shall document in the
1847 file the response or information provided.
1848 Section 33. Section 627.797, Florida Statutes, is
1849 repealed.
1850 Section 34. Subsection (11) of section 633.208, Florida
Page 74 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1851 Statutes, is amended to read:
1852 633.208 Minimum firesafety standards.—
1853 (11) Notwithstanding subsection (8), a single-family or
1854 two-family dwelling may not be reclassified for purposes of
1855 enforcing the Florida Fire Prevention Code solely due to such
1856 dwelling's use as or conversion into:
1857 (a) that is A certified recovery residence, as defined in
1858 s. 397.311, or that is a recovery residence, as defined in s.
1859 397.311, that has a charter from an entity recognized or
1860 sanctioned by Congress;
1861 (b) A residence owned by a tax-exempt charitable
1862 organization under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
1863 whose stated corporate purpose relates to the support of people
1864 who are living with a mental health disorder, which has no fewer
1865 than two and no more than four bedrooms, is occupied by a group
1866 or family of no more than six ambulatory adults living with a
1867 mental health disorder, and has no more than two adults assigned
1868 to any bedroom; or
1869 (c) Residential migrant housing, as defined in s. 381.008,
1870 that has a permit from the Department of Health pursuant to s.
1871 381.0081 may not be reclassified for purposes of enforcing the
1872 Florida Fire Prevention Code solely due to such use.
1873 Section 35. Subsection (4) of section 648.34, Florida
1874 Statutes, is amended to read:
1875 648.34 Bail bond agents; qualifications.—
Page 75 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1876 (4) The applicant shall furnish, with his or her
1877 application, a complete set of his or her fingerprints in
1878 accordance with s. 626.171(4) and a recent credential-sized,
1879 fullface photograph of the applicant. The department may shall
1880 not authorize an applicant to take the required examination
1881 until the department has received a report from the Department
1882 of Law Enforcement and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
1883 relative to the existence or nonexistence of a criminal history
1884 report based on the applicant's fingerprints.
1885 Section 36. Subsection (2) of section 648.382, Florida
1886 Statutes, is amended to read:
1887 648.382 Appointment of bail bond agents and bail bond
1888 agencies; effective date of appointment.—
1889 (2) Before any appointment, an appropriate officer or
1890 official of the appointing insurer must obtain all of the
1891 following information submit:
1892 (a) A certified statement or affidavit to the department
1893 stating what investigation has been made concerning the proposed
1894 appointee and the proposed appointee's background and the
1895 appointing person's opinion to the best of his or her knowledge
1896 and belief as to the moral character and reputation of the
1897 proposed appointee. In lieu of such certified statement or
1898 affidavit, by authorizing the effectuation of an appointment for
1899 a licensee, the appointing entity certifies to the department
1900 that such investigation has been made and that the results of
Page 76 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1901 the investigation and the appointing person's opinion is that
1902 the proposed appointee is a person of good moral character and
1903 reputation and is fit to engage in the bail bond business.;
1904 (b) An affidavit under oath on a form prescribed by the
1905 department, signed by the proposed appointee, stating that
1906 premiums are not owed to any insurer and that the appointee will
1907 discharge all outstanding forfeitures and judgments on bonds
1908 previously written. If the appointee does not satisfy or
1909 discharge such forfeitures or judgments, the former insurer
1910 shall file a notice, with supporting documents, with the
1911 appointing insurer, the former agent or agency, and the
1912 department, stating under oath that the licensee has failed to
1913 timely satisfy forfeitures and judgments on bonds written and
1914 that the insurer has satisfied the forfeiture or judgment from
1915 its own funds. Upon receipt of such notification and supporting
1916 documents, the appointing insurer shall immediately cancel the
1917 licensee's appointment. The licensee may be reappointed only
1918 upon certification by the former insurer that all forfeitures
1919 and judgments on bonds written by the licensee have been
1920 discharged. The appointing insurer or former agent or agency
1921 may, within 10 days, file a petition with the department seeking
1922 relief from this paragraph. Filing of the petition stays the
1923 duty of the appointing insurer to cancel the appointment until
1924 the department grants or denies the petition.;
1925 (c) Any other information that the department reasonably
Page 77 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1926 requires concerning the proposed appointee.; and
1927 (d) Effective January 1, 2025, a certification that the
1928 appointing entity obtained from each appointee the following
1929 sworn statement:
1930
1931 Pursuant to section 648.382(2)(b), Florida Statutes, I
1932 do solemnly swear that I owe no premium to any insurer
1933 or agency and that I will discharge all outstanding
1934 forfeitures and judgments on bonds that have been
1935 previously written. I acknowledge that failure to do
1936 this will result in my active appointments being
1937 canceled.
1938
1939 An appointed bail bond agency must have the attestation under
1940 this paragraph signed by its owner.
1941 Section 37. Section 717.001, Florida Statutes, is amended
1942 to read:
1943 717.001 Short title.—This chapter may be cited as the
1944 "Florida Disposition of Abandoned Personal Unclaimed Property
1945 Act."
1946 Section 38. Section 717.101, Florida Statutes, is amended
1947 to read:
1948 717.101 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, unless the
1949 context otherwise requires:
1950 (1) "Abandoned property" means property held by a holder
Page 78 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1951 for which all of the following are true:
1952 (a) The apparent owner has shown no activity or indication
1953 of interest for the duration of the applicable dormancy period
1954 established under this chapter.
1955 (b) The holder has complied with the due diligence
1956 requirements set forth in this chapter, including the issuance
1957 of notice to the apparent owner, and has received no response or
1958 contact sufficient to demonstrate continued interest in the
1959 property.
1960
1961 For purposes of this chapter, property is presumed abandoned
1962 upon expiration of the applicable dormancy period established
1963 under this chapter. Once the dormancy period has expired, the
1964 holder must comply with the due diligence requirements set forth
1965 in s. 717.117. If the holder receives no response or contact
1966 sufficient to demonstrate continued interest in the property
1967 after completion of its due diligence efforts, the property is
1968 deemed abandoned and subject to reporting and remittance to the
1969 department for custodial holding on behalf of the owner.
1970 (2) "Abandoned Property Purchase Agreement" means the form
1971 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must be
1972 used, without modification or amendment, by a claimant
1973 representative to purchase abandoned property from an owner.
1974 (3) "Abandoned Property Recovery Agreement" means the form
1975 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must be
Page 79 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
1976 used, without modification or amendment, by a claimant
1977 representative to obtain consent and authority to recover
1978 abandoned property on behalf of a person.
1979 (4)(1) "Aggregate" means the amounts reported for owners
1980 of abandoned unclaimed property of less than $10 or where there
1981 is no name for the individual or entity listed on the holder's
1982 records, regardless of the amount to be reported.
1983 (5)(2) "Apparent owner" means the person whose name
1984 appears on the records of the holder as the owner of the
1985 abandoned property, but whose status as the true owner entitled
1986 to receive the property may be subject to change due to the
1987 passage of time or changes in circumstances person entitled to
1988 property held, issued, or owing by the holder.
1989 (6) "Asset purchaser" means a business association that
1990 has purchased property from a large business association as
1991 defined in s. 717.1356(6).
1992 (7)(3) "Audit" means an action or proceeding to examine
1993 and verify a person's records, books, accounts, and other
1994 documents to ascertain and determine compliance with this
1995 chapter.
1996 (8)(4) "Audit agent" means a person with whom the
1997 department enters into a contract to conduct an audit or
1998 examination. The term includes an independent contractor of the
1999 person and each individual participating in the audit on behalf
2000 of the person or contractor.
Page 80 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2001 (9) "Authorized representative" means a person or entity
2002 legally empowered to act on behalf of the apparent owner or his
2003 or estate, including, but not limited to, an agent, a fiduciary,
2004 a personal representative, a trustee, a legal heir, a guardian,
2005 or any other individual or entity authorized by law or
2006 agreement.
2007 (10)(5) "Banking or financial organization" means any and
2008 all banks, trust companies, private bankers, savings banks,
2009 industrial banks, safe-deposit companies, savings and loan
2010 associations, credit unions, savings associations, banking
2011 organizations, international bank agencies, cooperative banks,
2012 building and loan associations, and investment companies in this
2013 state, organized under or subject to the laws of this state or
2014 of the United States, including entities organized under 12
2015 U.S.C. s. 611, but does not include federal reserve banks. The
2016 term also includes any corporation, business association, or
2017 other organization that:
2018 (a) Is a wholly or partially owned subsidiary of any
2019 banking, banking corporation, or bank holding company that
2020 performs any or all of the functions of a banking organization;
2021 or
2022 (b) Performs functions pursuant to the terms of a contract
2023 with any banking organization.
2024 (11)(6) "Business association" means any for-profit or
2025 nonprofit corporation other than a public corporation; joint
Page 81 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2026 stock company; investment company; unincorporated association or
2027 association of two or more individuals for business purposes,
2028 whether or not for profit; partnership; joint venture; limited
2029 liability company; sole proprietorship; business trust; trust
2030 company; land bank; safe-deposit company; safekeeping
2031 depository; banking or financial organization; insurance
2032 company; federally chartered entity; utility company; transfer
2033 agent; or other business entity, whether or not for profit.
2034 (12)(7) "Claimant" means the person on whose behalf a
2035 claim is filed.
2036 (13)(8) "Claimant Claimant's representative" means an
2037 attorney who is a member in good standing with of The Florida
2038 Bar, a certified public accountant licensed in this state, or a
2039 private investigator who is duly licensed to do business in this
2040 the state, who is registered with the department, and authorized
2041 to file claims on behalf of persons with the department by the
2042 claimant to claim unclaimed property on the claimant's behalf.
2043 The term does not include a person acting in a representative or
2044 fiduciary capacity, such as a personal representative, guardian,
2045 trustee, or attorney, whose representation is not contingent
2046 upon the discovery or location of abandoned unclaimed property,
2047 and it expressly excludes locators, who engage in locating
2048 owners of abandoned property for a fee but are not registered
2049 with the department; provided, however, that any agreement
2050 entered into for the purpose of evading s. 717.135 is invalid
Page 82 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2051 and unenforceable.
2052 (9) "Credit balance" means an account balance in the
2053 customer's favor.
2054 (14)(10) "Department" means the Department of Financial
2055 Services.
2056 (15)(11) "Domicile" means the state of incorporation for a
2057 corporation; the state of filing for a business association,
2058 other than a corporation, whose formation or organization
2059 requires a filing with a state; the state of organization for a
2060 business association, other than a corporation, whose formation
2061 or organization does not require a filing with a state; or the
2062 state of home office for a federally charted entity.
2063 (16)(12) "Due diligence" means the use of reasonable and
2064 prudent methods under particular circumstances to locate
2065 apparent owners of presumed abandoned property inactive accounts
2066 using the taxpayer identification number or social security
2067 number, if known, which may include, but are not limited to,
2068 using a nationwide database, cross-indexing with other records
2069 of the holder, mailing to the last known address unless the last
2070 known address is known to be inaccurate, providing written
2071 notice as described in this chapter by electronic mail if an
2072 apparent owner has elected such delivery, or engaging a licensed
2073 agency or company capable of conducting such search and
2074 providing updated addresses.
2075 (17)(13) "Electronic" means relating to technology having
Page 83 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2076 electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
2077 electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.
2078 (14) "Financial organization" means a savings association,
2079 savings and loan association, savings bank, industrial bank,
2080 bank, banking organization, trust company, international bank
2081 agency, cooperative bank, building and loan association, or
2082 credit union.
2083 (18)(15) "Health care provider" means any state-licensed
2084 entity that provides and receives payment for health care
2085 services. These entities include, but are not limited to,
2086 hospitals, outpatient centers, physician practices, and skilled
2087 nursing facilities.
2088 (19)(16) "Holder" means a person who is in possession of
2089 property belonging to another or who owes a debt or an
2090 obligation to another person, including, but not limited to,
2091 financial institutions, insurance companies, corporations,
2092 partnerships, fiduciaries, and government agencies:
2093 (a) A person who is in possession or control or has
2094 custody of property or the rights to property belonging to
2095 another; is indebted to another on an obligation; or is
2096 obligated to hold for the account of, or to deliver or pay to,
2097 the owner, property subject to this chapter; or
2098 (b) A trustee in case of a trust.
2099 (20)(17) "Insurance company" means an association,
2100 corporation, or fraternal or mutual benefit organization,
Page 84 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2101 whether for profit or not for profit, which is engaged in
2102 providing insurance coverage.
2103 (21)(18) "Intangible property" includes, by way of
2104 illustration and not limitation:
2105 (a) Moneys, checks, virtual currency, drafts, deposits,
2106 interest, dividends, and income.
2107 (b) Credit balances, customer overpayments, security
2108 deposits and other instruments as defined by chapter 679,
2109 refunds, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets, and unidentified
2110 remittances.
2111 (c) Stocks, and other intangible ownership interests in
2112 business associations except for:
2113 1. A nonfreely transferable security; or
2114 2. A security that is subject to a lien, legal hold, or
2115 restriction evidenced on the records of the holder or imposed by
2116 operation of law, if the lien, legal hold, or restriction
2117 restricts the holder's or owner's ability to receive, transfer,
2118 sell, or otherwise negotiate the security.
2119 (d) Moneys deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, bearer
2120 bonds, original issue discount bonds, coupons, and other
2121 securities, or to make distributions.
2122 (e) Amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance
2123 policies.
2124 (f) Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund
2125 established under a plan to provide any health, welfare,
Page 85 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2126 pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase,
2127 profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment
2128 insurance, or similar benefit.
2129 (22)(19) "Last known address" means a description of the
2130 location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the
2131 delivery of mail. For the purposes of identifying, reporting,
2132 and remitting property to the department which is presumed to be
2133 unclaimed, the term "last known address" includes any partial
2134 description of the location of the apparent owner sufficient to
2135 establish the apparent owner was a resident of this state at the
2136 time of last contact with the apparent owner or at the time the
2137 property became due and payable.
2138 (23)(20) "Lawful charges" means charges against the
2139 property or the account in which the property is held dormant
2140 accounts that are authorized by statute for the purpose of
2141 offsetting the costs of maintaining the property or the account
2142 in which the property is held dormant account.
2143 (24) "Locator" means a private individual or business that
2144 locates owners of abandoned property in exchange for a fee,
2145 typically a percentage of the recovered property. Locators are
2146 not employees or agents of the state and are not registered with
2147 the department.
2148 (25)(21) "Managed care payor" means a health care plan
2149 that has a defined system of selecting and limiting health care
2150 providers as evidenced by a managed care contract with the
Page 86 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2151 health care providers. These plans include, but are not limited
2152 to, managed care health insurance companies and health
2153 maintenance organizations.
2154 (26) "Nonfreely transferable security" means a security
2155 that cannot be delivered to the administrator by the Depository
2156 Trust Clearing Corporation or similar custodian of securities
2157 providing post-trade clearing and settlement services to
2158 financial markets or cannot be delivered because there is no
2159 agent to effect transfer. The term includes a worthless
2160 security.
2161 (27)(22) "Owner" means the a person, or the person's legal
2162 representative, entitled to receive or having a legal or
2163 equitable interest in the abandoned property. An owner
2164 establishes his or her entitlement by filing a valid claim with
2165 the department pursuant or claim against property subject to
2166 this chapter; a depositor in the case of a deposit; a
2167 beneficiary in the case of a trust or a deposit in trust; or a
2168 payee in the case of a negotiable instrument or other intangible
2169 property.
2170 (28)(23) "Person" means an individual; estate; business
2171 association; corporation; firm; association; joint adventure;
2172 partnership; government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
2173 instrumentality; or any other legal or commercial entity.
2174 (29)(24) "Public corporation" means a corporation created
2175 by the state, founded and owned in the public interest,
Page 87 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2176 supported by public funds, and governed by those deriving their
2177 power from the state.
2178 (30)(25) "Record" means information that is captured or
2179 maintained in any format, including written, printed,
2180 electronic, audio, visual, or other forms, and that can be made
2181 perceptible or understandable to a person, either directly or
2182 through technological means, including assistive technologies
2183 inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an
2184 electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable
2185 form.
2186 (31)(27) "State," when applied to a part of the United
2187 States, includes any state, district, commonwealth, territory,
2188 insular possession, and any other area subject to the
2189 legislative authority of the United States.
2190 (32)(28) "Trust instrument" means a trust instrument as
2191 defined in s. 736.0103.
2192 (29) "Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement" means the
2193 form adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must
2194 be used, without modification or amendment, by a claimant's
2195 representative to purchase unclaimed property from an owner.
2196 (30) "Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement" means the
2197 form adopted by the department pursuant to s. 717.135 which must
2198 be used, without modification or amendment, by a claimant's
2199 representative to obtain an owner's consent and authority to
2200 recover unclaimed property on the owner's behalf.
Page 88 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2201 (33)(31) "United States" means any state, district,
2202 commonwealth, territory, insular possession, and any other area
2203 subject to the legislative authority of the United States of
2204 America.
2205 (34)(32) "Utility" means a person who owns or operates,
2206 for public use, any plant, equipment, property, franchise, or
2207 license for the transmission of communications or the
2208 production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery, or furnishing
2209 of electricity, water, steam, or gas.
2210 (35)(33)(a) "Virtual currency" means digital units of
2211 exchange that:
2212 1. Have a centralized repository or administrator;
2213 2. Are decentralized and have no centralized repository or
2214 administrator; or
2215 3. May be created or obtained by computing or
2216 manufacturing effort.
2217 (b) The term does not include any of the following:
2218 1. Digital units that:
2219 a. Are used solely within online gaming platforms;
2220 b. Have no market or application outside of the online
2221 gaming platforms in sub-subparagraph a.;
2222 c. Cannot be converted into, or redeemed for, fiat
2223 currency or virtual currency; and
2224 d. Can or cannot be redeemed for real-world goods,
2225 services, discounts, or purchases.
Page 89 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2226 2. Digital units that can be redeemed for:
2227 a. Real-world goods, services, discounts, or purchases as
2228 part of a customer affinity or rewards program with the issuer
2229 or other designated merchants; or
2230 b. Digital units in another customer affinity or rewards
2231 program, but cannot be converted into, or redeemed for, fiat
2232 currency or virtual currency.
2233 3. Digital units used as part of prepaid cards.
2234 Section 39. Section 717.102, Florida Statutes, is amended
2235 to read:
2236 717.102 Property presumed abandoned unclaimed; general
2237 rule.—
2238 (1) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, all
2239 intangible property, including any income or increment thereon
2240 less any lawful charges, that is held, issued, or owing in the
2241 ordinary course of the holder's business and for which the
2242 apparent owner or authorized representative fails to demonstrate
2243 continued interest for more than the applicable dormancy period
2244 prescribed by this chapter shall be presumed abandoned claim
2245 such property for more than 5 years after the property becomes
2246 payable or distributable is presumed unclaimed, except as
2247 otherwise provided by this chapter. Unless otherwise specified
2248 by law, the dormancy period shall be 5 years from the date the
2249 property becomes payable or distributable. For the purposes of
2250 this chapter, property shall be considered payable or
Page 90 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2251 distributable once the holder's obligation to pay or deliver the
2252 property arises, regardless of whether the apparent owner or
2253 authorized representative has failed to demand or to present
2254 documents required to receive payment.
2255 (2) Property is payable or distributable for the purpose
2256 of this chapter notwithstanding the owner's failure to make
2257 demand or to present any instrument or document required to
2258 receive payment.
2259 (3) A presumption that property is abandoned may be
2260 unclaimed is rebutted by the affirmative demonstration of
2261 continued interest by the apparent owner or authorized
2262 representative an apparent owner's expression of interest in the
2263 property. Such demonstration An owner's expression of continued
2264 interest in property includes, but is not limited to, any of the
2265 following:
2266 (a) A record communicated by the apparent owner or
2267 authorized representative to the holder or its agent of the
2268 holder concerning the property or the account in which the
2269 property is held.;
2270 (b) An oral communication by the apparent owner or
2271 authorized representative to the holder or its agent of the
2272 holder concerning the property or the account in which the
2273 property is held, if the holder or its agent contemporaneously
2274 records makes and preserves evidence a record of the fact of the
2275 apparent owner's communication.;
Page 91 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2276 (c) Presentment of a check or other instrument for of
2277 payment of a dividends dividend, interest payment, or other
2278 distributions related to the property. distribution, with
2279 respect to an account, underlying security, or interest in a
2280 business association;
2281 (d) Any account activity initiated directed by an apparent
2282 owner or authorized representative in the account in which the
2283 property is held, including accessing the account or directing
2284 changes to information concerning the account, or to the amount
2285 or type of property held, excluding routine automatic
2286 transactions previously authorized, a direction by the apparent
2287 owner to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or
2288 type of property held in the account.;
2289 (e) Any A deposit into or withdrawal from the property or
2290 the an account in which the property is held at a financial
2291 organization, excluding an automatic deposits, withdrawals, or
2292 reinvestments deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the
2293 apparent owner or authorized representative. an automatic
2294 reinvestment of dividends or interest, which does not constitute
2295 an expression of interest; or
2296 (f) Any other action by the apparent owner or authorized
2297 representative which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that
2298 the apparent owner or authorized representative is aware of and
2299 maintains an interest in knows that the property exists.
2300 (3)(4) If a holder learns or receives confirmation of an
Page 92 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2301 apparent owner's death, the property shall be presumed abandoned
2302 unclaimed 2 years after the date of death, unless an authorized
2303 representative makes an affirmative demonstration a fiduciary
2304 appointed to represent the estate of the apparent owner has made
2305 an expression of interest in the property before the expiration
2306 of the 2-year period. This subsection may not be construed to
2307 extend the otherwise applicable dormancy period prescribed by
2308 this chapter.
2309 Section 40. Section 717.103, Florida Statutes, is amended
2310 to read:
2311 717.103 General rules for taking custody of intangible
2312 abandoned unclaimed property.—Unless otherwise provided in this
2313 chapter or by other statute of this state, intangible property
2314 is subject to the custody of the department as abandoned
2315 unclaimed property when if the conditions leading to a
2316 presumption that the property is abandoned unclaimed as
2317 described in ss. 717.102 and 717.105-717.116 are satisfied and
2318 the holder has fulfilled all required due diligence obligations
2319 without receiving any response or claim from the apparent owner,
2320 and one or more of the following criteria apply:
2321 (1) The last known address, as shown on the records of the
2322 holder, of the apparent owner is in this state.;
2323 (2) The records of the holder do not identify the name of
2324 the apparent owner, but do reflect the identity of the person
2325 entitled to the property, and it is established that the last
Page 93 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2326 known address of the apparent owner person entitled to the
2327 property is in this state.;
2328 (3) The records of the holder do not reflect the last
2329 known address of the apparent owner, but and it is established
2330 that either of the following conditions apply:
2331 (a) The last known address of the apparent owner person
2332 entitled to the property is in this state.; or
2333 (b) The holder is domiciled in this state, a domiciliary
2334 or is a government entity or governmental subdivision or agency
2335 of this state, and has not previously paid the property to the
2336 state of the last known address of the apparent owner. or other
2337 person entitled to the property;
2338 (4) The last known address, as shown on the records of the
2339 holder, of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the
2340 property is in a jurisdiction state that does not have
2341 applicable provide by law for the escheat, abandoned, or
2342 unclaimed property laws custodial taking of the property, or its
2343 escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the
2344 property, and the holder is domiciled in this state a
2345 domiciliary or is a government entity or governmental
2346 subdivision or agency of this state.;
2347 (5) The last known address, as shown on the records of the
2348 holder, of the apparent owner is in a foreign nation and the
2349 holder is domiciled in this state a domiciliary or is a
2350 government entity or governmental subdivision or agency of this
Page 94 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2351 state.; or
2352 (6) The transaction out of which the property arose
2353 occurred in this state, and both of the following are true:;
2354 (a)1. The last known address of the apparent owner or
2355 other person entitled to the property is unknown.; or
2356 2. The last known address of the apparent owner or other
2357 person entitled to the property is in a state that does not
2358 provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the
2359 property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not
2360 applicable to the property; and
2361 (b) The holder is domiciled in a jurisdiction a
2362 domiciliary of a state that does not have applicable provide by
2363 law for the escheat, abandoned, or custodial taking of the
2364 property, or its escheat or unclaimed property laws law is not
2365 applicable to the property.
2366 Section 41. Section 717.1035, Florida Statutes, is
2367 repealed.
2368 Section 42. Section 717.104, Florida Statutes, is amended
2369 to read:
2370 717.104 Traveler's checks and money orders.—
2371 (1) Subject to subsection (4), any sum payable on a
2372 traveler's check that has been outstanding for more than 15
2373 years after its issuance is presumed abandoned unclaimed unless
2374 the apparent owner or authorized representative, within 15
2375 years, has demonstrated a continued interest in the property in
Page 95 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2376 accordance with s. 717.102 communicated in writing with the
2377 issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as
2378 evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the
2379 issuer.
2380 (2) Subject to subsection (4), any sum payable on a money
2381 order or similar written instrument, other than a third party
2382 bank check, that has been outstanding for more than 7 years
2383 after its issuance is presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the
2384 apparent owner or authorized representative, within 7 years, has
2385 demonstrated a continued interest in the property in accordance
2386 with s. 717.102 communicated in writing with the issuer
2387 concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by
2388 a memorandum or other record on file with the issuer.
2389 (3) A No holder may not deduct from the amount of any
2390 traveler's check or money order any charges imposed by reason of
2391 the failure to present those instruments for payment unless
2392 there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the
2393 holder issuer and the apparent owner of the property pursuant to
2394 which the holder issuer may impose those charges and the holder
2395 issuer regularly imposes those charges and does not regularly
2396 reverse or otherwise cancel those charges with respect to the
2397 property.
2398 (4) No sum payable on a traveler's check, money order, or
2399 similar written instrument, other than a third party bank check,
2400 described in subsections (1) and (2) may be subjected to the
Page 96 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2401 custody of this state as abandoned unclaimed property unless any
2402 of the following conditions are met:
2403 (a) The records of the holder issuer show that the
2404 traveler's check, money order, or similar written instrument was
2405 purchased in this state.;
2406 (b) The holder issuer has its principal place of business
2407 in this state and its the records of the issuer do not show the
2408 state in which the traveler's check, money order, or similar
2409 written instrument was purchased.; or
2410 (c) The holder issuer has its principal place of business
2411 in this state; the holder's records of the issuer show the state
2412 in which the traveler's check, money order, or similar written
2413 instrument was purchased; and the laws of the state of purchase
2414 does not provide applicable do not provide for the escheat,
2415 abandoned, or unclaimed property laws or custodial taking of the
2416 property, or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not
2417 applicable to the property.
2418 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
2419 subsection (4) applies to sums payable on traveler's checks,
2420 money orders, and similar written instruments presumed abandoned
2421 unclaimed on or after February 1, 1965, except to the extent
2422 that those sums have been paid over to a state prior to January
2423 1, 1974.
2424 Section 43. Section 717.1045, Florida Statutes, is amended
2425 to read:
Page 97 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2426 717.1045 Gift certificates and similar credit items.—
2427 Notwithstanding s. 717.117, an unredeemed gift certificate or
2428 credit memo as defined in s. 501.95 is not required to be
2429 reported as abandoned unclaimed property.
2430 (1) The consideration paid for an unredeemed gift
2431 certificate or credit memo is the property of the issuer of the
2432 unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo.
2433 (2) An unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo is
2434 subject only to any rights of a purchaser or owner thereof and
2435 is not subject to a claim made by any state acting on behalf of
2436 a purchaser or owner.
2437 (3) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section
2438 apply to the custodial holding of unredeemed gift certificates
2439 and credit memos.
2440 (4) However, a gift certificate or credit memo described
2441 in s. 501.95(2)(b) shall be reported as abandoned unclaimed
2442 property. The consideration paid for such a gift certificate or
2443 credit memo is the property of the owner of the gift certificate
2444 or credit memo.
2445 Section 44. Section 717.105, Florida Statutes, is amended
2446 to read:
2447 717.105 Checks, drafts, and similar instruments issued or
2448 certified by banking and financial organizations.—
2449 (1) Any sum payable on a check, draft, or similar
2450 instrument, except those subject to ss. 717.104 and 717.115, on
Page 98 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2451 which a banking or financial organization is directly liable,
2452 including, but not limited to, a cashier's check or a certified
2453 check, which has been outstanding for more than 5 years after it
2454 was payable or after its issuance if payable on demand, is
2455 presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent owner or
2456 authorized representative, within 5 years, has communicated in
2457 writing with the banking or financial organization concerning it
2458 or otherwise demonstrated a continued interest in the property
2459 in accordance with s. 717.102 indicated an interest as evidenced
2460 by a memorandum or other record on file with the banking or
2461 financial organization.
2462 (2) A No holder may not deduct from the amount of any
2463 instrument subject to this section any charges imposed by reason
2464 of the failure to present the instrument for encashment unless
2465 there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the
2466 holder and the apparent owner of the instrument pursuant to
2467 which the holder may impose those charges and does not regularly
2468 reverse or otherwise cancel those charges with respect to the
2469 instrument.
2470 Section 45. Subsection (1), paragraphs (a) and (b) of
2471 subsection (3), and subsections (4) and (5) of section 717.106,
2472 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2473 717.106 Bank deposits and funds in financial
2474 organizations.—
2475 (1) Any demand, savings, or matured time deposit with a
Page 99 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2476 banking or financial organization, including deposits that are
2477 automatically renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase
2478 of shares, a mutual investment certificate, or any other
2479 interest in a banking or financial organization is presumed
2480 abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent owner or authorized
2481 representative has, within 5 years, engaged in any of the
2482 following activities:
2483 (a) Increased or decreased the amount of the deposit or
2484 presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit
2485 for the crediting of interest.;
2486 (b) Communicated in writing or by documented telephone
2487 contact with the banking or financial organization concerning
2488 the property.;
2489 (c) Otherwise demonstrated a continued indicated an
2490 interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other
2491 record on file with the banking or financial organization.;
2492 (d) Owned other property to which paragraph (a), paragraph
2493 (b), or paragraph (c) is applicable and if the banking or
2494 financial organization communicates in writing with the owner
2495 with regard to the property that would otherwise be presumed
2496 abandoned unclaimed under this subsection at the address to
2497 which communications regarding the other property regularly are
2498 sent.; or
2499 (e) Had another relationship with the banking or financial
2500 organization concerning which the apparent owner has:
Page 100 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2501 1. Communicated in writing with the banking or financial
2502 organization; or
2503 2. Otherwise demonstrated a continued indicated an
2504 interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file
2505 with the banking or financial organization and if the banking or
2506 financial organization communicates in writing with the apparent
2507 owner or authorized representative with regard to the property
2508 that would otherwise be presumed abandoned unclaimed under this
2509 subsection at the address to which communications regarding the
2510 other relationship regularly are sent.
2511 (3) A No holder may not impose with respect to property
2512 described in subsection (1) any charges due to dormancy or
2513 inactivity or cease payment of interest unless:
2514 (a) There is an enforceable written contract between the
2515 holder and the apparent owner of the property pursuant to which
2516 the holder may impose those charges or cease payment of
2517 interest.
2518 (b) For property in excess of $2, the holder, no more than
2519 3 months prior to the initial imposition of those charges or
2520 cessation of interest, has given written notice to the apparent
2521 owner of the amount of those charges at the last known address
2522 of the apparent owner stating that those charges shall be
2523 imposed or that interest shall cease, but the notice provided in
2524 this section need not be given with respect to charges imposed
2525 or interest ceased before July 1, 1987.
Page 101 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2526 (4) Any property described in subsection (1) that is
2527 automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection
2528 (1) upon the expiration of its initial time period except that,
2529 in the case of any renewal to which the apparent owner consents
2530 at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with
2531 the banking or financial organization or otherwise indicating
2532 consent as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file
2533 prepared by an employee of the organization, the property is
2534 matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which
2535 consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in s.
2536 717.119, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest
2537 would result from the delivery of the property, the time for
2538 delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or
2539 forfeiture would result.
2540 (5) If the documents establishing a deposit described in
2541 subsection (1) state the address of a beneficiary of the
2542 deposit, and the account has a value of at least $50, notice
2543 shall be given to the beneficiary as provided for notice to the
2544 apparent owner under s. 717.117 s. 717.117(6). This subsection
2545 shall apply to accounts opened on or after October 1, 1990.
2546 Section 46. Subsection (1) of section 717.107, Florida
2547 Statutes, is amended to read:
2548 717.107 Funds owing under life insurance policies, annuity
2549 contracts, and retained asset accounts; fines, penalties, and
2550 interest; United States Social Security Administration Death
Page 102 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2551 Master File.—
2552 (1) Funds held or owing under any life or endowment
2553 insurance policy or annuity contract which has matured or
2554 terminated are presumed abandoned unclaimed if unclaimed for
2555 more than 5 years after the date of death of the insured, the
2556 annuitant, or the retained asset account holder, but property
2557 described in paragraph (3)(d) is presumed abandoned unclaimed if
2558 such property is not claimed for more than 2 years. The amount
2559 presumed abandoned unclaimed shall include any amount due and
2560 payable under s. 627.4615.
2561 Section 47. Section 717.1071, Florida Statutes, is amended
2562 to read:
2563 717.1071 Lost owners of abandoned unclaimed
2564 demutualization, rehabilitation, or related reorganization
2565 proceeds.—
2566 (1) Property distributable in the course of a
2567 demutualization, rehabilitation, or related reorganization of an
2568 insurance company is deemed abandoned 2 years after the date the
2569 property is first distributable if, at the time of the first
2570 distribution, the last known address of the apparent owner on
2571 the books and records of the holder is known to be incorrect or
2572 the distribution or statements are returned by the post office
2573 as undeliverable; and the apparent owner or authorized
2574 representative owner has not communicated in writing with the
2575 holder or its agent regarding the interest or otherwise
Page 103 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2576 communicated with the holder regarding the interest as evidenced
2577 by a memorandum or other record on file with the holder or its
2578 agent.
2579 (2) Property distributable in the course of
2580 demutualization, rehabilitation, or related reorganization of a
2581 mutual insurance company that is not subject to subsection (1)
2582 shall be reportable as otherwise provided by this chapter.
2583 (3) Property subject to this section shall be reported and
2584 delivered no later than May 1 as of the preceding December 31;
2585 however, the initial report under this section shall be filed no
2586 later than November 1, 2003, as of December 31, 2002.
2587 Section 48. Section 717.108, Florida Statutes, is amended
2588 to read:
2589 717.108 Deposits held by utilities.—Any deposit, including
2590 any interest thereon, made by a subscriber with a utility to
2591 secure payment or any sum paid in advance for utility services
2592 to be furnished, less any lawful charges, that remains unclaimed
2593 by the apparent owner for more than 1 year after termination of
2594 the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made
2595 is presumed abandoned unclaimed.
2596 Section 49. Section 717.109, Florida Statutes, is amended
2597 to read:
2598 717.109 Refunds held by business associations.—Except as
2599 otherwise provided by law, any sum that a business association
2600 has been ordered to refund by a court or administrative agency
Page 104 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2601 which has been unclaimed by the apparent owner for more than 1
2602 year after it became payable in accordance with the final
2603 determination or order providing for the refund, regardless of
2604 whether the final determination or order requires any person
2605 entitled to a refund to make a claim for it, is presumed
2606 abandoned unclaimed.
2607 Section 50. Section 717.1101, Florida Statutes, is amended
2608 to read:
2609 717.1101 Abandoned Unclaimed equity and debt of business
2610 associations.—
2611 (1)(a) Stock, or other equity interests, or debt of
2612 interest in a business association is presumed abandoned
2613 unclaimed on the date of the earliest of any of the following:
2614 1. Three years after the date a communication, other than
2615 communications required by s. 717.117, sent by the holder by
2616 first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned
2617 to the holder undelivered by the United States Postal Service.
2618 If such returned communication is resent within 1 month to the
2619 apparent owner, the 3-year dormancy period does not begin until
2620 the day the resent item is returned as undelivered.
2621 2. Five Three years after the most recent of any account
2622 owner-generated activity or communication initiated by the
2623 apparent owner or authorized representative which demonstrates
2624 continued interest in the related to the account, as recorded
2625 and maintained by in the holder. Routine automatic reinvestments
Page 105 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2626 or other routine transactions previously authorized by the
2627 apparent owner or authorized representative do not prevent,
2628 interrupt, or reset the dormancy period and do not constitute an
2629 affirmative demonstration of continued interest. holder's
2630 database and records systems sufficient enough to demonstrate
2631 the owner's continued awareness or interest in the property;
2632 3.2. Two Three years after the date of the death of the
2633 apparent owner, as evidenced by:
2634 a. Notice to the holder of the apparent owner's death by
2635 an authorized representative administrator, beneficiary,
2636 relative, or trustee, or by a personal representative or other
2637 legal representative of the owner's estate;
2638 b. Receipt by the holder of a copy of the death
2639 certificate of the apparent owner;
2640 c. Confirmation by the holder of the apparent owner's
2641 death through though other means; or
2642 d. Other evidence from which the holder may reasonably
2643 conclude that the apparent owner is deceased.; or
2644 3. One year after the date on which the holder receives
2645 notice under subparagraph 2. if the notice is received 2 years
2646 or less after the owner's death and the holder lacked knowledge
2647 of the owner's death during that period of 2 years or less.
2648 (b) If the holder does not send communication to the
2649 apparent owner of a security by first-class United States mail
2650 on an annual basis, the holder shall attempt to confirm the
Page 106 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2651 apparent owner's interest in the equity interest by sending the
2652 apparent owner an e-mail communication not later than 3 years
2653 after the apparent owner's or authorized representative's last
2654 demonstration of continued interest in the equity interest.
2655 However, the holder shall promptly attempt to contact the
2656 apparent owner by first-class United States mail if:
2657 1. The holder does not have information needed to send the
2658 apparent owner an e-mail communication or the holder believes
2659 that the apparent owner's e-mail address in the holder's records
2660 is not valid;
2661 2. The holder received notification that the e-mail
2662 communication was not received; or
2663 3. The apparent owner does not respond to the e-mail
2664 communication within 30 days after the communication was sent.
2665 (c) If first-class United States mail sent under paragraph
2666 (b) is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States
2667 Postal Service, the equity interest is presumed abandoned in
2668 accordance with paragraph (1)(a).
2669 (d) Unmatured or unredeemed debt, other than a bearer bond
2670 or an original issue discount bond, is presumed abandoned 5
2671 unclaimed 3 years after the date of the most recent interest
2672 payment unclaimed by the owner.
2673 (e)(c) Matured or redeemed debt is presumed abandoned 5
2674 unclaimed 3 years after the date of maturity or redemption.
2675 (f)(d) At the time property is presumed abandoned
Page 107 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2676 unclaimed under paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), any other
2677 property right accrued or accruing to the owner as a result of
2678 the property interest and not previously presumed abandoned
2679 unclaimed is also presumed abandoned unclaimed.
2680 (2) The running of the applicable dormancy period under
2681 this section such 3-year period ceases if the apparent owner or
2682 authorized representative demonstrates continued interest under
2683 s. 717.102, including by any of the following actions person:
2684 (a)1. Communicating Communicates in writing or by other
2685 means with the association or its agent regarding the interest,
2686 or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable as a result of
2687 the interest, as recorded by the association or its agent; or
2688 2. Otherwise communicates with the association regarding
2689 the interest or a dividend, distribution, or other sum payable
2690 as a result of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or
2691 other record on file with the association or its agent.
2692 (b) Presenting Presents an instrument issued to pay
2693 interest, or a dividend, or other cash distribution. If any
2694 future dividend, distribution, or other sum payable to the owner
2695 as a result of the interest is subsequently unclaimed not
2696 claimed by the owner, a new period in which the property is
2697 presumed abandoned unclaimed commences and relates back only to
2698 the time a subsequent dividend, distribution, or other sum
2699 became due and payable.
2700 (3) At the same time any interest is presumed abandoned
Page 108 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2701 unclaimed under this section, any dividend, distribution, or
2702 other sum then held for or owing to the owner as a result of the
2703 interest, is presumed abandoned unclaimed.
2704 (4) Any dividend, profit, distribution, interest
2705 redemption, payment on principal, or other sum held or owing by
2706 a business association for or to a shareholder,
2707 certificateholder, member, bondholder, or other security holder,
2708 who has not claimed such amount or corresponded in writing with
2709 the business association concerning such amount, within 5 3
2710 years after the date prescribed for payment or delivery, is
2711 presumed abandoned unclaimed.
2712 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section,
2713 equity interests in business association and securities accounts
2714 are not presumed abandoned solely due to inactivity if the
2715 holder knows the location of the apparent owner.
2716 (a) For purposes of this subsection, a holder shall
2717 perform data matching of owner records maintained in its
2718 database against commercially available third party data
2719 comparison sources to identify updated owner address information
2720 and indicators of deceased status. Utilizing any updated
2721 information, together with existing information of record, the
2722 holder is deemed to know the location of the apparent owner if:
2723 1. The holder communicates with the apparent owner at
2724 least annually by first-class United States mail or electronic
2725 means, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, text
Page 109 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2726 message, mobile application, or similar mechanism;
2727 2. Such communication is successfully delivered, meaning
2728 not returned as undeliverable; and
2729 3. One or more additional account-level indicators
2730 demonstrating an owner indication of interest occurs at least
2731 once every 10 years, including:
2732 a. Owner-initiated activity, such as authenticated access
2733 to website, mobile engagement via mobile messaging, or other
2734 authenticated third party account servicing software;
2735 b. Updated contact information received authorized
2736 financial adviser;
2737 c. Responses to account notifications or alerts;
2738 d. Negotiation of distributions, including dividends; or
2739 e. Any other action by the apparent owner or authorized
2740 representative which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that
2741 the apparent owner or authorized representative is aware of and
2742 maintains an interest in the property.
2743 (b) Automatic deposits, reinvestments, or other recurring
2744 transactions initiated by the holder shall not independently
2745 constitute an indication of apparent owner interest for purposes
2746 of this section.
2747 (c) If the conditions in paragraph (a) are not satisfied,
2748 the owner's location is deemed unknown, and the equity interest
2749 or securities account may be presumed abandoned:
2750 1. Ten years after the owner's most recent indication of
Page 110 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2751 interest in the property; or
2752 2. Ten years after the date a communication is returned as
2753 undeliverable, unless the owner responses to a due diligence
2754 notice before the reporting deadline.
2755 (d) Property described in paragraph (c) may be presumed
2756 abandoned only after reasonable efforts to locate the owner have
2757 been unsuccessful and the holder has complied with the due
2758 diligence requirement of this chapter.
2759 (e) This subsection applies to equity interests and
2760 securities accounts held directly by the owner or indirectly
2761 through a brokerage account or similar account
2762 Section 51. Section 717.111, Florida Statutes, is amended
2763 to read:
2764 717.111 Property of business associations held in course
2765 of dissolution.—All intangible property distributable in the
2766 course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a business
2767 association which is not claimed by the apparent owner for more
2768 than 6 months after the date specified for final distribution is
2769 presumed abandoned unclaimed.
2770 Section 52. Subsections (1) and (5) of section 717.112,
2771 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
2772 717.112 Property held by agents and fiduciaries.—
2773 (1) All intangible property and any income or increment
2774 thereon held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another
2775 person, including property held by an attorney in fact or an
Page 111 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2776 agent, except as provided in ss. 717.1125 and 733.816, is
2777 presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent owner has
2778 within 5 years after it has become payable or distributable
2779 increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of
2780 principal or income, communicated in writing concerning the
2781 property, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a
2782 memorandum or other record on file with the fiduciary.
2783 (5) All intangible property, and any income or increment
2784 thereon, issued by a government or governmental subdivision or
2785 agency, public corporation, or public authority and held in an
2786 agency capacity for the governmental subdivision, agency, public
2787 corporation, or public authority for the benefit of the owner of
2788 record, is presumed abandoned unclaimed unless the apparent
2789 owner has, within 1 year after such property has become payable
2790 or distributable, increased or decreased the principal, accepted
2791 payment of the principal or income, communicated concerning the
2792 property, or otherwise indicated an interest in the property as
2793 evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the
2794 fiduciary.
2795 Section 53. Section 717.1125, Florida Statutes, is amended
2796 to read:
2797 717.1125 Property held by fiduciaries under trust
2798 instruments.—All intangible property and any income or increment
2799 thereon held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another
2800 person under a trust instrument is presumed abandoned unclaimed
Page 112 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2801 unless the apparent owner has, within 2 years after it has
2802 become payable or distributable, increased or decreased the
2803 principal, accepted payment of principal or income, communicated
2804 concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an interest as
2805 evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the
2806 fiduciary. This section does not relieve a fiduciary of his or
2807 her duties under the Florida Trust Code.
2808 Section 54. Section 717.113, Florida Statutes, is amended
2809 to read:
2810 717.113 Property held by courts and public agencies.—All
2811 intangible property held for the apparent owner by any court,
2812 government or governmental subdivision or agency, public
2813 corporation, or public authority that has not been claimed by
2814 the apparent owner for more than 1 year after it became payable
2815 or distributable is presumed abandoned unclaimed. Except as
2816 provided in s. 45.032(3)(c), money held in the court registry
2817 and for which no court order has been issued to determine an
2818 owner does not become payable or distributable and is not
2819 subject to reporting under this chapter. Notwithstanding the
2820 provisions of this section, funds deposited in the Minerals
2821 Trust Fund pursuant to s. 377.247 are presumed abandoned
2822 unclaimed only if the funds have not been claimed by the
2823 apparent owner for more than 5 years after the date of first
2824 production from the well.
2825 Section 55. Section 717.115, Florida Statutes, is amended
Page 113 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2826 to read:
2827 717.115 Wages.—Unpaid wages, including wages represented
2828 by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of
2829 the holder's business that have not been claimed by the apparent
2830 owner for more than 1 year after becoming payable are presumed
2831 abandoned unclaimed.
2832 Section 56. Section 717.116, Florida Statutes, is amended
2833 to read:
2834 717.116 Contents of safe-deposit box or other safekeeping
2835 repository.—All tangible and intangible property held by a
2836 banking or financial organization in a safe-deposit box or any
2837 other safekeeping repository in this state in the ordinary
2838 course of the holder's business, and proceeds resulting from the
2839 sale of the property permitted by law, that has not been claimed
2840 by the apparent owner or authorized representative for more than
2841 3 years after the lease or rental period on the box or other
2842 repository has expired are presumed abandoned unclaimed.
2843 Section 57. Section 717.117, Florida Statutes, is amended
2844 to read:
2845 717.117 Holder due diligence and report of abandoned
2846 unclaimed property.—
2847 (1) Property is presumed abandoned upon expiration of the
2848 applicable dormancy period under this chapter. However, such
2849 property is not deemed abandoned for purposes of reporting or
2850 remittance to the department until the holder has conducted
Page 114 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2851 reasonable due diligence as required by this section, resulting
2852 in no indication of interest from the apparent owner or
2853 authorized representative.
2854 (2) Holders of property presumed abandoned that has a
2855 value of $50 or more shall use due diligence to locate and
2856 notify the apparent owner that the holder is in possession of
2857 property subject to this chapter. At least 90 days, but not more
2858 than 180 days, before filing the report required by this
2859 section, a holder in possession of presumed abandoned property
2860 shall send written notice by first-class United States mail to
2861 the apparent owner's last known address as shown in the holder's
2862 records or from other available sources, or by e-mail if the
2863 apparent owner has elected for e-mail delivery, informing the
2864 apparent owner that the holder is in possession of property
2865 subject to this chapter, provided that the holder's records
2866 contain a mailing or e-mail address for the apparent owner which
2867 is not known by the holder to be inaccurate. The holder may
2868 provide notice by mail, by e-mail, or by both methods. If the
2869 holder's records indicate that the mailing address is
2870 inaccurate, notice may be provided by e-mail if the apparent
2871 owner has elected e-mail delivery.
2872 (3) If the value of the property is greater than $1,000,
2873 the holder shall send a second written notice by certified
2874 United States mail, return receipt requested, to the apparent
2875 owner's last known address at least 60 days before filing the
Page 115 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2876 report required by this section, if the holder's records contain
2877 a mailing address for the apparent owner which is not known by
2878 the holder to be inaccurate. Reasonable costs paid to the United
2879 States Postal Service for certified mail, return receipt
2880 requested, may be deducted from the property as a service
2881 charge. A signed return receipt received in response to the
2882 certified mail notice constitutes an affirmative demonstration
2883 of continued interest as described in s. 717.102.
2884 (4) The written notice required under this section must
2885 include:
2886 (a) A heading that reads substantially as follows:
2887 "Notice: The State of Florida requires us to notify you that
2888 your property may be transferred to the custody of the Florida
2889 Department of Financial Services if you do not contact us before
2890 ...(insert date that is at least 30 days after the date of
2891 notice)...."
2892 (b) A description of the type, nature, and, unless the
2893 property does not have a fixed value, value of the property that
2894 is the subject of the notice.
2895 (c) A statement that the property will be turned over to
2896 the custody of the department as abandoned property if no
2897 response is received.
2898 (d) A statement that noncash property will be sold or
2899 liquidated by the department.
2900 (e) A statement that, after the property is remitted to
Page 116 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2901 the department, a claim must be filed with the department to
2902 recover the property.
2903 (f) A statement that the property is currently in the
2904 custody of the holder and that the apparent owner may prevent
2905 transfer of the property by contacting the holder before the
2906 deadline stated in the notice.
2907 (g) If the property is virtual currency, a statement that
2908 the virtual currency will be liquated by the holder before it is
2909 remitted to the department and that only the proceeds of
2910 liquidation will be transferred.
2911 (5) Every holder of abandoned person holding funds or
2912 other property, tangible or intangible, presumed unclaimed and
2913 subject to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter
2914 shall submit a report to the department via electronic medium as
2915 the department may prescribe by rule. The report must include:
2916 (a) Except for traveler's checks and money orders, the
2917 name, social security number or taxpayer identification number,
2918 date of birth, if known, and last known address, if any, of each
2919 apparent person appearing from the records of the holder to be
2920 the owner of any property which is abandoned presumed unclaimed
2921 and which has a value of $10 or more.
2922 (b) For abandoned unclaimed funds that have a value of $10
2923 or more held or owing under any life or endowment insurance
2924 policy or annuity contract, the identifying information provided
2925 in paragraph (a) for both the insured or annuitant and the
Page 117 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2926 beneficiary according to records of the insurance company
2927 holding or owing the funds.
2928 (c) For all tangible property held in a safe-deposit box
2929 or other safekeeping repository, a description of the property
2930 and the place where the property is held and may be inspected by
2931 the department, and any amounts owing to the holder. Contents of
2932 a safe-deposit box or other safekeeping repository which consist
2933 of documents or writings of a private nature and which have
2934 little or no commercial value may apparent value shall not be
2935 reported as abandoned property presumed unclaimed.
2936 (d) The nature or type of property, any accounting or
2937 identifying number associated with the property, a description
2938 of the property, and the amount appearing from the records to be
2939 due. Items of value of less than $10 each may be reported in the
2940 aggregate.
2941 (e) The date the property became payable, demandable, or
2942 returnable, and the date of the last transaction with the
2943 apparent owner with respect to the property.
2944 (f) Any other information the department may prescribe by
2945 rule as necessary for the administration of this chapter.
2946 (6)(2) If the total value of all abandoned presumed
2947 unclaimed property, whether tangible or intangible, held by a
2948 person is less than $10, a zero balance report may be filed for
2949 that reporting period.
2950 (7)(3) Credit balances, customer overpayments, security
Page 118 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2951 deposits, and refunds having a value of less than $10 may not be
2952 reported as abandoned property shall not be presumed unclaimed.
2953 (8) A security identified by the holder as non-freely
2954 transferable or worthless may not to be included in a report
2955 filed under this section. If the holder determines that a
2956 security is no longer non-freely transferable or worthless, the
2957 holder shall report and deliver the security on the next regular
2958 report date prescribed for delivery of securities by the holder
2959 under this chapter.
2960 (9)(4) If the holder of abandoned property presumed
2961 unclaimed and subject to custody under this chapter as unclaimed
2962 property is a successor holder or if the holder has changed the
2963 holder's name while in possession of the property, the holder
2964 shall file with the holder's report all known names and
2965 addresses of each prior holder of the property. Compliance with
2966 this subsection means the holder exercises reasonable and
2967 prudent efforts to determine the names of all prior holders.
2968 (10) The report must be signed by or on behalf of the
2969 holder and verified as to its completeness and accuracy, and the
2970 holder must state that it has complied with the due diligence
2971 requirements of this section.
2972 (11)(5) The report must be filed before May 1 of each
2973 year. The report applies to the preceding calendar year. Upon
2974 written request by any person required to file a report, and
2975 upon a showing of good cause, the department may extend the
Page 119 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
2976 reporting date. The department may impose and collect a penalty
2977 of $10 per day up to a maximum of $500 for the failure to timely
2978 report, if an extension was not provided or if the holder of the
2979 property failed to include in a report information required by
2980 this chapter which was in the holder's possession at the time of
2981 reporting. The penalty shall be remitted to the department
2982 within 30 days after the date of the notification to the holder
2983 that the penalty is due and owing. As necessary for proper
2984 administration of this chapter, the department may waive any
2985 penalty due with appropriate justification. The department must
2986 provide information contained in a report filed with the
2987 department to any person requesting a copy of the report or
2988 information contained in a report, to the extent the information
2989 requested is not confidential, within 45 days after the
2990 department determines that the report is accurate and acceptable
2991 and that the reported property is the same as the remitted
2992 property.
2993 (6) Holders of inactive accounts having a value of $50 or
2994 more shall use due diligence to locate and notify apparent
2995 owners that the entity is holding unclaimed property available
2996 for them to recover. Not more than 120 days and not less than 60
2997 days prior to filing the report required by this section, the
2998 holder in possession of property presumed unclaimed and subject
2999 to custody as unclaimed property under this chapter shall send
3000 written notice by first-class United States mail to the apparent
Page 120 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3001 owner at the apparent owner's last known address from the
3002 holder's records or from other available sources, or via
3003 electronic mail if the apparent owner has elected this method of
3004 delivery, informing the apparent owner that the holder is in
3005 possession of property subject to this chapter, if the holder
3006 has in its records a mailing or electronic address for the
3007 apparent owner which the holder's records do not disclose to be
3008 inaccurate. These two means of contact are not mutually
3009 exclusive; if the mailing address is determined to be
3010 inaccurate, electronic mail may be used if so elected by the
3011 apparent owner.
3012 (7) The written notice to the apparent owner required
3013 under this section must:
3014 (a) Contain a heading that reads substantially as follows:
3015 "Notice. The State of Florida requires us to notify you that
3016 your property may be transferred to the custody of the Florida
3017 Department of Financial Services if you do not contact us before
3018 ...(insert date that is at least 30 days after the date of
3019 notice)...."
3020 (b) Identify the type, nature, and, except for property
3021 that does not have a fixed value, value of the property that is
3022 the subject of the notice.
3023 (c) State that the property will be turned over to the
3024 custody of the department as unclaimed property if no response
3025 to this letter is received.
Page 121 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3026 (d) State that any property that is not legal tender of
3027 the United States may be sold or liquidated by the department.
3028 (e) State that after the property is turned over to the
3029 department, an apparent owner seeking return of the property may
3030 file a claim with the department.
3031 (f) State that the property is currently with a holder and
3032 provide instructions that the apparent owner must follow to
3033 prevent the holder from reporting and paying for the property or
3034 from delivering the property to the department.
3035 (12)(8) Any holder of intangible property may file with
3036 the department a petition for determination that the property is
3037 abandoned and unclaimed requesting the department to accept
3038 custody of the property. The petition shall state any special
3039 circumstances that exist, contain the information required by
3040 subsection (9) subsection (4), and show that a diligent search
3041 has been made to locate the apparent owner. If the department
3042 finds that the proof of diligent search is satisfactory, it
3043 shall give notice as provided in s. 717.118 and accept custody
3044 of the property.
3045 (13)(9) Upon written request by any entity or person
3046 required to file a report, stating such entity's or person's
3047 justification for such action, the department may place that
3048 entity or person in an inactive status as an abandoned unclaimed
3049 property "holder."
3050 (14)(10)(a) This section does not apply to the abandoned
Page 122 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3051 unclaimed patronage refunds as provided for by contract or
3052 through bylaw provisions of entities organized under chapter 425
3053 or that are exempt from ad valorem taxation pursuant to s.
3054 196.2002.
3055 (b) This section does not apply to intangible property
3056 held, issued, or owing by a business association subject to the
3057 jurisdiction of the United States Surface Transportation Board
3058 or its successor federal agency if the apparent owner of such
3059 intangible property is a business association. The holder of
3060 such property does not have any obligation to report, to pay, or
3061 to deliver such property to the department.
3062 (c) This section does not apply to credit balances,
3063 overpayments, refunds, or outstanding checks owed by a health
3064 care provider to a managed care payor with whom the health care
3065 provider has a managed care contract, provided that the credit
3066 balances, overpayments, refunds, or outstanding checks become
3067 due and owing pursuant to the managed care contract.
3068 (15)(11)(a) As used in this subsection, the term "property
3069 identifier" means the descriptor used by the holder to identify
3070 the abandoned unclaimed property.
3071 (b) Social security numbers and property identifiers
3072 contained in reports required under this section, held by the
3073 department, are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
3074 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
3075 (c) This exemption applies to social security numbers and
Page 123 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3076 property identifiers held by the department before, on, or after
3077 the effective date of this exemption.
3078 Section 58. Section 717.118, Florida Statutes, is amended
3079 to read:
3080 717.118 Notification of apparent owners of abandoned
3081 unclaimed property.—
3082 (1) It is specifically recognized that the state has an
3083 obligation to make an effort to notify apparent owners in a
3084 cost-effective manner that their abandoned property has been
3085 reported and remitted to the department of unclaimed property in
3086 a cost-effective manner. In order to provide all the citizens of
3087 this state an effective and efficient program for the recovery
3088 of abandoned personal unclaimed property, the department shall
3089 use cost-effective means to make at least one active attempt to
3090 notify apparent owners of abandoned unclaimed property accounts
3091 valued at $50 or more, abandoned tangible property, and
3092 abandoned shares of stock for which more than $250 with a
3093 reported address or taxpayer identification number is available.
3094 Such active attempt to notify apparent owners shall include any
3095 attempt by the department to directly contact the apparent
3096 owner. Other means of notification, such as publication of the
3097 names of apparent owners in the newspaper, on television, on the
3098 Internet, or through other promotional efforts and items in
3099 which the department does not directly attempt to contact the
3100 apparent owner are expressly declared to be passive attempts.
Page 124 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3101 Nothing in This subsection does not preclude precludes other
3102 agencies or entities of state government from notifying owners
3103 of the existence of abandoned unclaimed property or attempting
3104 to notify apparent owners of abandoned unclaimed property.
3105 (2) Notification provided directly to individual apparent
3106 owners shall contain consist of a description of the abandoned
3107 property and information regarding recovery of the unclaimed
3108 property from the department. The form and content of the
3109 department's notice shall be tailored to the type of property
3110 reported and shall include any information necessary to
3111 reasonably inform the apparent owner of the consequences of
3112 failure to claim the property, including potential sale or
3113 disposition under s. 717.122.
3114 (3) The department shall maintain a publicly accessible,
3115 electronically searchable website that includes the names of
3116 apparent owners of abandoned property reported to the department
3117 and instructions for filing a claim. The website must list
3118 property valued at $10 or more and provide instructions for
3119 filing a claim. Abandoned property valued at less than $10
3120 remains recoverable from the department in accordance with this
3121 chapter.
3122 (4) This section is not applicable to abandoned sums
3123 payable on traveler's checks, money orders, and other written
3124 instruments presumed unclaimed under s. 717.104, or any other
3125 abandoned property reported without the necessary identifying
Page 125 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3126 information to establish ownership.
3127 Section 59. Section 717.119, Florida Statutes, is amended
3128 to read:
3129 717.119 Payment or delivery of abandoned unclaimed
3130 property.—
3131 (1) Every person who is required to file a report under s.
3132 717.117 shall simultaneously pay or deliver to the department
3133 all abandoned unclaimed property required to be reported. Such
3134 payment or delivery shall accompany the report as required in
3135 this chapter for the preceding calendar year.
3136 (2) Payment of abandoned unclaimed funds may be made to
3137 the department by electronic funds transfer.
3138 (3) If the apparent owner establishes the right to receive
3139 the abandoned unclaimed property to the satisfaction of the
3140 holder before the property has been delivered to the department
3141 or it appears that for some other reason the presumption that
3142 the property was erroneously classified as abandoned is
3143 unclaimed is erroneous, the holder need not pay or deliver the
3144 property to the department. In lieu of delivery, the holder
3145 shall file a verified written explanation of the proof of claim
3146 or of the error in classification of the presumption that the
3147 property as abandoned was unclaimed.
3148 (4) All virtual currency reported under this chapter on
3149 the annual report filing required in s. 717.117 shall be
3150 remitted to the department with the report. The holder shall
Page 126 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3151 liquidate the virtual currency and remit the proceeds to the
3152 department. The liquidation must occur within 30 days before the
3153 filing of the report. Upon delivery of the virtual currency
3154 proceeds to the department, the holder is relieved of all
3155 liability of every kind in accordance with the provisions of s.
3156 717.1201 to every person for any losses or damages resulting to
3157 the person by the delivery to the department of the virtual
3158 currency proceeds.
3159 (5) All stock or other intangible ownership interest
3160 reported under this chapter on the annual report filing required
3161 in s. 717.117 shall be remitted to the department with the
3162 report. Upon delivery of the stock or other intangible ownership
3163 interest to the department, the holder and any transfer agent,
3164 registrar, or other person acting for or on behalf of a holder
3165 is relieved of all liability of every kind in accordance with
3166 the provisions of s. 717.1201 to every person for any losses or
3167 damages resulting to the person by the delivery to the
3168 department of the stock or other intangible ownership interest.
3169 (6) All intangible and tangible property held in a safe-
3170 deposit box or any other safekeeping repository reported under
3171 s. 717.117 shall not be delivered to the department until 120
3172 days after the report due date. The delivery of the property,
3173 through the United States mail or any other carrier, shall be
3174 insured by the holder at an amount equal to the estimated value
3175 of the property. Each package shall be clearly marked on the
Page 127 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3176 outside "Deliver Unopened." A holder's safe-deposit box contents
3177 shall be delivered to the department in a single shipment. In
3178 lieu of a single shipment, holders may provide the department
3179 with a single detailed shipping schedule that includes package
3180 tracking information for all packages being sent pursuant to
3181 this section.
3182 (a) Holders may remit the value of cash and coins found in
3183 abandoned unclaimed safe-deposit boxes to the department by
3184 cashier's check or by electronic funds transfer, unless the cash
3185 or coins have a value above face value. The department shall
3186 identify by rule those cash and coin items having a numismatic
3187 value. Cash and coin items identified as having a numismatic
3188 value shall be remitted to the department in their original
3189 form.
3190 (b) Any firearm or ammunition found in an abandoned
3191 unclaimed safe-deposit box or any other safekeeping repository
3192 shall be delivered by the holder to a law enforcement agency for
3193 property handling or disposal pursuant to s. 705.103(2)(b). If
3194 the firearm is sold by the law enforcement agency, with the
3195 balance of the proceeds shall be deposited into the State School
3196 Fund if the firearm is sold. However, The department is
3197 authorized to make a reasonable attempt to ascertain the
3198 historical value to collectors of any firearm that has been
3199 delivered to the department. Any firearm appearing to have
3200 historical value to collectors may be sold by the department
Page 128 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3201 pursuant to s. 717.122 to a person having a federal firearms
3202 license. Any firearm which is not sold pursuant to s. 717.122
3203 shall be delivered by the department to a law enforcement agency
3204 in this state for proper handling or disposal. In accordance
3205 with pursuant to s. 705.103(2)(b), if the firearm is sold by the
3206 law enforcement agency, with the balance of the proceeds shall
3207 be deposited into the State School Fund if the firearm is sold.
3208 The department shall not be administratively, civilly, or
3209 criminally liable for any firearm delivered by the department to
3210 a law enforcement agency in this state for disposal.
3211 (c) If such property is not paid or delivered to the
3212 department on or before the applicable payment or delivery date,
3213 the holder shall pay to the department a penalty for each safe-
3214 deposit box shipment received late. The penalty shall be $100
3215 for a safe-deposit box shipment container that is late 30 days
3216 or less. Thereafter, the penalty shall be $500 for a safe-
3217 deposit box shipment container that is late for each additional
3218 successive 30-day period. The penalty assessed against a holder
3219 for a late safe-deposit box shipment container shall not exceed
3220 $4,000 annually. The penalty shall be remitted to the department
3221 within 30 days after the date of the notification to the holder
3222 that the penalty is due and owing.
3223 (d) The department may waive any penalty due with
3224 appropriate justification, as provided by rule.
3225 (e) If a will or trust instrument is included among the
Page 129 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3226 contents of an abandoned a safe-deposit box or other safekeeping
3227 repository delivered to the department, the department must
3228 provide a copy of the will, trust, and any codicils or
3229 amendments to such will or trust instrument, upon request, to
3230 anyone who provides the department with a certified copy of the
3231 death certificate or another government certified record
3232 evidencing evidence of the death of the testator or settlor.
3233 (7) Any holder may request an extension in writing of up
3234 to 60 days for the delivery of property if extenuating
3235 circumstances exist for the late delivery of the property. Any
3236 such extension the department may grant shall be in writing.
3237 (8) A holder may not assign or otherwise transfer its
3238 obligation to report, pay, or deliver property or to comply with
3239 the provisions of this chapter, other than to a parent,
3240 subsidiary, or affiliate of the holder.
3241 (a) Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties to a
3242 transaction, the holder's successor by merger or consolidation,
3243 or any person or entity that acquires all or substantially all
3244 of the holder's capital stock or assets, is responsible for
3245 fulfilling the holder's obligation to report, pay, or deliver
3246 property or to comply with the duties of this chapter regarding
3247 the transfer of property owed to the holder's successor and
3248 being held for an owner resulting from the merger,
3249 consolidation, or acquisition.
3250 (b) This subsection does not prohibit a holder from
Page 130 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3251 contracting with a third party for the reporting of abandoned
3252 unclaimed property, but the holder remains responsible to the
3253 department for the complete, accurate, and timely reporting of
3254 the property.
3255 Section 60. Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of section
3256 717.1201, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3257 717.1201 Custody by state; holder liability; reimbursement
3258 of holder paying claim; reclaiming for owner; payment of safe-
3259 deposit box or repository charges.—
3260 (1) Upon the good faith payment or delivery of abandoned
3261 unclaimed property to the department, the state assumes custody
3262 and responsibility for the safekeeping of the property. Any
3263 person who pays or delivers abandoned unclaimed property to the
3264 department in good faith is relieved of all liability to the
3265 extent of the value of the property paid or delivered for any
3266 claim then existing or which thereafter may arise or be made
3267 with in respect to the property.
3268 (a) A holder's substantial compliance with the due
3269 diligence provisions in s. 717.117 s. 717.117(6) and good faith
3270 payment or delivery of abandoned unclaimed property to the
3271 department releases the holder from liability that may arise
3272 from such payment or delivery, and such delivery and payment may
3273 be pleaded as a defense in any suit or action brought by reason
3274 of such delivery or payment. This section does not relieve a
3275 fiduciary of his or her duties under the Florida Trust Code or
Page 131 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3276 Florida Probate Code.
3277 (b) If the holder pays or delivers property to the
3278 department in good faith and thereafter any other person claims
3279 the property from the holder paying or delivering, or another
3280 state claims the money or property under that state's laws
3281 relating to escheat or abandoned or unclaimed property, the
3282 department, upon written notice of the claim, shall defend the
3283 holder against the claim and indemnify the holder against any
3284 liability on the claim, except that a holder may not be
3285 indemnified against penalties imposed by another state.
3286 (2) For the purposes of this section, a payment or
3287 delivery of abandoned unclaimed property is made in good faith
3288 if:
3289 (a) The payment or delivery was made in conjunction with
3290 an accurate and acceptable report.
3291 (b) The payment or delivery was made in a reasonable
3292 attempt to comply with this chapter and other applicable general
3293 law.
3294 (c) The holder had a reasonable basis for believing, based
3295 on the facts then known, that the property was abandoned
3296 unclaimed and subject to this chapter.
3297 (d) There is no showing that the records pursuant to which
3298 the delivery was made did not meet reasonable commercial
3299 standards of practice in the industry.
3300 (4) Any holder who has delivered property, including a
Page 132 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3301 certificate of any interest in a business association, other
3302 than money to the department pursuant to this chapter may
3303 reclaim the property if still in the possession of the
3304 department, without payment of any fee or other charges, upon
3305 filing proof that the person entitled to the property owner has
3306 claimed it the property from the holder.
3307 Section 61. Section 717.122, Florida Statutes, is amended
3308 to read:
3309 717.122 Public sale of abandoned unclaimed property.—
3310 (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2)(a), the department
3311 after the receipt of abandoned unclaimed property shall sell it
3312 to the highest bidder at public sale on the Internet or at a
3313 specified physical location wherever in the judgment of the
3314 department the most favorable market for the property involved
3315 exists. The department may decline the highest bid and reoffer
3316 the property for sale if in the judgment of the department the
3317 bid is insufficient. The department shall have the discretion to
3318 withhold from sale any abandoned unclaimed property that the
3319 department deems to be of benefit to the people of the state. If
3320 in the judgment of the department the probable cost of sale
3321 exceeds the value of the property, it need not be offered for
3322 sale and may be disposed of as the department determines
3323 appropriate. Any sale at a specified physical location held
3324 under this section must be preceded by a single publication of
3325 notice, at least 3 weeks in advance of sale, in a newspaper of
Page 133 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3326 general circulation in the county in which the property is to be
3327 sold. The department shall proportionately deduct auction fees,
3328 preparation costs, and expenses from the amount posted to an the
3329 owner's account for an abandoned when safe-deposit box when the
3330 contents are sold. No action or proceeding may be maintained
3331 against the department for or on account of any decision to
3332 decline the highest bid or withhold any abandoned unclaimed
3333 property from sale.
3334 (2)(a) Securities listed on an established stock exchange
3335 must be sold at prices prevailing at the time of sale on the
3336 exchange. Other securities may be sold over the counter at
3337 prices prevailing at the time of sale or by any other method the
3338 department deems advisable. The department may authorize the
3339 agent or broker acting on behalf of the department to deduct
3340 fees from the proceeds of these sales at a rate agreed upon in
3341 advance by the agent or broker and the department. The
3342 department shall reimburse owners' accounts for these brokerage
3343 fees from the State School Fund unless the securities are sold
3344 at the owner's request.
3345 (b) Unless the department deems it to be in the public
3346 interest to do otherwise, all abandoned securities presumed
3347 unclaimed and delivered to the department may be sold upon
3348 receipt. Any person making a claim pursuant to this chapter is
3349 entitled to receive either the securities delivered to the
3350 department by the holder, if they still remain in the hands of
Page 134 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3351 the department, or the proceeds received from sale, but no
3352 person has any claim under this chapter against the state, the
3353 holder, any transfer agent, any registrar, or any other person
3354 acting for or on behalf of a holder for any appreciation in the
3355 value of the property occurring after delivery by the holder to
3356 the state.
3357 (c) Certificates for abandoned unclaimed stock or other
3358 equity interest of business associations that cannot be canceled
3359 and registered in the department's name or that cannot be
3360 readily liquidated and converted into the currency of the United
3361 States may be sold for the value of the certificate, if any, in
3362 accordance with subsection (1) or may be destroyed in accordance
3363 with s. 717.128.
3364 (3) The purchaser of property at any sale conducted by the
3365 department pursuant to this chapter is entitled to ownership of
3366 the property purchased free from all claims of the owner or
3367 previous holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or
3368 under them. The department shall execute all documents necessary
3369 to complete the transfer of ownership.
3370 (4) The sale of abandoned unclaimed tangible personal
3371 property is not subject to tax under chapter 212 when such
3372 property is sold by or on behalf of the department pursuant to
3373 this section.
3374 Section 62. Section 717.123, Florida Statutes, is amended
3375 to read:
Page 135 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3376 717.123 Deposit of funds.—
3377 (1) All funds received under this chapter, including the
3378 proceeds from the sale of abandoned unclaimed property under s.
3379 717.122, shall immediately forthwith be deposited by the
3380 department in the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Trust Fund. The
3381 department shall retain, from funds received under this chapter,
3382 an amount not exceeding $15 million from which the department
3383 shall make prompt payment of claims allowed by the department
3384 and shall pay the costs incurred by the department in
3385 administering and enforcing this chapter. All remaining funds
3386 received by the department under this chapter shall be deposited
3387 by the department into the State School Fund.
3388 (2) The department shall record the name and last known
3389 address of each person appearing from the holder's reports to be
3390 entitled to the abandoned unclaimed property in the total
3391 amounts of $5 or greater; the name and the last known address of
3392 each insured person or annuitant; and with respect to each
3393 policy or contract listed in the report of an insurance
3394 corporation, its number, the name of the corporation, and the
3395 amount due.
3396 Section 63. Section 717.1235, Florida Statutes, is amended
3397 to read:
3398 717.1235 Dormant campaign accounts; report of unclaimed
3399 property.—Abandoned Unclaimed funds reported in the name of a
3400 campaign for public office, for any campaign that must dispose
Page 136 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3401 of surplus funds in its campaign account pursuant to s. 106.141,
3402 after being reported to the department, shall be deposited with
3403 the Chief Financial Officer to the credit of the State School
3404 Fund.
3405 Section 64. Section 717.124, Florida Statutes, is amended
3406 to read:
3407 717.124 Abandoned Unclaimed property claims.—
3408 (1) Any person, excluding another state, claiming an
3409 interest in any property paid or delivered to the department
3410 under this chapter may file with the department a claim on a
3411 form prescribed by the department and verified by the claimant
3412 or the claimant claimant's representative. The claimant's
3413 representative must be an attorney licensed to practice law in
3414 this state, a licensed Florida-certified public accountant, or a
3415 private investigator licensed under chapter 493. The claimant
3416 claimant's representative must be registered with the department
3417 under this chapter. The claimant, or the claimant claimant's
3418 representative, shall provide the department with a legible copy
3419 of a valid driver license of the claimant at the time the
3420 original claim form is filed. If the claimant has not been
3421 issued a valid driver license at the time the original claim
3422 form is filed, the department shall be provided with a legible
3423 copy of a photographic identification of the claimant issued by
3424 the United States, a state or territory of the United States, a
3425 foreign nation, or a political subdivision or agency thereof or
Page 137 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3426 other evidence deemed acceptable by the department by rule. In
3427 lieu of photographic identification, a notarized sworn statement
3428 by the claimant may be provided which affirms the claimant's
3429 identity and states the claimant's full name and address. The
3430 claimant must produce to the notary photographic identification
3431 of the claimant issued by the United States, a state or
3432 territory of the United States, a foreign nation, or a political
3433 subdivision or agency thereof or other evidence deemed
3434 acceptable by the department by rule. The notary shall indicate
3435 the notary's full address on the notarized sworn statement. Any
3436 claim filed without the required identification or the sworn
3437 statement with the original claim form and the original
3438 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement or Abandoned
3439 Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement, if applicable, is void.
3440 (a) Within 90 days after receipt of a claim, the
3441 department may return any claim that provides for the receipt of
3442 fees and costs greater than that permitted under this chapter or
3443 that contains any apparent errors or omissions. The department
3444 may also request that the claimant or the claimant claimant's
3445 representative provide additional information. The department
3446 shall retain a copy or electronic image of the claim.
3447 (b) A claim is considered to have been withdrawn by a
3448 claimant or the claimant's representative if:
3449 1. The department receives a written acknowledgement from
3450 the claimant confirming withdrawal of the claim;
Page 138 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3451 2. The department receives a written notice to withdraw
3452 the claim from a claimant representative that is accompanied by
3453 written authorization from the claimant expressly approving
3454 withdrawal of the claim. The authorization must state the reason
3455 for the withdrawal, contain an acknowledgement that the claimant
3456 understands that withdrawal will affect the processing of that
3457 claim and may affect the processing of other pending claims, and
3458 must be signed by the claimant. The claimant's authorization
3459 must be submitted concurrently with, or as part of, the
3460 withdrawal notice; or
3461 3. The claimant or the claimant's representative fails to
3462 respond to the department's written does not receive a response
3463 to its request for additional information within 60 days after
3464 the notification of any apparent errors or omissions.
3465 (c) Within 90 days after receipt of the claim, or the
3466 response of the claimant or the claimant claimant's
3467 representative to the department's request for additional
3468 information, whichever is later, the department shall determine
3469 each claim. Such determination shall contain a notice of rights
3470 provided by ss. 120.569 and 120.57. The 90-day period shall be
3471 extended by 60 days if the department has good cause to need
3472 additional time or if the abandoned unclaimed property:
3473 1. Is owned by a person who has been a debtor in
3474 bankruptcy;
3475 2. Was reported with an address outside of the United
Page 139 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3476 States;
3477 3. Is being claimed by a person outside of the United
3478 States; or
3479 4. Contains documents filed in support of the claim that
3480 are not in the English language and have not been accompanied by
3481 an English language translation.
3482 (2) A claim for a cashier's check or a stock certificate
3483 without the original instrument may require an indemnity bond
3484 equal to the value of the claim to be provided prior to issue of
3485 the stock or payment of the claim by the department.
3486 (3) The department may require an affidavit swearing to
3487 the authenticity of the claim, lack of documentation, and an
3488 agreement to allow the department to provide the name and
3489 address of the claimant to subsequent claimants coming forward
3490 with substantiated proof to claim the account. This shall apply
3491 to claims equal to or less than $250. The exclusive remedy of a
3492 subsequent claimant to the property shall be against the person
3493 who received the property from the department.
3494 (4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a
3495 claim is determined in favor of the claimant, the department
3496 shall deliver or pay over to the claimant the property or the
3497 amount the department actually received or the proceeds if it
3498 has been sold by the department, together with any additional
3499 amount required by s. 717.121.
3500 (b) If a claimant an owner authorizes a claimant
Page 140 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3501 representative an attorney licensed to practice law in this
3502 state, a Florida-certified public accountant, or a private
3503 investigator licensed under chapter 493, and registered with the
3504 department under this chapter, to claim the abandoned unclaimed
3505 property on the claimant's owner's behalf, the department is
3506 authorized to make distribution of the property or money in
3507 accordance with the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery
3508 Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement
3509 under s. 717.135. The original Abandoned Unclaimed Property
3510 Recovery Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase
3511 Agreement must be executed by the claimant or seller and must be
3512 filed with the department.
3513 (c)1. Payments of approved claims for unclaimed cash
3514 accounts must be made to the owner after deducting any fees and
3515 costs authorized by the claimant under an Abandoned Unclaimed
3516 Property Recovery Agreement. The contents of a safe-deposit box
3517 or shares of securities must be delivered directly to the
3518 claimant.
3519 2. Payments of fees and costs authorized under an
3520 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement for approved
3521 claims must be made or issued to the law firm of the designated
3522 attorney licensed to practice law in this state, the public
3523 accountancy firm of the licensed Florida-certified public
3524 accountant, or the designated employing private investigative
3525 agency licensed by this state. Such payments shall be made by
Page 141 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3526 electronic funds transfer and may be made on such periodic
3527 schedule as the department may define by rule, provided the
3528 payment intervals do not exceed 31 days. Payment made to an
3529 attorney licensed in this state, a Florida-certified public
3530 accountant, or a private investigator licensed under chapter
3531 493, operating individually or as a sole practitioner, must be
3532 to the attorney, certified public accountant, or private
3533 investigator.
3534 (5) The department shall not be administratively, civilly,
3535 or criminally liable for any property or funds distributed
3536 pursuant to this section, provided such distribution is made in
3537 good faith.
3538 (6) This section does not supersede the licensing
3539 requirements of chapter 493.
3540 (7) The department may allow an apparent owner to
3541 electronically submit a claim for abandoned unclaimed property
3542 to the department. If a claim is submitted electronically for
3543 $2,000 or less, the department may use a method of identity
3544 verification other than a copy of a valid driver license, other
3545 government-issued photographic identification, or a sworn
3546 notarized statement. The department may adopt rules to implement
3547 this subsection.
3548 (8) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
3549 the department may develop and implement an identification
3550 verification and disbursement process by which an account valued
Page 142 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3551 at $2,000 or less, after being received by the department and
3552 added to the abandoned unclaimed property database, may be
3553 disbursed to an apparent owner after the department has verified
3554 that the apparent owner is living and that the apparent owner's
3555 current address is correct. The department shall include with
3556 the payment a notification and explanation of the dollar amount,
3557 the source, and the property type of each account included in
3558 the disbursement. The department shall adopt rules to implement
3559 this subsection.
3560 (9)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
3561 chapter, the department may develop and implement a verification
3562 and disbursement process by which an account, after being
3563 received by the department and added to the abandoned unclaimed
3564 property database, for which the apparent owner entity is:
3565 1. A state agency in this state or a subdivision or
3566 successor agency thereof;
3567 2. A county government in this state or a subdivision
3568 thereof;
3569 3. A public school district in this state or a subdivision
3570 thereof;
3571 4. A municipality in this state or a subdivision thereof;
3572 or
3573 5. A special taxing district or authority in this state,
3574
3575 may be disbursed to the apparent owner entity or successor
Page 143 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3576 entity. The department shall include with the payment a
3577 notification and explanation of the dollar amount, the source,
3578 and the property type of each account included in the
3579 disbursement.
3580 (b) The department may adopt rules to implement this
3581 subsection.
3582 (10) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter,
3583 the department may develop a process by which a claimant
3584 claimant's representative or a buyer of unclaimed property may
3585 electronically submit to the department an electronic image of a
3586 completed claim and claims-related documents under this chapter,
3587 including an Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement or
3588 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement that has been
3589 signed and dated by a claimant or seller under s. 717.135, after
3590 the claimant claimant's representative or the buyer of unclaimed
3591 property receives the original documents provided by the
3592 claimant or the seller for any claim. Each claim filed by a
3593 claimant claimant's representative or a buyer of unclaimed
3594 property must include a statement by the claimant claimant's
3595 representative or the buyer of unclaimed property attesting that
3596 all documents are true copies of the original documents and that
3597 all original documents are physically in the possession of the
3598 claimant claimant's representative or the buyer of unclaimed
3599 property. All original documents must be kept in the original
3600 form, by claim number, under the secure control of the claimant
Page 144 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3601 claimant's representative or the buyer of unclaimed property and
3602 must be available for inspection by the department in accordance
3603 with s. 717.1315. The department may adopt rules to implement
3604 this subsection.
3605 (11) This section applies to all abandoned unclaimed
3606 property reported and remitted to the Chief Financial Officer,
3607 including, but not limited to, property reported pursuant to ss.
3608 45.032, 732.107, 733.816, and 744.534.
3609 Section 65. Section 717.12403, Florida Statutes, is
3610 amended to read:
3611 717.12403 Abandoned Unclaimed demand, savings, or checking
3612 account in a financial institution held in the name of more than
3613 one person.—
3614 (1)(a) If an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or
3615 checking account in a financial institution is reported as an
3616 "and" account in the name of two or more persons who are not
3617 beneficiaries, it is presumed that each person must claim the
3618 account in order for the claim to be approved by the department.
3619 This presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to
3620 the account has been transferred to another person or by clear
3621 and convincing evidence demonstrating that the account should
3622 have been reported by the financial institution as an "or"
3623 account.
3624 (b) If an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or checking
3625 account in a financial institution is reported as an "and"
Page 145 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3626 account and one of the persons on the account is deceased, it is
3627 presumed that the account is a survivorship account. This
3628 presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to the
3629 account has been transferred to another person or by clear and
3630 convincing evidence demonstrating that the account is not a
3631 survivorship account.
3632 (2) If an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or checking
3633 account in a financial institution is reported as an "or"
3634 account in the name of two or more persons who are not
3635 beneficiaries, it is presumed that either person listed on the
3636 account may claim the entire amount held in the account. This
3637 presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to the
3638 account has been transferred to another person or by clear and
3639 convincing evidence demonstrating that the account should have
3640 been reported by the financial institution as an "and" account.
3641 (3) If an abandoned unclaimed demand, savings, or checking
3642 account in a financial institution is reported in the name of
3643 two or more persons who are not beneficiaries without
3644 identifying whether the account is an "and" account or an "or"
3645 account, it is presumed that the account is an "or" account.
3646 This presumption may be rebutted by showing that entitlement to
3647 the account has been transferred to another person or by clear
3648 and convincing evidence demonstrating that the account should
3649 have been reported by the financial institution as an "and"
3650 account.
Page 146 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3651 (4) The department shall be deemed to have made a
3652 distribution in good faith if the department remits funds
3653 consistent with this section.
3654 Section 66. Subsection (2) of section 717.12404, Florida
3655 Statutes, is amended to read:
3656 717.12404 Claims on behalf of a business entity or trust.—
3657 (2) Claims on behalf of an active or a dissolved
3658 corporation, a business entity other than an active corporation,
3659 or a trust must include a legible copy of a valid driver license
3660 of the person acting on behalf of the dissolved corporation,
3661 business entity other than an active corporation, or trust. If
3662 the person has not been issued a valid driver license, the
3663 department shall be provided with a legible copy of a
3664 photographic identification of the person issued by the United
3665 States, a foreign nation, or a political subdivision or agency
3666 thereof. In lieu of photographic identification, a notarized
3667 sworn statement by the person may be provided which affirms the
3668 person's identity and states the person's full name and address.
3669 The person must produce his or her photographic identification
3670 issued by the United States, a state or territory of the United
3671 States, a foreign nation, or a political subdivision or agency
3672 thereof or other evidence deemed acceptable by the department by
3673 rule. The notary shall indicate the notary's full address on the
3674 notarized sworn statement. Any claim filed without the required
3675 identification or the sworn statement with the original claim
Page 147 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3676 form and the original Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery
3677 Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement, if
3678 applicable, is void.
3679 Section 67. Section 717.12405, Florida Statutes, is
3680 amended to read:
3681 717.12405 Claims by estates.—An estate or any person
3682 representing an estate or acting on behalf of an estate may
3683 claim abandoned unclaimed property only after the heir or
3684 legatee of the decedent entitled to the property has been
3685 located. Any estate, or any person representing an estate or
3686 acting on behalf of an estate, that receives abandoned unclaimed
3687 property before the heir or legatee of the decedent entitled to
3688 the property has been located, is personally liable for the
3689 abandoned unclaimed property and must immediately return the
3690 full amount of the abandoned unclaimed property or the value
3691 thereof to the department in accordance with s. 717.1341.
3692 Section 68. Section 717.12406, Florida Statutes, is
3693 amended to read:
3694 717.12406 Joint ownership of abandoned unclaimed
3695 securities or dividends.—For the purpose of determining joint
3696 ownership of abandoned unclaimed securities or dividends, the
3697 term:
3698 (1) "TEN COM" means tenants in common.
3699 (2) "TEN ENT" means tenants by the entireties.
3700 (3) "JT TEN" or "JT" means joint tenants with the right of
Page 148 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3701 survivorship and not as tenants in common.
3702 (4) "And" means tenants in common with each person
3703 entitled to an equal pro rata share.
3704 (5) "Or" means that each person listed on the account is
3705 entitled to all of the funds.
3706 Section 69. Section 717.1241, Florida Statutes, is amended
3707 to read:
3708 717.1241 Conflicting claims.—
3709 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "conflicting
3710 claim" means two or more claims received by the department for
3711 the same abandoned property account or accounts in which two or
3712 more claimants appear to be equally entitled to the property.
3713 The term also includes circumstances in which the same claimant
3714 has more than one claim pending for the same property, including
3715 when the claimant is represented by more than one claimant
3716 representative or submits both a personal claim and a claim
3717 through a representative.
3718 (2) When conflicting claims have been received by the
3719 department for the same abandoned unclaimed property account or
3720 accounts, the property shall be remitted in accordance with the
3721 claim filed by the person as follows, notwithstanding the
3722 withdrawal of a claim:
3723 (a) To the person submitting the first claim received by
3724 the Division of Unclaimed Property of the department that is
3725 complete or made complete.
Page 149 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3726 (b) If a claimant's claim and a claimant claimant's
3727 representative's claim for the recovery of property are received
3728 by the Division of Unclaimed Property of the department on the
3729 same day and both claims are complete, to the claimant.
3730 (c) If a buyer's claim or a purchasing claimant
3731 representative's claim and a claimant's claim or a claimant
3732 claimant's representative's claim for the recovery of property
3733 are received by the Division of Unclaimed Property of the
3734 department on the same day and the claims are complete, to the
3735 buyer.
3736 (d) As between two or more claimant representatives'
3737 claimant's representative's claims received by the Division of
3738 Unclaimed Property of the department that are complete or made
3739 complete on the same day, to the claimant claimant's
3740 representative who has agreed to receive the lowest fee. If the
3741 two or more claimant claimant's representatives whose claims
3742 received by the Division of Unclaimed Property of the department
3743 were complete or made complete on the same day are charging the
3744 same lowest fee, the fee shall be divided equally between the
3745 claimant claimant's representatives.
3746 (e) If more than one buyer's claim received by the
3747 Division of Unclaimed Property of the department is complete or
3748 made complete on the same day, the department shall remit the
3749 abandoned unclaimed property to the buyer who paid the highest
3750 amount to the seller. If the buyers paid the same amount to the
Page 150 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3751 seller, the department shall remit the abandoned unclaimed
3752 property to the buyers divided in equal amounts.
3753 (3)(2) The purpose of this section is solely to provide
3754 guidance to the department regarding to whom it should remit the
3755 abandoned unclaimed property and is not intended to extinguish
3756 or affect any private cause of action that any person may have
3757 against another person for breach of contract or other statutory
3758 or common-law remedy. A buyer's sole remedy, if any, shall be
3759 against the claimant claimant's representative or the seller, or
3760 both. A claimant claimant's representative's sole remedy, if
3761 any, shall be against the buyer or the seller, or both. A
3762 claimant's or seller's sole remedy, if any, shall be against the
3763 buyer or the claimant claimant's representative, or both.
3764 Nothing in this section forecloses the right of a person to
3765 challenge the department's determination of completeness in a
3766 proceeding under ss. 120.569 and 120.57.
3767 (4)(3) A claim is complete when entitlement to the
3768 abandoned unclaimed property has been established.
3769 Section 70. Subsection (1) of section 717.1242, Florida
3770 Statutes, is amended to read:
3771 717.1242 Restatement of jurisdiction of the circuit court
3772 sitting in probate and the department.—
3773 (1) It is and has been the intent of the Legislature that,
3774 pursuant to s. 26.012(2)(b), circuit courts have jurisdiction of
3775 proceedings relating to the settlement of the estates of
Page 151 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3776 decedents and other jurisdiction usually pertaining to courts of
3777 probate. It is and has been the intent of the Legislature that,
3778 pursuant to this chapter, the department determines the merits
3779 of claims and entitlement to abandoned unclaimed property paid
3780 or delivered to the department under this chapter. Consistent
3781 with this legislative intent, any beneficiary, devisee, heir,
3782 personal representative, or other interested person, as those
3783 terms are defined in the Florida Probate Code and the Florida
3784 Trust Code, of an estate seeking to obtain property paid or
3785 delivered to the department under this chapter must file a claim
3786 with the department as provided in s. 717.124.
3787 Section 71. Subsections (1) and (4) of section 717.1243,
3788 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3789 717.1243 Small estate accounts.—
3790 (1) A claim for abandoned unclaimed property made by a
3791 beneficiary, as defined in s. 731.201, of a deceased owner need
3792 not be accompanied by an order of a probate court if the
3793 claimant files with the department an affidavit, signed by all
3794 beneficiaries, stating that all the beneficiaries have amicably
3795 agreed among themselves upon a division of the estate and that
3796 all funeral expenses, expenses of the last illness, and any
3797 other lawful claims have been paid, and any additional
3798 information reasonably necessary to make a determination of
3799 entitlement. If the owner died testate, the claim shall be
3800 accompanied by a copy of the will.
Page 152 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3801 (4) This section applies only if all of the abandoned
3802 unclaimed property held by the department on behalf of the owner
3803 has an aggregate value of $20,000 or less and no probate
3804 proceeding is pending.
3805 Section 72. Section 717.1244, Florida Statutes, is amended
3806 to read:
3807 717.1244 Determinations of abandoned unclaimed property
3808 claims.—In rendering a determination regarding the merits of an
3809 abandoned unclaimed property claim, the department shall rely on
3810 the applicable statutory, regulatory, common, and case law.
3811 Agency statements applying the statutory, regulatory, common,
3812 and case law to abandoned unclaimed property claims are not
3813 agency statements subject to s. 120.56(4).
3814 Section 73. Section 717.1245, Florida Statutes, is amended
3815 to read:
3816 717.1245 Garnishment of abandoned unclaimed property.—If
3817 any person files a petition for writ of garnishment seeking to
3818 obtain property paid or delivered to the department under this
3819 chapter, the petitioner shall be ordered to pay the department
3820 reasonable costs and attorney attorney's fees in any proceeding
3821 brought by the department to oppose, appeal, or collaterally
3822 attack the petition or writ if the department is the prevailing
3823 party in any such proceeding.
3824 Section 74. Subsection (1) of section 717.125, Florida
3825 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 153 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3826 717.125 Claim of another state to recover property;
3827 procedure.—
3828 (1) At any time after property has been paid or delivered
3829 to the department under this chapter, another state may recover
3830 the property if:
3831 (a) The property was subjected to custody by this state
3832 because the records of the holder did not reflect the last known
3833 address of the apparent owner when the property was presumed
3834 abandoned unclaimed under this chapter, and the other state
3835 establishes that the last known address of the apparent owner or
3836 other person entitled to the property was in that state and
3837 under the laws of that state the property escheated to or was
3838 subject to a claim of abandonment or being unclaimed by that
3839 state;
3840 (b) The last known address of the apparent owner or other
3841 person entitled to the property, as reflected by the records of
3842 the holder, is in the other state and under the laws of that
3843 state the property has escheated to or become subject to a claim
3844 of abandonment by that state;
3845 (c) The records of the holder were erroneous in that they
3846 did not accurately reflect the actual owner of the property and
3847 the last known address of the actual owner is in the other state
3848 and under laws of that state the property escheated to or was
3849 subject to a claim of abandonment by that state;
3850 (d) The property was subject to custody by this state
Page 154 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3851 under s. 717.103(6) and under the laws of the state of domicile
3852 of the holder the property has escheated to or become subject to
3853 a claim of abandonment by that state; or
3854 (e) The property is the sum payable on a traveler's check,
3855 money order, or other similar instrument that was subjected to
3856 custody by this state under s. 717.104, and the instrument was
3857 purchased in the other state, and under the laws of that state
3858 the property escheated to or became subject to a claim of
3859 abandonment by that state.
3860 Section 75. Subsection (1) of section 717.126, Florida
3861 Statutes, is amended to read:
3862 717.126 Administrative hearing; burden of proof; proof of
3863 entitlement; venue.—
3864 (1) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the department
3865 may petition for a hearing as provided in ss. 120.569 and
3866 120.57. In any proceeding for determination of a claim to
3867 property paid or delivered to the department under this chapter,
3868 the burden shall be upon the claimant to establish entitlement
3869 to the property by a preponderance of evidence. Having the same
3870 name as that reported to the department is not sufficient, in
3871 the absence of other evidence, to prove entitlement to abandoned
3872 unclaimed property.
3873 Section 76. Section 717.1261, Florida Statutes, is amended
3874 to read:
3875 717.1261 Death certificates.—Any person who claims
Page 155 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3876 entitlement to abandoned unclaimed property by means of the
3877 death of one or more persons shall file a copy of the death
3878 certificate of the decedent or decedents that has been certified
3879 as being authentic by the issuing governmental agency.
3880 Section 77. Section 717.1262, Florida Statutes, is amended
3881 to read:
3882 717.1262 Court documents.—Any person who claims
3883 entitlement to abandoned unclaimed property by reason of a court
3884 document shall file a certified copy of the court document with
3885 the department. A certified copy of each pleading filed with the
3886 court to obtain a court document establishing entitlement, filed
3887 within 180 days before the date the claim form was signed by the
3888 claimant or claimant claimant's representative, must also be
3889 filed with the department.
3890 Section 78. Section 717.129, Florida Statutes, is amended
3891 to read:
3892 717.129 Periods of limitation.—
3893 (1) The expiration before or after July 1, 1987, of any
3894 period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order,
3895 during which a claim for money or property may be made or during
3896 which an action or proceeding may be commenced or enforced to
3897 obtain payment of a claim for money or to recover property, does
3898 not prevent the money or property from being presumed abandoned
3899 unclaimed or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or
3900 deliver abandoned unclaimed property to the department as
Page 156 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3901 required by this chapter.
3902 (2) The department may not commence an action or
3903 proceeding to enforce this chapter with respect to the
3904 reporting, payment, or delivery of property or any other duty of
3905 a holder under this chapter more than 10 years after the duty
3906 arose. The period of limitation established under this
3907 subsection is tolled by the earlier of the department's or audit
3908 agent's delivery of a notice that a holder is subject to an
3909 audit or examination under s. 717.1301 or the holder's written
3910 election to enter into an abandoned unclaimed property voluntary
3911 disclosure agreement.
3912 Section 79. Subsections (3) and (4) of section 717.1301,
3913 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3914 717.1301 Investigations; examinations; subpoenas.—
3915 (3) The department may authorize a compliance review of a
3916 report for a specified reporting year. The review must be
3917 limited to the contents of the report filed, as required by s.
3918 717.117 and subsection (2), and all supporting documents related
3919 to the reports. If the review results in a finding of a
3920 deficiency in abandoned unclaimed property due and payable to
3921 the department, the department shall notify the holder in
3922 writing of the amount of deficiency within 1 year after the
3923 authorization of the compliance review. If the holder fails to
3924 pay the deficiency within 90 days, the department may seek to
3925 enforce the assessment under subsection (1). The department is
Page 157 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3926 not required to conduct a review under this section before
3927 initiating an audit.
3928 (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a
3929 contract providing for the location or collection of abandoned
3930 unclaimed property, the department may authorize the contractor
3931 to deduct its fees and expenses for services provided under the
3932 contract from the abandoned unclaimed property that the
3933 contractor has recovered or collected under the contract. The
3934 department shall annually report to the Chief Financial Officer
3935 the total amount collected or recovered by each contractor
3936 during the previous fiscal year and the total fees and expenses
3937 deducted by each contractor.
3938 Section 80. Section 717.1315, Florida Statutes, is amended
3939 to read:
3940 717.1315 Retention of records by claimant claimant's
3941 representatives and buyers of abandoned unclaimed property.—
3942 (1) Every claimant claimant's representative and buyer of
3943 abandoned unclaimed property shall keep and use in his or her
3944 business such books, accounts, and records of the business
3945 conducted under this chapter to enable the department to
3946 determine whether such person is complying with this chapter and
3947 the rules adopted by the department under this chapter. Every
3948 claimant claimant's representative and buyer of abandoned
3949 unclaimed property shall preserve such books, accounts, and
3950 records, including every Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery
Page 158 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3951 Agreement or Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement
3952 between the owner and such claimant claimant's representative or
3953 buyer, for at least 3 years after the date of the initial
3954 agreement.
3955 (2) A claimant claimant's representative or buyer of
3956 abandoned unclaimed property, operating at two or more places of
3957 business in this state, may maintain the books, accounts, and
3958 records of all such offices at any one of such offices, or at
3959 any other office maintained by such claimant claimant's
3960 representative or buyer of abandoned unclaimed property, upon
3961 the filing of a written notice with the department designating
3962 in the written notice the office at which such records are
3963 maintained.
3964 (3) A claimant claimant's representative or buyer of
3965 abandoned unclaimed property shall make all books, accounts, and
3966 records available at a convenient location in this state upon
3967 request of the department.
3968 Section 81. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 717.132,
3969 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
3970 717.132 Enforcement; cease and desist orders; fines.—
3971 (2) In addition to any other powers conferred upon it to
3972 enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter, the
3973 department may issue and serve upon a person an order to cease
3974 and desist and to take corrective action whenever the department
3975 finds that such person is violating, has violated, or is about
Page 159 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
3976 to violate any provision of this chapter, any rule or order
3977 promulgated under this chapter, or any written agreement entered
3978 into with the department. For purposes of this subsection, the
3979 term "corrective action" includes refunding excessive charges,
3980 requiring a person to return abandoned unclaimed property,
3981 requiring a holder to remit abandoned unclaimed property, and
3982 requiring a holder to correct a report that contains errors or
3983 omissions. Any such order shall contain a notice of rights
3984 provided by ss. 120.569 and 120.57.
3985 (3) In addition to any other powers conferred upon it to
3986 enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter, the
3987 department or a court of competent jurisdiction may impose fines
3988 against any person found to have violated any provision of this
3989 chapter, any rule or order promulgated under this chapter, or
3990 any written agreement entered into with the department in an
3991 amount not to exceed $2,000 for each violation. All fines
3992 collected under this subsection shall be deposited as received
3993 in the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Trust Fund.
3994 Section 82. Paragraphs (c), (d), and (j) of subsection
3995 (1), subsections (2) and (3), paragraph (b) of subsection (4),
3996 and subsection (5) of section 717.1322, Florida Statutes, are
3997 amended to read:
3998 717.1322 Administrative and civil enforcement.—
3999 (1) The following acts are violations of this chapter and
4000 constitute grounds for an administrative enforcement action by
Page 160 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4001 the department in accordance with the requirements of chapter
4002 120 and for civil enforcement by the department in a court of
4003 competent jurisdiction:
4004 (c) Fraudulent Misrepresentation, circumvention, or
4005 concealment of any matter required to be stated or furnished to
4006 the department or to an owner or apparent owner under this
4007 chapter, regardless of reliance by or damage to the owner or
4008 apparent owner.
4009 (d) Willful Imposition of illegal or excessive charges in
4010 any abandoned unclaimed property transaction.
4011 (j) Requesting or receiving compensation for notifying a
4012 person of his or her abandoned unclaimed property or assisting
4013 another person in filing a claim for abandoned unclaimed
4014 property, unless the person is an attorney licensed to practice
4015 law in this state, a Florida-certified public accountant, or a
4016 private investigator licensed under chapter 493, or entering
4017 into, or making a solicitation to enter into, an agreement to
4018 file a claim for abandoned unclaimed property owned by another,
4019 unless such person is a registered claimant representative
4020 registered with the department under this chapter and an
4021 attorney licensed to practice law in this state in the regular
4022 practice of her or his profession, a Florida-certified public
4023 accountant who is acting within the scope of the practice of
4024 public accounting as defined in chapter 473, or a private
4025 investigator licensed under chapter 493. This paragraph does not
Page 161 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4026 apply to a person who has been granted a durable power of
4027 attorney to convey and receive all of the real and personal
4028 property of the owner, is the court-appointed guardian of the
4029 owner, has been employed as an attorney or qualified
4030 representative to contest the department's denial of a claim, or
4031 has been employed as an attorney to probate the estate of the
4032 owner or an heir or legatee of the owner.
4033 (2) Upon a finding by the department that any person has
4034 committed any of the acts set forth in subsection (1), the
4035 department may enter an order doing any of the following:
4036 (a) Revoking for a minimum of 5 years or suspending for a
4037 maximum of 5 years a registration previously granted under this
4038 chapter during which time the registrant may not reapply for a
4039 registration under this chapter.;
4040 (b) Placing a claimant representative registrant or an
4041 applicant for a registration on probation for a period of time
4042 and subject to such conditions as the department may specify.;
4043 (c) Placing permanent restrictions or conditions upon
4044 issuance or maintenance of a registration under this chapter;
4045 (d) Issuing a reprimand.;
4046 (e) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed $2,000
4047 for each such act.; or
4048 (f) Prohibiting any person from being a director, officer,
4049 agent, employee, or ultimate equitable owner of a 10 percent 10-
4050 percent or greater interest in an employer of a claimant
Page 162 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4051 representative registrant.
4052 (3) A claimant claimant's representative is subject to
4053 civil enforcement and the disciplinary actions specified in
4054 subsection (2) for violations of subsection (1) by an agent or
4055 employee of the claimant representative's registrant's employer
4056 if the claimant claimant's representative knew or should have
4057 known that such agent or employee was violating any provision of
4058 this chapter.
4059 (4)
4060 (b) The disciplinary guidelines shall specify a meaningful
4061 range of designated penalties based upon the severity or
4062 repetition of specific offenses, or both. It is the legislative
4063 intent that minor violations be distinguished from more serious
4064 violations; that such guidelines consider the amount of the
4065 claim involved, the complexity of locating the owner, the steps
4066 taken to ensure the accuracy of the claim by the person filing
4067 the claim, the acts of commission and omission of the claimant
4068 ultimate owners in establishing themselves as rightful owners of
4069 the funds, the acts of commission or omission of the agent or
4070 employee of a claimant representative or its an employer in the
4071 filing of the claim, the actual knowledge of the agent,
4072 employee, employer, or owner in the filing of the claim, the
4073 departure, if any, by the agent or employee from the internal
4074 controls and procedures established by the claimant
4075 representative or its employer with regard to the filing of a
Page 163 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4076 claim, the number of defective claims previously filed by the
4077 agent, employee, employer, or owner; that such guidelines
4078 provide reasonable and meaningful notice of likely penalties
4079 that may be imposed for proscribed conduct; and that such
4080 penalties be consistently applied by the department.
4081 (5) The department may seek any appropriate civil legal
4082 remedy available to it by filing a civil action in a court of
4083 competent jurisdiction against any person who has, directly or
4084 through a claimant claimant's representative, wrongfully
4085 submitted a claim as the ultimate owner of property and
4086 improperly received funds from the department in violation of
4087 this chapter.
4088 Section 83. Subsections (1) and (3) of section 717.133,
4089 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
4090 717.133 Interstate agreements and cooperation; joint and
4091 reciprocal actions with other states.—
4092 (1) The department may enter into agreements with other
4093 states to exchange information needed to enable this or another
4094 state to audit or otherwise determine abandoned unclaimed
4095 property that it or another state may be entitled to subject to
4096 a claim of custody. The department may require the reporting of
4097 information needed to enable compliance with agreements made
4098 pursuant to this section and prescribe the form.
4099 (3) At the request of another state, the department may
4100 bring an action in the name of the other state in any court of
Page 164 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4101 competent jurisdiction to enforce the abandoned unclaimed
4102 property laws of the other state against a holder in this state
4103 of property subject to escheat or a claim of abandonment by the
4104 other state, if the other state has agreed to pay expenses
4105 incurred in bringing the action.
4106 Section 84. Subsection (2) of section 717.1333, Florida
4107 Statutes, is amended to read:
4108 717.1333 Evidence; estimations; audit reports and
4109 worksheets, investigator reports and worksheets, other related
4110 documents.—
4111 (2) If the records of the holder that are available for
4112 the periods subject to this chapter are insufficient to permit
4113 the preparation of a report of the abandoned unclaimed property
4114 due and owing by a holder, or if the holder fails to provide
4115 records after being requested to do so, the amount due to the
4116 department may be reasonably estimated.
4117 Section 85. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) and
4118 subsections (2) and (4) of section 717.1341, Florida Statutes,
4119 are amended to read:
4120 717.1341 Invalid claims, recovery of property, interest
4121 and penalties.—
4122 (1)(a) A No person may not shall receive abandoned
4123 unclaimed property that the person is not entitled to receive.
4124 Any person who receives, or assists another person to receive,
4125 abandoned unclaimed property that the person is not entitled to
Page 165 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4126 receive is strictly, jointly, personally, and severally liable
4127 for the abandoned unclaimed property and shall immediately
4128 return the property, or the reasonable value of the property if
4129 the property has been damaged or disposed of, to the department
4130 plus interest at the rate set in accordance with s. 55.03(1).
4131 Assisting another person to receive abandoned unclaimed property
4132 includes executing a claim form on the person's behalf.
4133 (2) The department may maintain a civil or administrative
4134 action:
4135 (a) To recover abandoned unclaimed property that was paid
4136 or remitted to a person who was not entitled to the abandoned
4137 unclaimed property or to offset amounts owed to the department
4138 against amounts owed to an owner representative;
4139 (b) Against a person who assists another person in
4140 receiving, or attempting to receive, abandoned unclaimed
4141 property that the person is not entitled to receive; or
4142 (c) Against a person who attempts to receive abandoned
4143 unclaimed property that the person is not entitled to receive.
4144 (4) A No person may not shall knowingly file, knowingly
4145 conspire to file, or knowingly assist in filing, a claim for
4146 abandoned unclaimed property the person is not entitled to
4147 receive. Any person who violates this subsection regarding
4148 abandoned unclaimed property of an aggregate value:
4149 (a) Greater than $50,000, commits is guilty of a felony of
4150 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s.
Page 166 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4151 775.083, or s. 775.084;
4152 (b) Greater than $10,000 up to $50,000, commits is guilty
4153 of a felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
4154 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084;
4155 (c) Greater than $250 up to $10,000, commits is guilty of
4156 a felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s.
4157 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084;
4158 (d) Greater than $50 up to $250, commits is guilty of a
4159 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
4160 775.082 or s. 775.083; or
4161 (e) Up to $50, commits is guilty of a misdemeanor of the
4162 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s.
4163 775.083.
4164 Section 86. Section 717.135, Florida Statutes, is amended
4165 to read:
4166 717.135 Recovery agreements and purchase agreements for
4167 claims filed by a claimant claimant's representative; fees and
4168 costs or total net gain.—
4169 (1) In order to protect the interests of owners of
4170 abandoned unclaimed property, the department shall adopt by rule
4171 a form entitled "Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery
4172 Agreement" and a form entitled "Abandoned Unclaimed Property
4173 Purchase Agreement."
4174 (2) The Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement
4175 and the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement must
Page 167 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4176 include and disclose all of the following:
4177 (a) The total dollar amount of abandoned unclaimed
4178 property accounts claimed or sold.
4179 (b) The total percentage of all authorized fees and costs
4180 to be paid to the claimant claimant's representative or the
4181 percentage of the value of the property to be paid as net gain
4182 to the purchasing claimant claimant's representative.
4183 (c) The total dollar amount to be deducted and received
4184 from the claimant as fees and costs by the claimant claimant's
4185 representative or the total net dollar amount to be received by
4186 the purchasing claimant claimant's representative.
4187 (d) The net dollar amount to be received by the claimant
4188 or the seller.
4189 (e) For each account claimed, the abandoned unclaimed
4190 property account number.
4191 (f) For the Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase
4192 Agreement, a statement that the amount of the purchase price
4193 will be remitted to the seller by the purchaser within 30 days
4194 after the execution of the agreement by the seller.
4195 (g) The name, address, e-mail address, phone number, and
4196 license number of the claimant claimant's representative.
4197 (h)1. The manual signature of the claimant or seller and
4198 the date signed, affixed on the agreement by the claimant or
4199 seller.
4200 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to
Page 168 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4201 the contrary, the department may allow an apparent owner, who is
4202 also the claimant or seller, to sign the agreement
4203 electronically. All electronic signatures on the Abandoned
4204 Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement and the Abandoned
4205 Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement must be affixed on the
4206 agreement by the claimant or seller using the specific,
4207 exclusive eSignature product and protocol authorized by the
4208 department.
4209 (i) The social security number or taxpayer identification
4210 number of the claimant or seller, if a number has been issued to
4211 the claimant or seller.
4212 (j) The total fees and costs, or the total discount in the
4213 case of a purchase agreement, which may not exceed 30 percent of
4214 the claimed amount. In the case of a recovery agreement, if the
4215 total fees and costs exceed 30 percent, the fees and costs shall
4216 be reduced to 30 percent and the net balance shall be remitted
4217 directly by the department to the claimant. In the case of a
4218 purchase agreement, if the total net gain of the claimant
4219 claimant's representative exceeds 30 percent, the claim will be
4220 denied.
4221 (3) For an Abandoned Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement
4222 form, proof that the purchaser has made payment must be filed
4223 with the department along with the claim. If proof of payment is
4224 not provided, the claim is void.
4225 (4) A claimant claimant's representative must use the
Page 169 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4226 Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement or the Abandoned
4227 Unclaimed Property Purchase Agreement as the exclusive means of
4228 entering into an agreement or a contract with a claimant or
4229 seller to file a claim with the department.
4230 (5) Fees and costs may be owed or paid to, or received by,
4231 a claimant claimant's representative only after a filed claim
4232 has been approved and if the claimant's representative used an
4233 agreement authorized by this section.
4234 (6) A claimant claimant's representative may not use or
4235 distribute any other agreement of any type, conveyed by any
4236 method, with respect to the claimant or seller which relates,
4237 directly or indirectly, to abandoned unclaimed property accounts
4238 held by the department or the Chief Financial Officer other than
4239 the agreements authorized by this section. Any engagement,
4240 authorization, recovery, or fee agreement that is not authorized
4241 by this section is void. A claimant claimant's representative is
4242 subject to administrative and civil enforcement under s.
4243 717.1322 if he or she uses an agreement that is not authorized
4244 by this section and if the agreement is used to apply, directly
4245 or indirectly, to abandoned unclaimed property held by this
4246 state. This subsection does not prohibit lawful nonagreement,
4247 noncontractual, or advertising communications between or among
4248 the parties.
4249 (7) The Abandoned Unclaimed Property Recovery Agreement
4250 may not contain language that makes the agreement irrevocable or
Page 170 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4251 that creates an assignment of any portion of abandoned unclaimed
4252 property held by the department.
4253 (8) When a claim is approved, the department may pay any
4254 additional account that is owned by the claimant but has not
4255 been claimed at the time of approval, provided that a subsequent
4256 claim has not been filed or is not pending for the claimant at
4257 the time of approval.
4258 (9) This section does not supersede s. 717.1241.
4259 (10) This section does not apply to the sale and purchase
4260 of Florida-held unclaimed property accounts through a bankruptcy
4261 estate representative or other person or entity authorized
4262 pursuant to Title XI of the United States Code or an order of a
4263 bankruptcy court to act on behalf or for the benefit of the
4264 debtor, its creditors, and its bankruptcy estate.
4265 Section 87. Section 717.1356, Florida Statutes, is created
4266 to read:
4267 717.1356 Purchase of abandoned property.—
4268 (1) Agreements for the purchase of abandoned property
4269 reported to the department shall be valid only if all of the
4270 following conditions are met:
4271 (a) The agreement is entitled "Florida Abandoned Property
4272 Purchase Agreement" and is in writing, in minimum 12-point type.
4273 (b) The agreement includes the social security number or
4274 taxpayer identification number of the seller, if a number has
4275 been issued to the seller; a valid e-mail address, mailing
Page 171 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4276 address, and telephone number for the seller; and is manually
4277 signed and dated by the seller with the signature notarized.
4278 (c) The agreement discloses with specificity the nature
4279 and value of the abandoned property, including the name of the
4280 apparent owner as shown by the records of the department, the
4281 name of the holder who remitted the property, the date of last
4282 contact, and the property category. With respect to the value of
4283 the abandoned property, the agreement must contain the
4284 following:
4285 1. The total dollar amount of all abandoned property to be
4286 sold.
4287 2. The total percentage of the value of the abandoned
4288 property to be paid as net gain to the purchaser.
4289 3. The total net dollar amount to be received by the
4290 purchaser.
4291 4. The net dollar amount to be received by the seller.
4292 (d) The agreement states the abandoned property account
4293 number for each abandoned property account sold.
4294 (e) The purchase price does not discount the total value
4295 of all abandoned property subject to the sale by more than 30
4296 percent.
4297 (f) The agreement states that the amount of the purchase
4298 price will be remitted to the seller by the purchaser within 30
4299 days after the execution of the agreement by the seller.
4300 (g) The agreement includes the name, address, e-mail
Page 172 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4301 address, and phone number of the purchaser.
4302 (h) The agreement states that the abandoned property is
4303 currently in the department's custody and that the seller can
4304 claim the property directly from the department on its
4305 electronically searchable website without being charged a fee.
4306 The agreement must provide the department's website address.
4307 (2) A seller may cancel a purchase agreement without
4308 penalty or obligation within 15 business days after the date on
4309 which the agreement was executed. The agreement must contain the
4310 following language in minimum 12-point type: "You may cancel
4311 this agreement for any reason without penalty or obligation to
4312 you within 15 days after the date of this agreement by providing
4313 notice to . . .(name of purchaser). . ., submitted in writing
4314 and sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or other
4315 form of mailing that provides proof thereof, at the address or
4316 e-mail address specified in the agreement."
4317 (3) A copy of an executed Florida Abandoned Property
4318 Purchase Agreement must be filed with the purchaser's claim,
4319 along with proof that the purchaser has made payment in full,
4320 and all other required documentation. If proof of payment is not
4321 provided, the department may not approve the claim.
4322 (4) A purchase agreement under this section that discounts
4323 the value of abandoned property by more than the amount
4324 authorized in paragraph (1)(e) is enforceable only by the
4325 seller.
Page 173 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4326 (5) This section does not apply to asset purchase
4327 agreements involving the assets of a business association
4328 arising out of a bankruptcy proceeding under Title 11 of the
4329 United States Code or corporate dissolution or similar
4330 proceeding under applicable state law such as receiverships and
4331 assignments for the benefit of creditors.
4332 (6) This section does not apply to assent purchase
4333 agreements between an asset purchaser and sellers who comprise a
4334 large business association.
4335 (a) For the purposes of this subsection, a large business
4336 association is a business association or group of business
4337 associations that:
4338 1. Generates $100 million or more in annual gross receipts
4339 or sales;
4340 2. Employs 100 or more full time employees in the United
4341 States; or
4342 3. Has equity securities publicly traded on an exchange
4343 regulated by the United States Securities and Exchange
4344 Commission.
4345 (b) Claims filed by an asset purchaser under this
4346 subsection must include:
4347 1. A complete copy of the asset purchase agreement or
4348 similar contract between the asset purchaser and the seller; and
4349 2. An attestation by the seller either in the asset
4350 purchase agreement or in a separate written affirmation from the
Page 174 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4351 owner that the owner:
4352 a. Meets one or more of the characteristics that qualify
4353 it as a large business association under paragraph (a); and
4354 b. Is aware that it is selling unclaimed property that may
4355 be recovered from the administrator without paying a fee.
4356 (c) If the seller is a publicly traded entity, the asset
4357 purchaser may provide a copy, or a link to an online copy, of
4358 the most recent copy of Form 10K filed with the United States
4359 Securities and Exchange Commission in lieu of the affirmation
4360 that the owner meets one or more of the characteristics that
4361 qualify it as a large business association.
4362 (d) Nothing in this subsection limits the ability of the
4363 department to request or receive additional evidence sufficient
4364 to establish to the satisfaction of the department that the
4365 claimant is the owner of the property pursuant to this chapter.
4366 (e) The department may adopt rules to implement this
4367 subsection.
4368 (f) The requirements of this section shall apply only to
4369 claims filed based on asset purchase agreements executed on or
4370 after the effective date of this act.
4371 Section 88. The Division of Law Revision is directed to
4372 replace the phrase "the effective date of this act" wherever it
4373 occurs in this act with the date this act becomes a law.
4374 Section 89. Section 717.138, Florida Statutes, is amended
4375 to read:
Page 175 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4376 717.138 Rulemaking authority.—The department shall
4377 administer and provide for the enforcement of this chapter. The
4378 department has authority to adopt rules pursuant to ss.
4379 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement the provisions of this
4380 chapter. The department may adopt rules to allow for electronic
4381 filing of fees, forms, and reports required by this chapter. The
4382 authority to adopt rules pursuant to this chapter applies to all
4383 abandoned unclaimed property reported and remitted to the Chief
4384 Financial Officer, including, but not limited to, property
4385 reported and remitted pursuant to ss. 45.032, 732.107, 733.816,
4386 and 744.534.
4387 Section 90. Section 717.1382, Florida Statutes, is amended
4388 to read:
4389 717.1382 United States savings bond; abandoned unclaimed
4390 property; escheatment; procedure.—
4391 (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a United
4392 States savings bond in possession of the department or
4393 registered to a person with a last known address in the state,
4394 including a bond that is lost, stolen, or destroyed, is presumed
4395 abandoned and unclaimed 5 years after the bond reaches maturity
4396 and no longer earns interest and shall be reported and remitted
4397 to the department by the financial institution or other holder
4398 in accordance with ss. 717.117(5) and (11) ss. 717.117(1) and
4399 (5) and 717.119, if the department is not in possession of the
4400 bond.
Page 176 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4401 (2)(a) After a United States savings bond is abandoned and
4402 unclaimed in accordance with subsection (1), the department may
4403 commence a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction in
4404 Leon County for a determination that the bond shall escheat to
4405 the state. Upon determination of escheatment, all property
4406 rights to the bond or proceeds from the bond, including all
4407 rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of an owner, co-
4408 owner, or beneficiary, shall vest solely in the state.
4409 (b) Service of process by publication may be made on a
4410 party in a civil action pursuant to this section. A notice of
4411 action shall state the name of any known owner of the bond, the
4412 nature of the action or proceeding in short and simple terms,
4413 the name of the court in which the action or proceeding is
4414 instituted, and an abbreviated title of the case.
4415 (c) The notice of action shall require a person claiming
4416 an interest in the bond to file a written defense with the clerk
4417 of the court and serve a copy of the defense by the date fixed
4418 in the notice. The date must not be less than 28 or more than 60
4419 days after the first publication of the notice.
4420 (d) The notice of action shall be published once a week
4421 for 4 consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
4422 published in Leon County. Proof of publication shall be placed
4423 in the court file.
4424 (e)1. If no person files a claim with the court for the
4425 bond and if the department has substantially complied with the
Page 177 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4426 provisions of this section, the court shall enter a default
4427 judgment that the bond, or proceeds from such bond, has
4428 escheated to the state.
4429 2. If a person files a claim for one or more bonds and,
4430 after notice and hearing, the court determines that the claimant
4431 is not entitled to the bonds claimed by such claimant, the court
4432 shall enter a judgment that such bonds, or proceeds from such
4433 bonds, have escheated to the state.
4434 3. If a person files a claim for one or more bonds and,
4435 after notice and hearing, the court determines that the claimant
4436 is entitled to the bonds claimed by such claimant, the court
4437 shall enter a judgment in favor of the claimant.
4438 (3) The department may redeem a United States savings bond
4439 escheated to the state pursuant to this section or, in the event
4440 that the department is not in possession of the bond, seek to
4441 obtain the proceeds from such bond. Proceeds received by the
4442 department shall be deposited in accordance with s. 717.123.
4443 Section 91. Section 717.139, Florida Statutes, is amended
4444 to read:
4445 717.139 Uniformity of application and construction.—
4446 (1) The Legislature finds that laws governing abandoned
4447 property serve a vital public purpose by protecting the property
4448 rights of owners, facilitating the return abandoned property to
4449 its owners, preventing private escheatment, and ensuring that
4450 abandoned assets are preserved and safeguarded from waste or
Page 178 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4451 misuse. It is the public policy of the state to protect the
4452 interests of owners of abandoned unclaimed property. It is
4453 declared to be in the best interests of owners of unclaimed
4454 property that such owners receive the full amount of any
4455 unclaimed property without any fee.
4456 (2) This chapter shall be applied and construed as to
4457 effectuate its general purpose of protecting the interest of
4458 missing owners of abandoned property, while providing that the
4459 benefit of all unclaimed and abandoned property shall go to all
4460 the people of the state, and to make uniform the law with
4461 respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.
4462 It is the intent of the Legislature that property reported under
4463 this chapter remains the property of the owner and that the
4464 State of Florida acts solely as a custodian, not as the owner,
4465 of such property. Title to abandoned property may not transfer
4466 to the state except as expressly provided by law and only after
4467 all reasonable efforts to identify and return the property to
4468 its rightful owner have been exhausted.
4469 Section 92. Section 717.1400, Florida Statutes, is amended
4470 to read:
4471 717.1400 Registration.—
4472 (1) In order to file claims as a claimant claimant's
4473 representative, receive a distribution of fees and costs for
4474 approved claims from the department, and obtain information
4475 regarding abandoned unclaimed property dollar amounts and
Page 179 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4476 numbers of reported shares of stock held by the department, an
4477 individual must meet all of the following requirements:
4478 (a) Be one of the following:
4479 1. A Florida-licensed private investigator holding a Class
4480 "C" individual license under chapter 493;
4481 2. A Florida-certified public account; or
4482 3. A Florida-licensed attorney.
4483 (b) Have obtained a certificate of registration from Must
4484 register with the department.
4485 (2) An application for registration as a claimant
4486 representative must be submitted in writing on a form prescribed
4487 by the department and must be accompanied by all of the
4488 following:
4489 (a) A legible color copy of the applicant's current driver
4490 license showing the full name and current address of such
4491 person. If a current driver license is not available, another
4492 form of photo identification must be provided which shows the
4493 full name and current address of such person.
4494 (b) If the applicant is a private investigator:
4495 1. on such form as the department prescribes by rule and
4496 must be verified by the applicant. To register with the
4497 department, a private investigator must provide:
4498 (a) A legible copy of the applicant's Class "A" business
4499 license under chapter 493 or that of the applicant's firm or
4500 employer which holds a Class "A" business license under chapter
Page 180 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4501 493; and.
4502 2.(b) A legible copy of the applicant's Class "C"
4503 individual license issued under chapter 493.
4504 (c) If the applicant is a certified public account, the
4505 applicant's Florida Board of Accountancy number.
4506 (d) If the applicant is a licensed attorney, the
4507 applicant's Florida Bar number.
4508 (e)(c) The business address, and telephone number, tax
4509 identification number, and state of domicile or incorporation of
4510 the applicant's private investigative firm or employer.
4511 (f)(d) The names of agents, or employees, or independent
4512 contractors, if any, who are designated or authorized to act on
4513 behalf of the applicant private investigator, together with a
4514 legible color copy of their photo identification issued by an
4515 agency of the United States, or a state, or a political
4516 subdivision thereof.
4517 (g) A statement that the applicant has not, during the 5-
4518 year period immediately preceding the submission of the
4519 application, violated any part of the Florida Disposition of
4520 Abandoned Personal Property Act.
4521 (h) A statement that the applicant has not been convicted
4522 of, or plead guilty to, a felony or any offense involving moral
4523 turpitude; dishonesty; deceit; or breach of fiduciary duty,
4524 including theft, attempted theft, falsification, tampering with
4525 records, securing writings by deception, fraud, forgery, or
Page 181 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4526 perjury.
4527 (i)(e) Sufficient information to enable the department to
4528 disburse funds by electronic funds transfer.
4529 (j) The applicant's notarized signature immediately
4530 following an acknowledgment that any false or perjured statement
4531 subjects the applicant to criminal liability under the laws of
4532 this state
4533 (f) The tax identification number of the private
4534 investigator's firm or employer which holds a Class "A" business
4535 license under chapter 493.
4536 (2) In order to file claims as a claimant's
4537 representative, receive a distribution of fees and costs from
4538 the department, and obtain unclaimed property dollar amounts and
4539 numbers of reported shares of stock held by the department, a
4540 Florida-certified public accountant must register with the
4541 department on such form as the department prescribes by rule and
4542 must be verified by the applicant. To register with the
4543 department, a Florida-certified public accountant must provide:
4544 (a) The applicant's Florida Board of Accountancy number.
4545 (b) A legible copy of the applicant's current driver
4546 license showing the full name and current address of such
4547 person. If a current driver license is not available, another
4548 form of identification showing the full name and current address
4549 of such person or persons shall be filed with the department.
4550 (c) The business address and telephone number of the
Page 182 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4551 applicant's public accounting firm or employer.
4552 (d) The names of agents or employees, if any, who are
4553 designated to act on behalf of the Florida-certified public
4554 accountant, together with a legible copy of their photo
4555 identification issued by an agency of the United States, or a
4556 state, or a political subdivision thereof.
4557 (e) Sufficient information to enable the department to
4558 disburse funds by electronic funds transfer.
4559 (f) The tax identification number of the accountant's
4560 public accounting firm employer.
4561 (3) In order to file claims as a claimant's
4562 representative, receive a distribution of fees and costs from
4563 the department, and obtain unclaimed property dollar amounts and
4564 numbers of reported shares of stock held by the department, an
4565 attorney licensed to practice in this state must register with
4566 the department on such form as the department prescribes by rule
4567 and must be verified by the applicant. To register with the
4568 department, such attorney must provide:
4569 (a) The applicant's Florida Bar number.
4570 (b) A legible copy of the applicant's current driver
4571 license showing the full name and current address of such
4572 person. If a current driver license is not available, another
4573 form of identification showing the full name and current address
4574 of such person or persons shall be filed with the department.
4575 (c) The business address and telephone number of the
Page 183 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4576 applicant's firm or employer.
4577 (d) The names of agents or employees, if any, who are
4578 designated to act on behalf of the attorney, together with a
4579 legible copy of their photo identification issued by an agency
4580 of the United States, or a state, or a political subdivision
4581 thereof.
4582 (e) Sufficient information to enable the department to
4583 disburse funds by electronic funds transfer.
4584 (f) The tax identification number of the attorney's firm
4585 or employer.
4586 (4) Information and documents already on file with the
4587 department before the effective date of this provision need not
4588 be resubmitted in order to complete the registration.
4589 (4)(5) If a material change in the status of a
4590 registration occurs, the claimant representative a registrant
4591 must, within 30 days, provide the department with the updated
4592 documentation and information in writing. Material changes
4593 include, but are not limited to, the following,: a designated
4594 agent or employee ceasing to act on behalf of the designating
4595 person, a surrender, suspension, or revocation of a license, or
4596 a license renewal.
4597 (a) If a designated agent or employee ceases to act on
4598 behalf of the person who has designated the agent or employee to
4599 act on such person's behalf, the designating person must, within
4600 30 days, inform the department the Division of Unclaimed
Page 184 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4601 Property in writing of the termination of agency or employment.
4602 (b) If a registrant surrenders the registrant's license or
4603 the license is suspended or revoked, the registrant must, within
4604 30 days, inform the division in writing of the surrender,
4605 suspension, or revocation.
4606 (c) If a private investigator's Class "C" individual
4607 license under chapter 493 or a private investigator's employer's
4608 Class "A" business license under chapter 493 is renewed, the
4609 private investigator must provide a copy of the renewed license
4610 to the department within 30 days after the receipt of the
4611 renewed license by the private investigator or the private
4612 investigator's employer.
4613 (5)(6) An applicant's claimant representative's A
4614 registrant's firm or employer may not have a name that might
4615 lead another person to conclude that the claimant
4616 representative's registrant's firm or employer is affiliated or
4617 associated with the United States, or an agency thereof, or a
4618 state or an agency or political subdivision of a state. The
4619 department shall deny an application for registration or revoke
4620 a registration if the applicant's or claimant representative's
4621 registrant's firm or employer has a name that might lead another
4622 person to conclude that the firm or employer is affiliated or
4623 associated with the United States, or an agency thereof, or a
4624 state or an agency or political subdivision of a state. Names
4625 that might lead another person to conclude that the firm or
Page 185 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4626 employer is affiliated or associated with the United States, or
4627 an agency thereof, or a state or an agency or political
4628 subdivision of a state, include, but are not limited to, the
4629 words United States, Florida, state, bureau, division,
4630 department, or government.
4631 (6)(7) The licensing and other requirements of this
4632 section must be maintained as a condition of registration with
4633 the department.
4634 (7) To maintain active registration under this section, a
4635 claimant representative must file and obtain payment on at least
4636 10 claims per calendar year following the date of initial
4637 registration.
4638 (a) If a claimant representative fails to meet this
4639 requirement, the department must notify the claimant
4640 representative in writing and provide 30 days to demonstrate
4641 compliance or good cause for noncompliance.
4642 (b) If the claimant representative does not cure the
4643 deficiency or demonstrate good cause within the time provided,
4644 the department must revoke the registration.
4645 (c) A claimant representative whose registration is
4646 revoked under this subsection may not reapply for registration
4647 under this section for a period of 1 year following the
4648 effective date of the revocation.
4649 Section 93. Subsection (1) of section 1001.281, Florida
4650 Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 186 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4651 1001.281 Operating Trust Fund.—
4652 (1) The Operating Trust Fund, FLAIR number 48-2-510, is
4653 created within the Department of Education.
4654 Section 94. Subsection (1) of section 1001.282, Florida
4655 Statutes, is amended to read:
4656 1001.282 Administrative Trust Fund.—
4657 (1) The Administrative Trust Fund, FLAIR number 48-2-021,
4658 is created within the Department of Education.
4659 Section 95. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
4660 197.582, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
4661 197.582 Disbursement of proceeds of sale.—
4662 (2)(a) If the property is purchased for an amount in
4663 excess of the statutory bid of the certificateholder, the
4664 surplus must be paid over and disbursed by the clerk as set
4665 forth in subsections (3), (5), and (6). If the opening bid
4666 included the homestead assessment pursuant to s. 197.502(6)(c),
4667 that amount must be treated as surplus and distributed in the
4668 same manner. The clerk shall distribute the surplus to the
4669 governmental units for the payment of any lien of record held by
4670 a governmental unit against the property, including any tax
4671 certificates not incorporated in the tax deed application and
4672 omitted taxes, if any. If there remains a balance of
4673 undistributed funds, the balance must be retained by the clerk
4674 for the benefit of persons described in s. 197.522(1)(a), except
4675 those persons described in s. 197.502(4)(h), as their interests
Page 187 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4676 may appear. The clerk shall mail notices to such persons
4677 notifying them of the funds held for their benefit at the
4678 addresses provided in s. 197.502(4). Such notice constitutes
4679 compliance with the requirements of s. 717.117 s. 717.117(6).
4680 Any service charges and costs of mailing notices shall be paid
4681 out of the excess balance held by the clerk. Notice must be
4682 provided in substantially the following form:
4683
4684 NOTICE OF SURPLUS FUNDS
4685 FROM TAX DEED SALE
4686
4687 CLERK OF COURT
4688 .... COUNTY, FLORIDA
4689
4690 Tax Deed #........
4691 Certificate #........
4692 Property Description: ........
4693 Pursuant to chapter 197, Florida Statutes, the above
4694 property was sold at public sale on ...(date of sale)..., and a
4695 surplus of $...(amount)... (subject to change) will be held by
4696 this office for 120 days beginning on the date of this notice to
4697 benefit the persons having an interest in this property as
4698 described in section 197.502(4), Florida Statutes, as their
4699 interests may appear (except for those persons described in
4700 section 197.502(4)(h), Florida Statutes).
Page 188 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4701 To the extent possible, these funds will be used to satisfy
4702 in full each claimant with a senior mortgage or lien in the
4703 property before distribution of any funds to any junior mortgage
4704 or lien claimant or to the former property owner. To be
4705 considered for funds when they are distributed, you must file a
4706 notarized statement of claim with this office within 120 days of
4707 this notice. If you are a lienholder, your claim must include
4708 the particulars of your lien and the amounts currently due. Any
4709 lienholder claim that is not filed within the 120-day deadline
4710 is barred.
4711 A copy of this notice must be attached to your statement of
4712 claim. After the office examines the filed claim statements, it
4713 will notify you if you are entitled to any payment.
4714 Dated: ........
4715 Clerk of Court
4716 Section 96. Paragraph (t) of subsection (1) of section
4717 626.9541, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
4718 626.9541 Unfair methods of competition and unfair or
4719 deceptive acts or practices defined.—
4720 (1) UNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION AND UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
4721 ACTS.—The following are defined as unfair methods of competition
4722 and unfair or deceptive acts or practices:
4723 (t) Certain life insurance relations with funeral
4724 directors prohibited.—
4725 1. No life insurer shall permit any funeral director or
Page 189 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4726 direct disposer to act as its representative, adjuster, claim
4727 agent, special claim agent, or agent for such insurer in
4728 soliciting, negotiating, or effecting contracts of life
4729 insurance on any plan or of any nature issued by such insurer or
4730 in collecting premiums for holders of any such contracts except
4731 as prescribed in s. 626.785(2) s. 626.785(3).
4732 2. No life insurer shall:
4733 a. Affix, or permit to be affixed, advertising matter of
4734 any kind or character of any licensed funeral director or direct
4735 disposer to such policies of insurance.
4736 b. Circulate, or permit to be circulated, any such
4737 advertising matter with such insurance policies.
4738 c. Attempt in any manner or form to influence
4739 policyholders of the insurer to employ the services of any
4740 particular licensed funeral director or direct disposer.
4741 3. No such insurer shall maintain, or permit its agent to
4742 maintain, an office or place of business in the office,
4743 establishment, or place of business of any funeral director or
4744 direct disposer in this state.
4745 Section 97. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
4746 made by this act to section 717.101, Florida Statutes, in a
4747 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section
4748 772.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
4749 772.13 Civil remedy for terrorism or facilitating or
4750 furthering terrorism.—
Page 190 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4751 (6)(a) In any postjudgment execution proceedings to
4752 enforce a judgment entered against a terrorist party under this
4753 section or under 18 U.S.C. s. 2333 or a substantially similar
4754 law of the United States or of any state or territory of the
4755 United States, including postjudgment execution proceedings
4756 against any agency or instrumentality of the terrorist party not
4757 named in the judgment pursuant to s. 201(a) of the Terrorism
4758 Risk Insurance Act, 28 U.S.C. s. 1610:
4759 1. There is no right to a jury trial under s. 56.18 or s.
4760 77.08;
4761 2. A defendant or a person may not use the resources of
4762 the courts of this state in furtherance of a defense or an
4763 objection to postjudgment collection proceedings if the
4764 defendant or person purposely leaves the jurisdiction of this
4765 state or the United States, declines to enter or reenter this
4766 state or the United States to submit to its jurisdiction, or
4767 otherwise evades the jurisdiction of the court in which a
4768 criminal case is pending against the defendant or person. This
4769 subparagraph applies to any entity that is owned or controlled
4770 by a person to whom this paragraph applies;
4771 3. Creditor process issued under chapter 56 or chapter 77
4772 may be served upon any person or entity over whom the court has
4773 personal jurisdiction. Writs of garnishment issued under s.
4774 77.01 and proceedings supplementary under s. 56.29 apply to
4775 intangible assets wherever located, without territorial
Page 191 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4776 limitation, including bank accounts as defined in s.
4777 674.104(1)(a), financial assets as defined in s. 678.1021(1), or
4778 other intangible property as defined in s. 717.101. The situs of
4779 any intangible assets held or maintained by or in the
4780 possession, custody, or control of a person or entity so served
4781 shall be deemed to be in this state for the purposes of a
4782 proceeding under chapter 56 or chapter 77. Service of a writ or
4783 notice to appear under this section shall provide the court with
4784 in rem jurisdiction over any intangible assets regardless of the
4785 location of the assets;
4786 4. Notwithstanding s. 678.1121, the interest of a debtor
4787 in a financial asset or security entitlement may be reached by a
4788 creditor by legal process upon the securities intermediary with
4789 whom the debtor's securities account is maintained, or, if that
4790 is a foreign entity, legal process under chapter 56 or chapter
4791 77 may be served upon the United States securities custodian or
4792 intermediary that has reported holding, maintaining, possessing,
4793 or controlling the blocked financial assets or security
4794 entitlements to the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the
4795 United States Department of the Treasury, and such financial
4796 assets or security entitlements shall be subject to execution,
4797 garnishment, and turnover by the United States securities
4798 custodian or intermediary; and
4799 5. Notwithstanding s. 670.502(4), when an electronic funds
4800 transfer is not completed within 5 banking days and is canceled
Page 192 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4801 pursuant to s. 670.211(4) because a United States intermediary
4802 financial institution has blocked the transaction in compliance
4803 with a United States sanctions program, and a terrorist party or
4804 any agency or instrumentality thereof was either the originator
4805 or the intended beneficiary, then the blocked funds shall be
4806 deemed owned by the terrorist party or its agency or
4807 instrumentality and shall be subject to execution and
4808 garnishment.
4809 Section 98. The following rules are ratified for the sole
4810 and exclusive purpose of satisfying any condition on
4811 effectiveness imposed under chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida:
4812 Rules 69C-2.004, 69C-2.005, 69C-2.016, 69C-2.022, 69C-2.026,
4813 69C-2.034, 69C-2.035, 69U-100.097, 69V-560.1000, 69V-560.1012,
4814 69V-560.102, 69V-560.7032, 69V-560.7033, 69V-560.7034, 69V-
4815 560.7035, and 69V-560.7036, Florida Administrative Code,
4816 entitled "Definitions," "Designation of a Qualified Public
4817 Depository," "Financial Information Reports by a Qualified
4818 Public Depository," "Requirements of Public Depositors,"
4819 "Administration of Payment of Losses," "Disqualification,
4820 Suspension, and Administrative Penalty," "Custodians of Gold
4821 Coin or Silver Coin," "Gold Coin or Silver Coin Deposits,"
4822 "Disciplinary Guidelines," "Adoption of Forms," "Application or
4823 Appointment Procedures and Requirements," "Records to Be
4824 Maintained when Engaged in Transactions Involving Gold and
4825 Silver Coin," "Gold Coin and Silver Coin Disclosures,"
Page 193 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/CS/HB 1221 2026
4826 "Accredited Refiner or Wholesaler of Gold Coin or Silver Coin,"
4827 "Chain of Custody Related to Gold or Silver Coin," and "Rapid
4828 Response Time by Law Enforcement," respectively, as filed for
4829 adoption with the Department of State pursuant to the
4830 certification packages dated October 31, 2025, and November 1,
4831 2025.
4832 Section 99. Section 18 of chapter 2025-100, Laws of
4833 Florida, is repealed.
4834 Section 100. This act shall take effect upon becoming a
4835 law.
4836
Page 194 of 194
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1221-03-c3